Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB152.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.345 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Minority" means American Indian; Alaskan native; African-American;
Hispanic, including persons of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, and Central or
South American origin; Pacific islander; or other ethnic group
underrepresented in the school;
(b) "School" means an elementary or secondary educational institution that is
under the administrative control of a principal and is not a program or part of
another school. The term "school" does not include district-operated schools
that are:
1. Exclusively vocational-technical, special education, or preschool
programs;
2. Instructional programs operated in institutions or schools outside of the
district; or
3. Alternative schools designed to provide services to at-risk populations
with unique needs;
(c) "School-based policy" means any policy, procedure, program, or practice
established by the principal of a school after consultation with the school's
advisory council;
(d) "Teacher" means any person for whom certification is required as a basis of
employment in the public schools of the state, with the exception of principals
and assistant principals; and
(e)[(d)] "Parent"
1. Means:
a.[1.] A parent, stepparent, or foster parent of a student; or
Page 1 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
b.[2.] A person who has legal custody of a student pursuant to a court
order and with whom the student resides; and
2. Does not mean:
a. An employee of the district or their relative; and
b. A local school board member or their spouse.[.]
(2) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy for implementing school-based
policies[decision making] in the district which shall include but not be limited to a
description of how the district's policies, including those developed pursuant to
KRS 160.340, have been amended to allow the professional staff members of a
school to be involved in the school-based policy making[decision-making] process
as they work to meet educational goals established in KRS 158.645 and 158.6451.
The policy may include a requirement that each principal[school council] make
monthly and[an] annual reports[report] at[ a] public meetings[meeting] of the
board describing the school's progress in meeting the educational goals set forth in
KRS 158.6451 and district goals established by the board. The policy shall also
address and comply with the following:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)2. of this subsection, each participating
school shall form an advisory[a school] council composed of two (2) parents,
three (3) teachers, and the principal or administrator. The membership of the
council may be increased, but it may only be increased proportionately[. A
parent representative on the council shall not be an employee or a relative of
an employee of the school in which that parent serves, nor shall the parent
representative be an employee or a relative of an employee in the district
administrative offices. A parent representative shall not be a local board
member or a board member's spouse]. None of the members shall have a
conflict of interest pursuant to KRS Chapter 45A, except the salary paid to
district employees;
Page 2 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(b) 1. The teacher representatives shall be elected for one (1) year terms by a
majority of the teachers. A teacher elected to a school advisory council
shall not be involuntarily transferred during the teacher representative's
term of office. The parent representatives shall be elected for one (1)
year terms. The parent members shall be elected by the parents of
students preregistered to attend the school during the term of office in an
election conducted by the parent and teacher organization of the school
or, if none exists, the largest organization of parents formed for this
purpose. Notification of an upcoming election for teacher or parent
representatives shall be published at least fourteen (14) days in
advance on the school's website and the school's electronic
notification and communication program. Council elections may allow
voting to occur over multiple days and via electronic means. The
principal[A school council, once elected,] may adopt a school-based
policy setting different terms of office for parent and teacher members
subsequently elected. The principal shall be the chair of the
advisory[school] council.
2. Advisory[school] councils in schools having eight percent (8%) or more
minority students enrolled, as determined by the enrollment on the
preceding October 1, shall have at least one (1) minority member. If the
advisory council formed under paragraph (a) of this subsection does not
have a minority member, the principal, in a timely manner, shall be
responsible for carrying out the following:
a. Organizing a special election to elect an additional member. The
principal shall call for nominations and shall notify the parents of
the students of the date, time, and location of the election in the
same manner as paragraph (b) of this subsection to elect a
Page 3 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
minority parent to the advisory council by ballot; and
b. Allowing the teachers in the building to select one (1) minority
teacher to serve as a teacher member on the advisory council. If
there are no minority teachers who are members of the faculty, an
additional teacher member shall be elected by a majority of all
teachers. Term limitations shall not apply for a minority teacher
member who is the only minority on faculty;
(c) 1. The principal[ school council] shall have the responsibility to set
school-based[school] policy that shall be consistent with local[district]
board policy. School-based policies[ and which] shall provide an
environment to enhance the students' achievement and help the school
meet the goals established by KRS 158.645 and 158.6451 and goals for
the district established by the board. The principal shall be the primary
administrator and the instructional leader of the school, and with the
assistance of the total school staff shall administer the policies
established or approved by[ the school council and] the local board.
2. If an advisory[a school] council establishes committees, the
principal[it] shall adopt a school-based policy to facilitate the
participation of interested persons, including, but not limited to,
classified employees and parents. The policy shall include the number of
committees, their jurisdiction, composition, and the process for
membership selection. Notification of established committees shall, at
a minimum, be published on the school's website and the school's
notification and communication program;
(d) The advisory[school] council and each of its committees shall determine the
frequency of and agenda for their meetings. Matters relating to formation of
advisory[school] councils that are not provided for by this section shall be
Page 4 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
addressed by local board policy;
(e) The meetings of the advisory[school] council shall be open to the public and
all interested persons may attend. However, the exceptions to open meetings
provided in KRS 61.810 shall apply;
(f) After receiving notification of the funds available for the school from the local
board, the advisory[school] council shall recommend to the
principal[determine], within the parameters of the total available funds, the
number of persons to be employed in each job classification at the school. The
advisory council may advise the principal regarding[make] personnel
decisions on vacancies occurring after the advisory[school] council is formed
and[but] shall not have the authority to recommend transfers or dismissals;
(g) The local superintendent shall determine which curriculum, textbooks,
instructional materials, and student support services shall be provided in the
school after consulting with the local board of education, the school principal,
and the advisory[school] council and after a reasonable review and response
period for stakeholders in accordance with local board of education policy.
Subject to available resources, the local board shall allocate an appropriation
to each school that is adequate to meet the school's needs related to
instructional materials and school-based student support services, as
determined by the school principal after consultation with the
advisory[school] council. The advisory[school] council shall consult with the
school media librarian to provide recommendations to the principal on the
maintenance of the school library media center, including the purchase of
instructional materials, information technology, and equipment;
(h) Personnel decisions at the school level shall be as follows:
1. From a list of qualified applicants submitted by the local superintendent,
the principal at the participating school shall select personnel to fill
Page 5 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
vacancies, after consultation with the advisory[school] council and
approval by the superintendent, consistent with paragraph (i)11. of this
subsection. The superintendent shall provide additional applicants to the
principal upon request when qualified applicants are available. The
superintendent may forward to the school principal the names of
qualified applicants who have pending certification from the Education
Professional Standards Board based on recent completion of preparation
requirements, out-of-state preparation, or alternative routes to
certification pursuant to KRS 161.028 and 161.048. Requests for
transfer shall conform to any employer-employee bargained contract
which is in effect;
2. If the vacancy to be filled is the position of principal:
a. The superintendent shall fill the vacancy after consultation with
the advisory[school] council consistent with paragraph (i)11. of
this subsection;
b. Prior to consultation with the advisory[school] council, each
member shall sign a nondisclosure agreement forbidding the
disclosure of information shared and discussions held during
consultation;
c. A person who believes a violation of the nondisclosure agreement
referred to in subdivision b. of this subparagraph has occurred may
file a written complaint with the Kentucky Board of Education;
and
d. A advisory[school] council member found to have violated the
nondisclosure agreement referred to in subdivision b. of this
subparagraph may be subject to removal from the advisory[school]
council by the Kentucky Board of Education under subsection
Page 6 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(8)(e)[(9)(e)] of this section;
3. Notwithstanding subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, if the vacancy to be
filled is the position of principal in a county school district in a county
with a consolidated local government adopted under KRS Chapter 67C,
then:
a. The outgoing principal shall not serve on the advisory council
during the principal selection process. The superintendent or the
superintendent's designee shall serve as the chair of the advisory
council for the purpose of the hiring process and shall not have
voting rights during the selection process;
b. The advisory council shall have access to the applications of all
persons certified for the position. The advisory council[principal]
shall nominate a candidate for the position of principal to be
provided to the superintendent[be elected on a majority vote of
the membership of the council]. The advisory[school] council shall
receive training in recruitment and interviewing techniques prior
to carrying out the process of nominating[selecting] a principal
candidate. The superintendent[council] shall select the trainer to
deliver the training; and
c. [Notwithstanding the requirement that a principal be elected by a
majority vote of the council, ]The selection of a principal shall be
made[ subject to approval] by the superintendent after receiving a
nomination from the advisory council[. If the superintendent does
not approve the principal selected by the council, then the
superintendent may select the principal];
4. No principal who has been previously removed from a position in the
district for cause may be considered for appointment as principal in that
Page 7 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
district;
5. [Personnel decisions made at the school level under the authority of
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be binding on the superintendent
who completes the hiring process;
6. ]Applicants subsequently employed shall provide evidence that they are
certified prior to assuming the duties of a position in accordance with
KRS 161.020; and
6.[7.] Notwithstanding other provisions of this paragraph, if the applicant is
the spouse of the superintendent and the applicant meets the service
requirements of KRS 160.380(3)(a), the applicant shall only be
employed upon the recommendation of the principal and the approval of
the local board[a majority vote of the school council];
(i) The principal[school council] shall adopt a school-based policy that shall be
consistent with local board policy and shall be implemented[ by the principal]
in the following additional areas:
1. Curriculum responsibilities under KRS 158.6453(19);
2. Assignment of all instructional and noninstructional staff time;
3. Assignment of students to classes and programs within the school;
4. Determination of the schedule of the school day and week, subject to the
beginning and ending times of the school day and school calendar year
as established by the local board;
5. Determination of use of school space during the school day related to
improving classroom teaching and learning;
6. Planning and resolution of issues regarding instructional practices;
7. Selection and implementation of discipline and classroom management
techniques as a part of a comprehensive school safety plan, including
responsibilities of the student, parent, teacher, counselor, and principal;
Page 8 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
8. Selection of extracurricular programs and determination of policies
relating to student participation based on academic qualifications and
attendance requirements, program evaluation, and supervision;
9. Adoption of an emergency plan as required in KRS 158.162;
10. Procedures, consistent with local school board policy, for determining
alignment with state standards, technology utilization, and program
appraisal; and
11. Procedures to assist the advisory council with making a nomination to
the superintendent for[consultation in] the selection of the principal by
the superintendent, and the selection of personnel by the principal and
approval by the superintendent, including but not limited to meetings,
timelines, interviews, review of written applications, and review of
references. Procedures shall address situations in which members of the
advisory council are not available for consultation; and
(j) Each principal, in consultation with the advisory[school] council, shall
annually review data as shown on state and local student assessments required
under KRS 158.6453. The data shall include but not be limited to information
on performance levels of all students tested, and information on the
performance of students disaggregated by race, gender, disability, and
participation in the federal free and reduced price lunch program. After
completing the review of data, each principal[school council], with the
involvement of the advisory council and other interested parents, faculty, and
staff, shall develop and adopt a plan to ensure that each student makes
progress toward meeting the goals set forth in KRS 158.645 and
158.6451(1)(b) by April 1 of each year and submit the plan to the
superintendent and local board of education for review as described in KRS
160.340. The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide each
Page 9 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
principal[ school council] the data needed to complete the review required by
this paragraph no later than October 1 of each year.[ If a school does not have
a council, the review shall be completed by the principal with the involvement
of parents, faculty, and staff.]
(3) The policies adopted by the local board to implement school-based
policies[decision making] shall also address the following:
(a) School budget and administration, including: discretionary funds; activity and
other school funds; funds for maintenance, supplies, and equipment; and
procedures for authorizing reimbursement for training and other expenses;
(b) Assessment of individual student progress, including testing and reporting of
student progress to students, parents, the school district, the community, and
the state;
(c) School improvement plans, including the form and function of strategic
planning and its relationship to district planning, as well as the school safety
plan and requests for funding from the Center for School Safety under KRS
158.446;
(d) Professional development plans developed pursuant to KRS 156.095;
(e) Parent, citizen, and community participation including the relationship of the
advisory council with other groups;
(f) Cooperation and collaboration within the district, with other districts, and with
other public and private agencies;
(g) Requirements for waiver of district policies;
(h) Requirements for record keeping by the advisory[school] council and
principal; and
(i) A process for appealing a decision made by a principal[school council].
(4) (a) All school-based policies shall be reviewed and approved by the local board
before implementation. A school-based policy:
Page 10 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
1. That requires expedited action may be implemented before approval
and shall be reviewed and approved by the local board within sixty
(60) days of submission. If the policy is not approved within the
established timeframe, the policy shall be nullified; and
2. May be repealed by the school's principal or the board at any time and
the repeal shall include a statement of justification.
(b) In addition to the authority granted to the principal[school council] in this
section, the local board may grant to the principal[school council] any other
authority permitted by law. The board shall make available liability insurance
coverage for the protection of all members of the advisory[school] council
from liability arising in the course of pursuing their duties as members of the
advisory council.
(5) All schools shall implement school-based policy[decision making] in accordance
with this section and with the policy adopted by the local board pursuant to this
section. Upon favorable vote of a majority of the faculty at the school and a
majority of at least twenty-five (25) voting parents of students enrolled in the
school, a school meeting its goal as determined by the Department of Education
pursuant to KRS 158.6455 may apply to the Kentucky Board of Education for
exemption from the requirement to implement an advisory council[school-based
decision making], and the state board shall grant the exemption. The voting by the
parents on the matter of exemption from implementing an advisory council[school-
based decision making] shall be in an election conducted by the parent and teacher
organization of the school or, if none exists, the largest organization of parents
formed for this purpose. Notification of the election shall be published at least
fourteen (14) days in advance on the school's website and the school's
notification and communication program. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
section, a local school district shall not be required to implement an advisory
Page 11 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
council[school-based decision making] if the local school district contains only one
(1) school.
(6) The Department of Education shall provide professional development activities to
assist schools in implementing an advisory council[school-based decision making].
Advisory[school] council members elected for the first time shall complete a
minimum of six (6) clock hours of training in the process of school-based
policy[decision] making, no later than thirty (30) days after the beginning of the
service year for which they are elected to serve. Advisory[school] council members
who have served on an advisory[a school] council at least one (1) year shall
complete a minimum of three (3) clock hours of training in the process of school-
based policy[decision] making no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the
beginning of the service year for which they are elected to serve. Experienced
members may participate in the training for new members to fulfill their training
requirement. Advisory[school] council training required under this subsection shall
be conducted by trainers endorsed by the Department of Education. By November 1
of each year, the principal through the local superintendent shall forward to the
Department of Education the names and addresses of each advisory council
member and verify that the required training has been completed. Advisory[school]
council members elected to fill a vacancy shall complete the applicable training
within thirty (30) days of their election.
(7) [A school that chooses to have school-based decision making but would like to be
exempt from the administrative structure set forth by this section may develop a
model for implementing school-based decision making, including but not limited to
a description of the membership, organization, duties, and responsibilities of a
school council. The school shall submit the model through the local board of
education to the commissioner of education and the Kentucky Board of Education,
which shall have final authority for approval. The application for approval of the
Page 12 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
model shall show evidence that it has been developed by representatives of the
parents, students, certified personnel, and the administrators of the school and that
two-thirds (2/3) of the faculty have agreed to the model.
(8) ]The Kentucky Board of Education, upon recommendation of the commissioner of
education, shall adopt by administrative regulation a formula by which school
district funds shall be allocated to each principal[school council]. Included in the[
school council] formula shall be an allocation for professional development that is
at least sixty-five percent (65%) of the district's per pupil state allocation for
professional development for each student in average daily attendance in the school.
The principal[school council] shall plan professional development in compliance
with requirements specified in KRS 156.095, except as provided in KRS 158.649.
Principals[School councils] of small schools shall be encouraged to work with
other principals[school councils] to maximize professional development
opportunities.
(8)[(9)] (a) No board member, superintendent of schools, district employee, or
member of an advisory[a school] council shall intentionally engage in a
pattern of practice which is detrimental to the successful implementation of or
circumvents the intent of school-based policies[decision making] to allow the
professional staff members of a school and parents to be involved in the
school-based policy[decision making] process in working toward meeting the
educational goals established in KRS 158.645 and 158.6451 or to
advise[make decisions] in areas of policy assigned to a principal[school
council] pursuant to paragraph (i) of subsection (2) of this section.
(b) An affected party who believes a violation of this subsection has occurred
may file a written complaint with the Office of Education Accountability. The
office shall investigate the complaint and resolve the conflict, if possible, or
forward the matter to the Kentucky Board of Education.
Page 13 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall conduct a hearing in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B for complaints referred by the Office of Education
Accountability.
(d) If the state board determines a violation has occurred, the party shall be
subject to reprimand. A second violation of this subsection may be grounds
for removing a superintendent or a member of an advisory[a school] council
from office or grounds for dismissal of an employee for misconduct in office
or willful neglect of duty.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (d) of this subsection and KRS 7.410(2)(c), if the
state board determines a violation of the nondisclosure agreement required by
subsection (2)(h)2.b. of this section by an advisory[a school] council member
has occurred, the state board shall remove the member from the
advisory[school] council, and the member shall be permanently prohibited
from serving on any advisory[school] council in the district.
(9)[(10)] Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (8)[(9)] of this section, a school's right to
establish or maintain an advisory[a school-based decision making] council[ and the
powers, duties, and authority granted to a school council] may be rescinded[ or the
school council's role may be advisory] if the commissioner of education or the
Kentucky Board of Education takes action under KRS 160.346.
(10)[(11)] Each principal[school council] of a school containing grades K-5 or any
combination thereof[, or if there is no school council, the principal,] shall develop
and implement a wellness policy that includes moderate to vigorous physical
activity each day and encourages healthy choices among students. The policy may
permit physical activity to be considered part of the instructional day, not to exceed
thirty (30) minutes per day, or one hundred and fifty (150) minutes per week.[ Each
school council, or if there is no school council,] The principal[,] shall adopt an
assessment tool to determine each child's level of physical activity on an annual
Page 14 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
basis. The[ council or] principal may utilize an existing assessment program. The
Kentucky Department of Education shall make available a list of available
resources to carry out the provisions of this subsection. The department shall report
to the Legislative Research Commission no later than November 1 of each year on
how the schools are providing physical activity under this subsection and on the
types of physical activity being provided. The policy developed by the[ school
council or] principal shall comply with provisions required by federal law, state
law, or local board policy.
Section 2. KRS 160.370 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent shall be the executive agent of the board that appoints him or
her and shall meet with the board, except when his or her own tenure, salary, or the
administration of his or her office is under consideration. As executive officer of the
board, the superintendent shall see that the laws relating to the schools, the bylaws,
rules, and regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education, and the regulations and
policies of the district board of education are carried into effect. He or she may
administer the oath required by the board of education to any teacher or other
person. He or she shall be the professional adviser of the board in all matters. He or
she shall prepare, under the direction of the board, all rules, regulations, bylaws,
and statements of policy for approval and adoption by the board. He or she shall
have general supervision, subject to the control of the board of education, of the
general conduct of the schools, the course of instruction, the discipline of pupils,
and the management of business affairs. He or she shall be responsible for the
hiring and dismissal of all personnel in the district.
(2) For a county school district in a county with more than fifteen thousand (15,000)
students[ a consolidated local government adopted under KRS Chapter 67C]:
(a) A local board of education shall:
1. Delegate authority to the superintendent over the district's day-to-day
Page 15 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
operations and implementation of the board-approved strategic plan in a
manner that promotes the efficient, timely operation of the district,
including but not limited to the authority over contracts related to daily
operations of the district, pupil transportation, personnel matters, and the
organizational structure of administrative staff;
2. Except as expressly required by statute, including subparagraphs 3. and
5. of this paragraph, not meet more than once every four (4) weeks for
the purpose of approving necessary administrative matters;
3. By December 1 each year, approve a rolling three (3) year strategic plan
for the district that outlines student achievement goals, faculty and staff
improvement goals, facility and infrastructure improvement, and other
key objectives that the superintendent and board believe are in the best
interest of student outcomes and the community;
4. Approve an annual budget for the district, which shall include any
budgetary decisions relevant to the district's ability to obtain necessary
revenue, including tax revenue, in accordance with the requirements of
state law and regulation;
5. By November 1 each year, oversee:
a. An annual audit of the financial dealings of the district and the
reporting of key financial performance data in order to ensure fair
and accurate reporting to the board; and
b. An annual review of student performance in the district and the
reporting of key student performance data to ensure compliance
with state and federal law and accurate reporting to the board;
6. Recruit and hire the superintendent and negotiate the terms of
employment and compensation of a prospective superintendent;
7. Complete an annual review of the superintendent's performance with
Page 16 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
regard to the duties assigned in subsection (1) of this section and
paragraph (b) of this subsection;[ and]
8. Be responsible for the dismissal of the superintendent; and
9. Have the right to delegate the authority to review and approve school-
based policy in accordance with subsection (4) of Section 1 of this Act;
(b) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary[ in subsection (1) of this
section], the superintendent shall:
1. Provide a quarterly, informational report to the board on the
administrative actions taken by the superintendent to carry out the
district's daily operations and implementation of the strategic plan as
well as a budget to actual financial update;
2. Prepare all rules, regulations, bylaws, and statements of policy for
approval and adoption by the board, with approval not to be withheld
without a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board to deny approval or
adoption;
3. Supervise the general conduct of the schools, the course of instruction,
the discipline of pupils, the employment matters of all employees and
contractors, and the management of business affairs of the district;
4. Be responsible for the hiring, employment terms, dismissal, and
organizational structure of all personnel in the district in compliance
with all laws and in a manner that best serves the students of the district;
and
5. Notwithstanding any law that assigns an administrative duty,
responsibility, or authority to a board of education, or other law to the
contrary, be responsible for any administrative duty not explicitly
granted to the board under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) If the county adopts the provisions of the Kentucky Model Procurement Code,
Page 17 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
the board shall authorize the superintendent to approve purchases, in
accordance with small purchase procedures adopted by the board, for any
contract for which a determination is made that the aggregate amount of the
contract does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). The
board shall authorize the superintendent to approve a line-item transfer within
its annual budget as she or he deems necessary, provided that the aggregate
amount of any individual transfer does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000). The superintendent shall provide a quarterly report to the
board on any purchases made under this subsection.
Section 3. KRS 160.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administrative finding of child abuse or neglect" means a substantiated
finding of child abuse or neglect issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services that is:
1. Not appealed through an administrative hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
2. Upheld at an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B and not appealed to a Circuit Court; or
3. Upheld by a Circuit Court in an appeal of the results of an
administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) "Alternative education program" means a program that exists to meet the
needs of students that cannot be addressed in a traditional classroom setting
but through the assignment of students to alternative classrooms, centers, or
campuses that are designed to remediate academic performance, improve
behavior, or provide an enhanced learning experience. Alternative education
programs do not include career or technical centers or departments;
(c) "Clear CA/N check" means a letter from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Page 18 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
Services indicating that there are no administrative findings of child abuse or
neglect relating to a specific individual;
(d) "Relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son and
daughter; and
(e) "Vacancy" means any certified position opening created by the resignation,
dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or death of a certified staff
member of a local school district, or a new position created in a local school
district for which certification is required. However, if an employer-employee
bargained contract contains procedures for filling certified position openings
created by the resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or
death of a certified staff member, or creation of a new position for which
certification is required, a vacancy shall not exist, unless certified positions
remain open after compliance with those procedures.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 160.346, the school district personnel actions identified
in this section shall be carried out as follows:
(a) All appointments, promotions, and transfers of principals, supervisors,
teachers, and other public school employees shall be made only by the
superintendent of schools, who shall notify the board of the action taken. All
employees of the local district shall have the qualifications prescribed by law
and by the administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education and
of the employing board. Supervisors, principals, teachers, and other
employees may be appointed by the superintendent for any school year at any
time after February 1 preceding the beginning of the school year. No
superintendent of schools shall appoint or transfer himself or herself to
another position within the school district;
(b) When a vacancy occurs in a local school district, the superintendent shall
submit the job posting to the statewide job posting system described in KRS
Page 19 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
160.152 fifteen (15) days before the position shall be filled. The local school
district shall post position openings in the local board office for public
viewing;
(c) When a vacancy needs to be filled in less than fifteen (15) days' time to
prevent disruption of necessary instructional or support services of the school
district, the superintendent may seek a waiver from the chief state school
officer outside of the process established in KRS 156.161. If the waiver is
approved, the appointment shall not be made until the person recommended
for the position has been approved by the chief state school officer. The chief
state school officer shall respond to a district's request for waiver or for
approval of an appointment within two (2) working days; and
(d) When a vacancy occurs in a local district, the superintendent shall conduct a
search to locate minority teachers to be considered for the position. The
superintendent shall, pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky
Board of Education, report annually the district's recruitment process and the
activities used to increase the percentage of minority teachers in the district.
(3) Restrictions on employment of relatives shall be as follows:
(a) No relative of a superintendent of schools shall be an employee of the school
district. However, this shall not apply to a relative who is a classified or
certified employee of the school district for at least thirty-six (36) months
prior to the superintendent assuming office and who is qualified for the
position the employee holds. A superintendent's spouse who has previously
been employed in a school system may be an employee of the school district.
A superintendent's spouse who is employed under this provision shall not hold
a position in which the spouse supervises certified or classified employees. A
superintendent's spouse may supervise teacher aides and student teachers.
However, the superintendent shall not promote a relative who continues
Page 20 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
employment under an exception of this subsection;
(b) No superintendent shall employ a relative of a school board member of the
district;
(c) No principal's relative shall be employed in the principal's school; and
(d) A relative that is ineligible for employment under paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection may be employed as a substitute for a certified or classified
employee if the relative is not:
1. A regular full-time or part-time employee of the district;
2. Accruing continuing contract status or any other right to continuous
employment;
3. Receiving fringe benefits other than those provided other substitutes; or
4. Receiving preference in employment or assignment over other
substitutes.
(4) No superintendent shall assign a certified or classified staff person to an alternative
education program as part of any disciplinary action taken pursuant to KRS 161.011
or 161.790 as part of a corrective action plan established pursuant to the local
district evaluation plan.
(5) No superintendent shall employ in any position in the district any person who:
(a) Has been convicted of an offense that would classify a person as a violent
offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) Has been convicted of a sex crime as defined by KRS 17.500 or a
misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510;
(c) Is required to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.500 to 17.580; or
(d) Has an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained
by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(6) Requirements for background checks shall be as follows:
(a) A superintendent shall require the following individuals to submit to a
Page 21 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
national and state criminal background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual:
1. Each new certified or classified hire;
2. A nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant as defined under KRS
161.185;
3. A student teacher;
4. An advisory[A school-based decision making] council parent member;
and
5. Any adult who is permitted access to school grounds on a regularly
scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a written agreement for the
purpose of providing services directly to a student or students as part of
a school-sponsored program or activity;
(b) 1. The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to:
a. Classified and certified individuals employed by the school district
prior to June 27, 2019;
b. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified
position in a Kentucky school district within six (6) months of the
date of hire and who had previously submitted to a national and
state criminal background check and who have a clear CA/N check
for the previous employment; or
c. Student teachers who have submitted to and provide a copy of a
national and state criminal background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
through an accredited teacher education institution in which the
student teacher is enrolled and who have a clear CA/N check.
2. The Education Professional Standards Board may promulgate
Page 22 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
administrative regulations to impose additional qualifications to meet
the requirements of Pub. L. No. 92-544;
(c) A parent member may serve prior to the receipt of the criminal history
background check and CA/N letter required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection but shall be removed from the advisory council on receipt by the
school district of a report documenting a record of abuse or neglect, or a sex
crime or criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in KRS
17.500, or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, and no further
procedures shall be required;
(d) A superintendent may require a volunteer or a visitor to submit to a national
and state criminal history background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual; and
(e) The superintendent of a school district operating under an alternative
transportation plan approved by the Kentucky Department of Education in
accordance with KRS 156.153(3) shall require the driver of any non-school
bus passenger vehicle authorized to transport students to and from school
pursuant to the alternative transportation plan who does not have a valid
commercial driver's license issued in accordance with KRS Chapter 281A
with an "S" endorsement to:
1. Submit to a national and state criminal background check by the
Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation at least once every three (3) years and a criminal records
check conducted in accordance with KRS 27A.090 in all other years;
2. Submit to drug testing consistent with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt.
40;
3. Provide a biannual driving history record check performed by the
Page 23 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
Transportation Cabinet;
4. Provide an annual clear CA/N check;
5. Immediately notify the superintendent of any conviction for a violation
under KRS Chapter 189 for which penalty points are assessed; and
6. Immediately notify the superintendent of any citation or arrest for a
violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 189A. The superintendent
shall inform the Kentucky Department of Education of the notification.
(7) (a) If a certified or classified position remains unfilled after July 31 or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a superintendent may employ an
individual, who will have supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors,
on probationary status pending receipt of the criminal history background
check and a clear CA/N check, provided by the individual. Application for the
criminal record and a request for a clear CA/N check of a probationary
employee shall be made no later than the date probationary employment
begins.
(b) Employment shall be contingent on the receipt of the criminal history
background check documenting that the probationary employee has no record
of a sex crime nor as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and receipt
of a letter, provided by the individual, from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services stating the employee is clear to hire based on no administrative
findings of child abuse or neglect found through a background check of child
abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 161.720 to 161.800 or any other statute to the contrary,
probationary employment under this section shall terminate on receipt by the
school district of a criminal history background check documenting a record
of a sex crime or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and no
Page 24 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
further procedures shall be required.
(8) The provisions of KRS 161.790 shall apply to terminate employment of a certified
employee on the basis of a criminal record other than a record of a sex crime or as a
violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, or on the basis of a CA/N check
showing an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect.
(9) (a) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
from the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal
background check is conducted. The results of the state and federal criminal
background check shall be sent to the hiring superintendent. Any fee charged
by the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
(b) Each application form, provided by the employer to an applicant for a
certified or classified position, shall conspicuously state the following: "FOR
THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL
AND STATE CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES."
(c) Each application form for a district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Identify the states in which he or she has maintained residency,
Page 25 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
including the dates of residency; and
2. Provide picture identification.
(10) Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary,
when an employee of the school district is charged with any offense which is
classified as a felony, the superintendent may transfer the employee to a second
position until such time as the employee is found not guilty, the charges are
dismissed, the employee is terminated, or the superintendent determines that further
personnel action is not required. The employee shall continue to be paid at the same
rate of pay he or she received prior to the transfer. If an employee is charged with
an offense outside of the Commonwealth, this provision may also be applied if the
charge would have been treated as a felony if committed within the
Commonwealth. Transfers shall be made to prevent disruption of the educational
process and district operations and in the interest of students and staff and shall not
be construed as evidence of misconduct.
(11) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each certified and classified employee of
the school district shall notify the superintendent if he or she has been found by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services to have abused or neglected a child, and if
he or she has waived the right to appeal a substantiated finding of child abuse or
neglect or if the substantiated incident was upheld upon appeal. Any failure to
report this finding shall result in the certified or classified employee being subject
to dismissal or termination.
(12) The form for requesting a CA/N check shall be made available on the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services website.
Section 4. KRS 7.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide an efficient system of common
schools which shall be operated without waste, duplication, mismanagement, and
political influence. The system of schools shall have the goal of providing all
Page 26 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
students with at least the seven (7) capacities referred to in KRS 158.645.
(2) (a) An Office of Education Accountability is hereby created and shall be under
the direction of the Legislative Research Commission and shall be advised
and monitored by the Education Assessment and Accountability Review
Subcommittee.
(b) The Office of Education Accountability shall be administered by a deputy
director appointed by the Legislative Research Commission upon
recommendation of the director of the Legislative Research Commission. The
deputy director shall have the qualifications set by the Commission. The
salary of the deputy director shall be set by the Commission. The Commission
shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the employment of personnel necessary
to carry out the provisions of this section. The deputy director shall be subject
to the direction of and report to the director of the Legislative Research
Commission.
(c) The Office of Education Accountability shall have the following duties and
responsibilities:
1. Monitor the elementary and secondary public education system,
including actions taken and reports issued by the Kentucky Board of
Education, the Education Professional Standards Board, the
commissioner of education, the Department of Education, and local
school districts. Upon and under the direction of the Education
Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee, the monitoring
of the elementary and secondary public education system shall also
include periodic reviews of local district and school-based[ decision
making] policies relating to the recruitment, interviewing, selection,
evaluation, termination, or promotion of personnel. The office shall
report any district or school when evidence demonstrates a pattern of
Page 27 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
exclusionary personnel practices relating to race or sex to the Kentucky
Department of Education, which shall then independently investigate
facts raised in or associated with the report. The results of the
investigation conducted by the department shall be forwarded to the
Kentucky Board of Education which shall conduct an investigative
hearing on the matter.
2. Upon and under the direction of the Education Assessment and
Accountability Review Subcommittee, review the elementary and
secondary public education finance system. The review shall include an
analysis of the level of equity achieved by the funding system and
whether adequate funds are available to all school districts and an
analysis of the weights of various education program components
developed by the Department of Education. The review may also
include recommendations for the base per pupil funding for the Support
Education Excellence in Kentucky Program and a statewide salary
schedule, and studies of other finance issues identified by the Education
Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee.
3. Upon and under the direction of the Education Assessment and
Accountability Review Subcommittee, verify the accuracy of reports of
school, district, and state performance by conducting, requesting, or
upon approval of the Legislative Research Commission, contracting for
periodic program and fiscal audits. Upon and under the direction of the
Education Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee, the
Office of Education Accountability shall monitor and verify the
accuracy of reports of the Department of Education and the Kentucky
Board of Education, including but not limited to the annual fiscal
conditions of grants, categorical programs, and other educational
Page 28 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
initiatives set forth by the General Assembly.
4. Investigate allegations of wrongdoing of any person or agency,
including but not limited to waste, duplication, mismanagement,
political influence, and illegal activity at the state, regional, or school
district level; make appropriate referrals to other agencies with
jurisdiction over those allegations; and make recommendations for
legislative action to the Education Assessment and Accountability
Review Subcommittee. Upon acceptance by the subcommittee,
recommendations for legislative action shall be forwarded to the
Legislative Research Commission. The Office of Education
Accountability shall submit to the subcommittee, for each of its regular
meetings, a report that summarizes investigative activity initiated
pursuant to this subparagraph. The subcommittee may consider each
report as it determines and in its discretion. Each report, and the
consideration thereof by the subcommittee, shall be exempt from the
open records and open meetings requirements contained in KRS Chapter
61.
5. Upon and under the direction of the Education Assessment and
Accountability Review Subcommittee, conduct studies, analyze, verify,
and validate the state assessment program through other external
indicators of academic progress including but not limited to American
College Test scores, Scholastic Assessment Test scores, National
Assessment of Educational Progress scores, Preliminary Scholastic
Assessment Test scores, Advanced Placement Program participation,
standardized test scores, college remediation rates, retention and
attendance rates, dropout rates, and additional available data on the
efficiency of the system of schools and whether progress is being made
Page 29 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
toward attaining the goal of providing students with the seven (7)
capacities as required by KRS 158.645.
6. Make periodic reports to the Education Assessment and Accountability
Review Subcommittee as directed by the subcommittee. Upon
acceptance by the subcommittee, the reports shall be forwarded to the
Legislative Research Commission.
7. Make periodic reports to the Legislative Research Commission as may
be directed by the Commission.
8. Prepare an annual report, which shall consist of a summary of the status
and results of the current year annual research agenda provided in
paragraph (d) of this subsection, a summary of completed investigative
activity conducted pursuant to subparagraph 4. of this paragraph, and
other items of significance as determined by the Education Assessment
and Accountability Review Subcommittee. The annual report shall be
submitted to the Education Assessment and Accountability Review
Subcommittee. Upon acceptance by the subcommittee, the annual report
shall be submitted to the Governor, the Legislative Research
Commission, and the Kentucky Board of Education.
(d) On or before December 1 of each calendar year, the Education Assessment
and Accountability Review Subcommittee shall adopt the annual research
agenda for the Office of Education Accountability. The annual research
agenda may include studies, research, and investigations considered to be
significant by the Education Assessment and Accountability Review
Subcommittee. Staff of the Office of Education Accountability shall prepare a
suggested list of study and research topics related to elementary and
secondary public education for consideration by the Education Assessment
and Accountability Review Subcommittee in the development of the annual
Page 30 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
research agenda. An adopted annual research agenda shall be amended to
include any studies mandated by the next succeeding General Assembly for
completion by the Office of Education Accountability.
(e) The Office of Education Accountability shall have access to all public records
and information on oath as provided in KRS 7.110. The office shall also have
access to otherwise confidential records, meetings, and hearings regarding
local school district personnel matters. However, the office shall not disclose
any information contained in or derived from the records, meetings, and
hearings that would enable the discovery of the specific identification of any
individual who is the focus or subject of the personnel matter.
(f) In compliance with KRS 48.800, 48.950, and 48.955, the Finance and
Administration Cabinet and the Governor's Office for Policy and Management
shall provide to the Office of Education Accountability access to all
information and records, other than preliminary work papers, relating to
allotment of funds, whether by usual allotment or by other means, to the
Department of Education, local school districts, and to other recipients of
funds for educational purposes.
(g) Any state agency receiving a complaint or information which, if accurate,
may identify a violation of the Kentucky Education Reform Act of 1990, 1990
Ky. Acts ch. 476, shall notify the office of the complaint or information.
(h) The Office of Education Accountability may contract for services as approved
by the Legislative Research Commission pursuant to KRS 7.090(8).
(3) The provisions of KRS 61.878 or any other statute, including Acts of the 1992
Regular Session of the General Assembly to the contrary notwithstanding, the
testimony of investigators, work products, and records of the Office of Education
Accountability relating to duties and responsibilities under subsection (2) of this
section shall be privileged and confidential during the course of an ongoing
Page 31 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
investigation or until authorized, released, or otherwise made public by the Office
of Education Accountability and shall not be subject to discovery, disclosure, or
production upon the order or subpoena of a court or other agency with subpoena
power.
Section 5. KRS 156.072 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At the request of a local board of education or a school principal[council], a local
school district superintendent shall submit a request to the Kentucky Board of
Education for a waiver from a reporting requirement established by a Kentucky
Revised Statute that requires the paperwork to be submitted to the Kentucky Board
of Education or the Department of Education.
(2) Upon a finding of good cause for the waiver, the Kentucky Board of Education may
grant the waiver.
(3) The Kentucky Board of Education shall not waive statutory paperwork or reporting
requirements necessary under federal law or relating to health, safety, or civil
rights.
Section 6. KRS 156.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education shall establish, direct, and maintain a
statewide program of professional development to improve instruction in the
public schools.
(b) By August 1, 2025, the department shall create a four (4) year recurring
professional development training schedule that includes all professional
development for certified personnel required by subsection (2) of this section
and federal law.
(c) Each local school district shall implement the professional development
training schedule created by the department.
(2) All certified school district employees and public charter school employees shall
complete at least one (1) hour of each of the following trainings within twelve (12)
Page 32 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
months of initial hire and at least once every four (4) years thereafter:
(a) How to respond to an active shooter situation training prepared by the
Department of Criminal Justice Training in collaboration with the department,
the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, and the Center for School Safety;
(b) Child abuse and neglect prevention, recognition, and reporting training from
the list of trainings approved by the department in accordance with subsection
(7) of this section;
(c) 1. High-quality, evidence-based suicide prevention training, including risk
factors, warning signs, protective factors, response procedures, referral,
postvention, and the recognition of signs and symptoms of possible
mental illness.
2. As used in this paragraph, "postvention" means a series of planned
supports and interventions with persons affected by a suicide for the
purpose of facilitating the grieving or adjustment process, stabilizing the
environment, reducing the risk of negative behaviors, and limiting the
risk of further suicides through contagion; and
(d) Self-study review of seizure disorder materials.
(3) (a) Each local school district superintendent shall appoint a certified school
employee to fulfill the role and responsibilities of a professional development
coordinator who shall disseminate professional development information to
schools and personnel. Upon request by a school principal[council] or any
employees of the district, the coordinator shall provide technical assistance to
the principal[council] or the personnel that may include assisting with needs
assessments, analyzing school data, planning and evaluation assistance,
organizing districtwide programs requested by school principals[councils] or
groups of teachers, or other coordination activities.
(b) The manner of appointment, qualifications, and other duties of the
Page 33 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
professional development coordinator shall be established by the local board
of education.
(c) The local district professional development coordinator may participate in the
Kentucky Department of Education annual training program for local school
district professional development coordinators. The training program may
include but not be limited to the demonstration of various approaches to needs
assessment and planning; strategies for implementing long-term, school-based
professional development; strategies for strengthening teachers' roles in the
planning, development, and evaluation of professional development; and
demonstrations of model professional development programs. The training
shall include information about teacher learning opportunities relating to the
core content standards. The department shall regularly collect and distribute
this information.
(4) The department shall provide or facilitate optional, professional development
programs for certified personnel throughout the Commonwealth that are based on
the statewide needs of teachers, administrators, and other education personnel.
Programs may include classified staff and parents when appropriate. Programs
offered or facilitated by the department shall be at locations and times convenient to
local school personnel and shall be made accessible through the use of technology
when appropriate. They shall include programs that: address the goals for Kentucky
schools as stated in KRS 158.6451, including reducing the achievement gaps as
determined by an equity analysis of the disaggregated student performance data
from the state assessment program developed under KRS 158.6453; engage
educators in effective learning processes and foster collegiality and collaboration;
and provide support for staff to incorporate newly acquired skills into their work
through practicing the skills, gathering information about the results, and reflecting
on their efforts. Professional development programs shall be made available to
Page 34 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
teachers based on their needs which shall include but not be limited to the following
areas:
(a) Strategies to reduce the achievement gaps among various groups of students
and to provide continuous progress;
(b) Curriculum content and methods of instruction for each content area,
including differentiated instruction;
(c) School-based policy[decision] making;
(d) Assessment literacy;
(e) Integration of performance-based student assessment into daily classroom
instruction;
(f) Nongraded primary programs;
(g) Research-based instructional practices;
(h) Instructional uses of technology;
(i) Curriculum design to serve the needs of students with diverse learning styles
and skills and of students of diverse cultures;
(j) Instruction in reading, including phonics, phonemic awareness,
comprehension, fluency, and vocabulary;
(k) Educational leadership; and
(l) Strategies to incorporate character education throughout the curriculum.
(5) The department shall assist school personnel in assessing the impact of professional
development on their instructional practices and student learning.
(6) (a) Upon the request of a school district or school principal[council], the
department shall assist with the development of long-term school and district
improvement plans that include multiple strategies for professional
development based on the assessment of needs at the school level.
(b) Professional development strategies may include but are not limited to
participation in subject matter academies, teacher networks, training institutes,
Page 35 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
workshops, seminars, and study groups; collegial planning; action research;
mentoring programs; appropriate university courses; and other forms of
professional development.
(c) In planning the use of the four (4) days for professional development under
KRS 158.070, school principals[councils] and districts shall give priority to
programs that increase teachers' understanding of curriculum content and
methods of instruction appropriate for each content area based on individual
school plans. The district may use up to one (1) day to provide district-wide
training and training that is mandated by state or federal law. Only those
employees identified in the mandate or affected by the mandate shall be
required to attend the training.
(d) State funds allocated for professional development shall be used to support
professional development initiatives that are consistent with local school
improvement and professional development plans and teachers' individual
growth plans. The funds may be used throughout the year for all staff,
including classified and certified staff and parents on advisory[school]
councils or committees. A portion of the funds allocated to each
advisory[school] council under KRS 160.345 may be used to prepare or
enhance the teachers' knowledge and teaching practices related to the content
and subject matter that are required for their specific classroom assignments.
(7) (a) The department shall develop and maintain a list of approved comprehensive
evidence-informed trainings on child abuse and neglect prevention,
recognition, and reporting that encompass child physical, sexual, and
emotional abuse and neglect.
(b) The trainings shall be web-based or in-person and cover, at a minimum, the
following topics:
1. Recognizing child physical, sexual, and emotional abuse and neglect;
Page 36 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
2. Reporting suspected child abuse and neglect in Kentucky as required by
KRS 620.030 and the appropriate documentation;
3. Responding to the child; and
4. Understanding the response of child protective services.
(c) The trainings shall include a questionnaire or other basic assessment tool upon
completion to document basic knowledge of training components.
(d) Each local board of education shall adopt one (1) or more trainings from the
list approved by the department to be implemented by schools.
(8) The department shall establish an electronic consumer bulletin board that posts
information regarding professional development providers and programs as a
service to school district central office personnel, advisory[school] councils,
teachers, and administrators. Participation on the electronic consumer bulletin board
shall be voluntary for professional development providers or vendors, but shall
include all programs sponsored by the department. Participants shall provide the
following information: program title; name of provider or vendor; qualifications of
the presenters or instructors; objectives of the program; program length; services
provided, including follow-up support; costs for participation and costs of
materials; names of previous users of the program, addresses, and telephone
numbers; and arrangements required. Posting information on the bulletin board by
the department shall not be viewed as an endorsement of the quality of any specific
provider or program.
(9) The department shall provide voluntary training to address the characteristics and
instructional needs of students at risk of school failure and most likely to drop out
of school. The training shall be developed to meet the specific needs of all certified
and classified personnel depending on their relationship with these students. The
training for instructional personnel shall be designed to provide and enhance skills
of personnel to:
Page 37 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(a) Identify at-risk students early in elementary schools as well as at-risk and
potential dropouts in the middle and high schools;
(b) Plan specific instructional strategies to teach at-risk students;
(c) Improve the academic achievement of students at risk of school failure by
providing individualized and extra instructional support to increase
expectations for targeted students;
(d) Involve parents as partners in ways to help their children and to improve their
children's academic progress; and
(e) Significantly reduce the dropout rate of all students.
(10) The department shall establish teacher academies to the extent funding is available
in cooperation with postsecondary education institutions for elementary, middle
school, and high school faculty in core disciplines, utilizing facilities and faculty
from universities and colleges, local school districts, and other appropriate agencies
throughout the state. Priority for participation shall be given to those teachers who
are teaching core discipline courses for which they do not have a major or minor or
the equivalent. Participation of teachers shall be voluntary.
(11) The department shall annually provide to the oversight council established in KRS
15A.063, the information received from local schools pursuant to KRS 158.449.
Section 7. KRS 156.111 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Education shall establish a Superintendents Training Program
and Assessment Center. The department shall provide for assessor training and shall
ensure that an assessment center includes but is not limited to training and
participation in the following components:
(a) Core concepts of leadership and quality practices;
(b) Effective implementation of school-based policies[decision making];
(c) Kentucky school law;
(d) Kentucky school finance and budgeting;
Page 38 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(e) School curriculum and assessment;
(f) Instructional leadership;
(g) School improvement;
(h) Community and board relations;
(i) Effective communication; and
(j) An executive coaching and mentoring program with an emphasis on
demonstrated professional growth.
The department may provide assessment centers regionally.
(2) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, an employing local board of
education shall not be responsible for any training costs associated with a
superintendent's participation in the training and assessment center process.
(3) At the conclusion of the training, each participant shall deliver to the employing
board of education and the Kentucky Department of Education a comprehensive
collection of work products and assessments that demonstrate proficiency in each
area of training.
(4) In addition to any applicable certification and experience requirements, any person
hired for the first time as superintendent in Kentucky shall successfully complete
the assessment center process within two (2) years of taking office as
superintendent.
(5) The Kentucky Board of Education shall adopt administrative regulations to govern
the training content, number of hours, assessments, and work products for
successful completion of the training and assessment center process. The board
shall also establish the continuing professional development requirements for
school superintendents to include, at a minimum, three (3) hours of annual training
in school finance and three (3) hours of annual training in ethics.
(6) The Department of Education may contract with qualified agencies, organizations,
or institutions or may approve programs offered by training providers to carry out
Page 39 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
the provisions of this section.
Section 8. KRS 156.162 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Pursuant to KRS 156.160, the Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate
administrative regulations to establish the courses of study for the different grades.
The administrative regulation that sets forth the required and elective courses for
the schools shall include:
(a) An elective social studies course on the Hebrew Scriptures, Old Testament of
the Bible;
(b) An elective social studies course on the New Testament of the Bible; or
(c) An elective social studies course on the Hebrew Scriptures and the New
Testament of the Bible.
(2) The purpose of a course under this section is to:
(a) Teach students knowledge of biblical content, characters, poetry, and
narratives that are prerequisites to understanding contemporary society and
culture, including literature, art, music, mores, oratory, and public policy; and
(b) Familiarize students with, as applicable:
1. The contents of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament;
2. The history of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament;
3. The literary style and structure of the Hebrew Scriptures or New
Testament; and
4. The influence of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament on law,
history, government, literature, art, music, customs, morals, values, and
culture.
(3) A student shall not be required to use a specific translation as the sole text of the
Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament and may use as the basic textbook a different
translation of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament from that chosen by the
school principal[council].
Page 40 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(4) The Kentucky Department of Education shall include the course standards in the
program of studies for Kentucky schools, including the teacher qualifications and
required professional development.
(5) A course offered under this section shall follow applicable law and all federal and
state guidelines in maintaining religious neutrality and accommodating the diverse
religious views, traditions, and perspectives of students in the school. A course
under this section shall not endorse, favor, or promote, or disfavor or show hostility
toward, any particular religion or nonreligious faith or religious perspective. The
Kentucky Board of Education, in complying with this section, shall not violate any
provision of the United States Constitution or federal law, the Kentucky
Constitution or any state law, or any administrative regulations of the United States
Department of Education or the Kentucky Department of Education.
Section 9. KRS 156.492 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education may enter into an agreement with any
building and construction trade organization to develop a training program for
school counselors providing services to students in the Commonwealth. The
purpose of the training program shall be to promote building and construction
trades and training facilities available to students by making school counselors
aware of what is available to students participating in the building and construction
trade. The training program shall include information relating to:
(a) The pay and benefits available to people who work in the building and
construction trades; and
(b) Job opportunities, pre-apprenticeships, apprenticeships, and pathways within
the building and construction trade industry.
(2) The participating trade organization shall ensure ample opportunities for school
counselors that serve grades seven (7) through twelve (12) to complete the training
created under subsection (1) of this section annually and shall bear all costs
Page 41 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
associated with the training. The participating trade organization may choose to
offer professional development opportunities to teachers who serve students in
grades seven (7) through twelve (12), if resources are available for this purpose.
(3) The department shall include the training program created in this section on the
electronic consumer bulletin board created pursuant to KRS 156.095(8) if requested
by the training program.
(4) A school counselor serving students in grades seven (7) through twelve (12) may
complete four (4) hours of training developed under this section which shall count
towards the twenty-one (21) hours required annually pursuant to KRS
156.101(4)(b)[2].
(5) Local boards of education or school principals[school-based decision making
councils] may incorporate this training as part of the four (4) days of professional
development required pursuant to KRS 158.070(3)(a) for teachers who serve
students in grades seven (7) through twelve (12) if offered by the participating trade
organization.
Section 10. KRS 157.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) In determining the cost of the program to support education excellence in
Kentucky, the statewide guaranteed base funding level, as defined in KRS
157.320, shall be computed by dividing the amount appropriated for this
purpose by the prior year's statewide average daily attendance.
(b) When determining the biennial appropriations for the program, the average
daily attendance for each fiscal year shall include an estimate of the number
of students graduating early under the provisions of KRS 158.142.
(2) Each district shall receive an amount equal to the base funding level for each pupil
in average daily attendance in the district in the previous year, except a district shall
receive an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the state portion of the average
statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student who graduated
Page 42 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
early under the provisions of KRS 158.142. Each district's base funding level shall
be adjusted by the following factors:
(a) The number of at-risk students in the district. At-risk students shall be
identified as those approved for the free lunch program under state and federal
guidelines. The number of at-risk students shall be multiplied by a factor to be
established by the General Assembly. Funds generated under this paragraph
may be used to pay for:
1. Alternative programs for students who are at risk of dropping out of
school before achieving a diploma; and
2. A hazardous duty pay supplement as determined by the local board of
education to the teachers who work in alternative programs with
students who are violent or assaultive;
(b) The number and types of exceptional children in the district as defined by
KRS 157.200. Specific weights for each category of exceptionality shall be
used in the calculation of the add-on factor for exceptional children; and
(c) Transportation costs. The per-pupil cost of transportation shall be calculated
as provided by KRS 157.370. Districts which contract to furnish
transportation to students attending nonpublic schools may adopt any payment
formula which ensures that no public school funds are used for the
transportation of nonpublic students.
(3) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year and each year thereafter, the General
Assembly shall annually allocate funds equal to one-half (1/2) of the state portion
of the average statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student
who graduated early under the provisions of KRS 158.142 the previous school year
to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority for deposit in the early
graduation scholarship trust fund.
(4) The program to support education excellence in Kentucky shall be fully
Page 43 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
implemented by the 1994-95 school year.
(5) (a) Unless a[Except for those schools which have implemented] school-based
policy requires otherwise[decision making], the commissioner of education
shall enforce maximum class sizes for every academic course requirement in
all grades except in vocal and instrumental music, and physical education
classes. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the maximum
number of pupils enrolled in a class shall be as follows:
1. Twenty-four (24) in primary grades (kindergarten through third grade);
2. Twenty-eight (28) in grade four (4);
3. Twenty-nine (29) in grades five (5) and six (6);
4. Thirty-one (31) in grades seven (7) to twelve (12).
(b) Unless a[Except for those schools which have implemented] school-based
policy requires otherwise[decision making], class size loads for middle and
secondary school:
1. Classroom teachers shall not exceed the equivalent of one hundred fifty
(150) pupil hours per day; and
2. Virtual program teachers shall not exceed the equivalent of three
hundred (300) pupil hours per day.
(c) The commissioner of education, upon approval of the Kentucky Board of
Education, shall adopt administrative regulations for enforcing this provision.
These administrative regulations shall include procedures for a superintendent
to request an exemption from the Kentucky Board of Education when unusual
circumstances warrant an increased class size for an individual class. A
request for an exemption shall include specific reasons for the increased class
size with a plan for reducing the class size prior to the beginning of the next
school year. A district shall not receive in any one (1) year exemptions for
more classes than enroll twenty percent (20%) of the pupils in the primary
Page 44 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
grades and grades four (4) through eight (8).
(d) In all schools the commissioner of education shall enforce the special
education maximum class sizes set by administrative regulations adopted by
the Kentucky Board of Education. A superintendent may request an
exemption pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection. A local school
principal[council] may request a waiver relating to maximum class size
pursuant to KRS 156.161 in the same manner as a local board of education.
An exemption or waiver shall not be granted if the increased class size will
impede any exceptional child from achieving his or her individual education
program in the least restrictive environment.
(6) In grades four (4) through six (6) with combined grades, the maximum class size
shall be the average daily attendance upon which funding is appropriated for the
lowest assigned grade in the class. There shall be no exceptions to the maximum
class size for combined classes. In combined classes other than the primary grades,
no ungraded students shall be placed in a combined class with graded students. In
addition, there shall be no more than two (2) consecutive grade levels combined in
any one (1) class in grades four (4) through six (6). However, this shall not apply to
schools with[which have implemented] school-based policies that[ decision
making] require otherwise.
(7) If a local school district, through its admission and release committee, determines
that an appropriate program in the least restrictive environment for a particular child
with a disability includes either part-time or full-time enrollment with a private
school or agency within the state or a public or private agency in another state, the
school district shall count as average daily attendance in a public school the time
that the child is in attendance at the school or agency, contingent upon approval by
the commissioner of education.
(8) Pupils attending a center for child learning and study established under an
Page 45 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
agreement pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 shall, for the purpose of calculating
average daily attendance, be considered as in attendance in the school district in
which the child legally resides and which is party to the agreement. For purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, teachers who are actually employees of the joint or
cooperative action shall be considered as employees of each school district which is
a party to the agreement.
(9) Program funding shall be increased when the average daily attendance in any
district for the first two (2) months of the current school year is greater than the
average daily attendance of the district for the first two (2) months of the previous
school year. The program funds allotted the district shall be increased by the
percent of increase. The average daily attendance in kindergarten is the
kindergarten full-time equivalent pupils in average daily attendance.
(10) If the average daily attendance for the current school year in any district decreases
by ten percent (10%) or more than the average daily attendance for the previous
school year, the average daily attendance for purposes of calculating program
funding for the next school year shall be increased by an amount equal to two-thirds
(2/3) of the decrease in average daily attendance. If the average daily attendance
remains the same or decreases in the succeeding school year, the average daily
attendance for purposes of calculating program funding for the following school
year shall be increased by an amount equal to one-third (1/3) of the decrease for the
first year of the decline.
(11) If the percentage of attendance of any school district shall have been reduced more
than two percent (2%) during the previous school year, the program funding
allotted the district for the current school year shall be increased by the difference in
the percentage of attendance for the two (2) years immediately prior to the current
school year less two percent (2%).
(12) (a) Instructional salaries for vocational agriculture classes shall be for twelve (12)
Page 46 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
months per year. Vocational agriculture teachers shall be responsible for the
following program of instruction during the time period beyond the regular
school term established by the local board of education: supervision and
instruction of students in agriculture experience programs; group and
individual instruction of farmers and agribusinessmen; supervision of student
members of agricultural organizations who are involved in leadership training
or other activity required by state or federal law; or any program of vocational
agriculture established by the Department of Education. During extended
employment, no vocational agriculture teacher shall receive salary on a day
that the teacher is scheduled to attend an institution of higher education class
which could be credited toward meeting any certification requirement.
(b) Each teacher of agriculture employed shall submit an annual plan for summer
program to the local school superintendent for approval. The summer plan
shall include a list of tasks to be performed, purposes for each task, and time
to be spent on each task. Approval by the local school superintendent shall be
in compliance with the guidelines developed by the Department of Education.
The supervision and accountability of teachers of vocational agriculture's
summer programs shall be the responsibility of the local school
superintendent. The local school superintendent shall submit to the
commissioner of education a completed report of summer tasks for each
vocational agriculture teacher. Twenty percent (20%) of the approved
vocational agriculture programs shall be audited annually by the State
Department of Education to determine that the summer plan has been properly
executed.
(13) (a) In allotting program funds for home and hospital instruction, statewide
guaranteed base funding, excluding the capital outlay, shall be allotted for
each child in average daily attendance in the prior school year who has been
Page 47 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
properly identified according to Kentucky Board of Education administrative
regulations. Attendance shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 157.270 and shall
be reported monthly on forms provided by the Department of Education; and
(b) Pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education,
local school districts shall be reimbursed for home and hospital instruction for
pupils unable to attend regular school sessions because of short-term health
impairments. A reimbursement formula shall be established by administrative
regulations to include such factors as a reasonable per hour, per child
allotment for teacher instructional time, with a maximum number of funded
hours per week, a reasonable allotment for teaching supplies and equipment,
and a reasonable allotment for travel expenses to and from instructional
assignments, but the formula shall not include an allotment for capital outlay.
Attendance shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 157.270 and shall be reported
annually on forms provided by the Department of Education.
(14) If the[Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision
making and the] school principal[council] has decided[voted] to waive this
subsection and for virtual programs, kindergarten aides shall be provided for each
twenty-four (24) full-time equivalent kindergarten students enrolled.
(15) Effective July 1, 2001, there shall be no deduction applied against the base funding
level for any pupil in average daily attendance who spends a portion of his or her
school day in a program at a state-operated career and technical education or
vocational facility.
(16) During a fiscal year, a school district may request that the Department of Education
recalculate its funds allocated under this section if the current year average daily
attendance for the twenty (20) day school month as defined in KRS 158.060(2) that
contains the most days within the calendar month of January exceeds the prior year
adjusted average daily attendance plus growth by at least one percent (1%). Any
Page 48 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
adjustments in the allotments approved under this subsection shall be proportional
to the remaining days in the school year and subject to available funds under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky.
(17) To calculate the state portion of the program to support education excellence in
Kentucky for a school district, the Department of Education shall subtract the local
effort required under KRS 157.390(5) from the calculated base funding under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky, as required by this section.
The value of the real estate used in this calculation shall be the lesser of the current
year assessment or the prior year assessment increased by four percent (4%) plus
the value of current year new property. The calculation under this subsection shall
be subject to available funds.
(18) Notwithstanding any other statute or budget of the Commonwealth language to the
contrary, time missed due to shortening days for emergencies may be made up by
lengthening school days in the school calendar without any loss of funds under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky.
Section 11. KRS 158.031 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In this section, "primary school program" means that part of the elementary school
program in which children are enrolled from the time they begin school until they
are ready to enter the fourth grade. Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary,
successful completion of the primary school program shall be a prerequisite for a
child's entrance into fourth grade.
(2) The Kentucky Board of Education shall establish, by administrative regulation,
methods of verifying successful completion of the primary school program in
carrying out the goals of education as described in KRS 158.6451.
(3) The primary program shall include the following critical attributes:
developmentally appropriate educational practices; multiage and multiability
classrooms; continuous progress; authentic assessment; qualitative reporting
Page 49 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
methods; professional teamwork; and positive parent involvement.
(4) [Each school council or, if none exists, ]The school shall determine the organization
of its ungraded primary program including the extent to which multiage groups are
necessary to implement the critical attributes based on the critical attributes and
meeting individual student needs.
(5) The implementation of the primary program may take into consideration the
necessary arrangements required for students attending part-time and will allow for
grouping of students attending their first year of school when determined to be
developmentally appropriate.
(6) A school district may advance a student through the primary program when it is
determined that it is in the best educational interest of the student. A student who is
at least five (5) years of age, but less than six (6) years of age, and is advanced in
the primary program may be classified as other than a kindergarten student for
purposes of funding under KRS 157.310 to 157.440 if the student is determined to
have acquired the academic and social skills taught in kindergarten as determined
by local board policy in accordance with the process established by Kentucky
Board of Education administrative regulation.
(7) Data shall be collected by each school district on the number of students, in each
school having a primary program, who take five (5) years to complete the primary
program. The data shall be reported in the annual performance report described in
KRS 158.6453.
Section 12. KRS 158.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each teacher shall be provided access to a copy of his or her employment contract
upon request.
(2) Twenty (20) school days, or days in which teachers are actually employed in the
schoolroom, shall constitute a school month in the common schools.
(3) Each full-time teacher shall be provided with a duty-free lunch period each day
Page 50 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
during the regularly scheduled student lunch period. The duty-free lunch period
shall be not less than the length of the lunch period specified in the school calendar
approved by the chief state school officer. A full-time teacher may be assigned to
lunch room duty during the regularly scheduled student lunch period only for an
amount of time equal to the noninstructional time in excess of fifty-five (55)
minutes included in the teacher's daily schedule. The calculation of noninstructional
time shall not include the teacher's duty-free lunch period, the time teachers are
required to be at school prior to the start of the student's instructional day, or the
time teachers are required to remain at school after the students are dismissed.
(4) Except for children with disabilities and children attending the primary school
program who may attend a program of less than six (6) hours per day under policy
adopted by the local school district board of education and approved by the
commissioner of education and children attending a school district where the local
board has approved a schedule that provides at least the equivalent of six (6) hours
of daily instruction during the school year, a minimum of six (6) hours of actual
school work shall constitute a school day. Kindergarten programs may be operated
for less than six (6) hours without state board approval. The Kentucky Board of
Education, upon recommendation of the chief state school officer, shall develop and
approve regulations governing make up by school districts of whole days missed
due to emergencies, or partial days missed as a result of shortening regularly
scheduled school days due to emergencies.
(5) Teachers shall be provided additional time for nonteaching activities. The
nonteaching time shall be used to provide teachers opportunities for professional
development activities as provided in KRS 156.095, instructional planning, school-
based policy[decision] making as provided in KRS 160.345, curriculum
development, and outreach activities involving their students' families and the
community.
Page 51 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(6) Character education programs and activities shall be considered valuable and
legitimate components of the actual school work constituting a school day under
subsection (4) of this section.
Section 13. KRS 158.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Election" has the same meaning as in KRS 121.015;
(b) "Minimum school term" or "school term" means not less than one hundred
eighty-five (185) days composed of the student attendance days, teacher
professional days, and holidays;
(c) "School calendar" means the document adopted by a local board of education
that establishes the minimum school term, student instructional year or
variable student instructional year, and days that school will not be in session;
(d) "School district calendar committee" means a committee that includes at least
the following:
1. One (1) school district principal;
2. One (1) school district office administrator other than the
superintendent;
3. One (1) member of the local board of education;
4. Two (2) parents of students attending a school in the district;
5. One (1) school district elementary school teacher;
6. One (1) school district middle or high school teacher;
7. Two (2) school district classified employees; and
8. Two (2) community members from the local chamber of commerce,
business community, or tourism commission;
(e) "Student attendance day" means any day that students are scheduled to be at
school to receive instruction, and encompasses the designated start and
dismissal time;
Page 52 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(f) "Student instructional year" means at least one thousand sixty-two (1,062)
hours of instructional time for students delivered on not less than one hundred
seventy (170) student attendance days;
(g) "Teacher professional day" means any day teachers are required to report to
work as determined by a local board of education, with or without the
presence of students; and
(h) "Variable student instructional year" means at least one thousand sixty-two
(1,062) hours of instructional time delivered on the number of student
attendance days adopted by a local board of education which shall be
considered proportionally equivalent to one hundred seventy (170) student
attendance days and calendar days for the purposes of a student instructional
year, employment contracts that are based on the school term, service credit
under KRS 161.500, and funding under KRS 157.350.
(2) (a) The local board of education, upon recommendation of the local school
district superintendent, shall annually appoint a school district calendar
committee to review, develop, and recommend school calendar options.
(b) The school district calendar committee, after seeking feedback from school
district employees, parents, and community members, shall recommend
school calendar options to the local school district superintendent for
presentation to the local board of education. The committee's
recommendations shall comply with state laws and regulations and consider
the economic impact of the school calendar on the community and the state.
(c) Prior to adopting a school calendar, the local board of education shall hear for
discussion the school district calendar committee's recommendations and the
recommendation of the superintendent at a meeting of the local board of
education.
(d) During a subsequent meeting of the local board of education, the local board
Page 53 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
shall adopt a school calendar for the upcoming school year that establishes the
opening and closing dates of the school term, beginning and ending dates of
each school month, student attendance days, and days on which schools shall
be dismissed. The local board may schedule days for breaks in the school
calendar that shall not be counted as a part of the minimum school term.
(e) For local board of education meetings described in paragraphs (c) and (d) of
this subsection, if the meeting is a regular meeting, notice shall be given to
media outlets that have requests on file to be notified of special meetings
stating the date of the regular meeting and that one (1) of the items to be
considered in the regular meeting will be the school calendar. The notice shall
be sent at least twenty-four (24) hours before the regular meeting. This
requirement shall not be deemed to make any requirements or limitations
relating to special meetings applicable to the regular meeting.
(f) A local school board of education that adopts a school calendar with the first
student attendance day in the school term starting no earlier than the Monday
closest to August 26 may use a variable student instructional year. Districts
may set the length of individual student attendance days in a variable student
instructional schedule, but no student attendance day shall contain more than
seven (7) hours of instructional time unless the district submitted and received
approval from the commissioner of education for an innovative alternative
calendar.
(3) (a) Each local board of education shall use four (4) days of the minimum school
term for professional development and collegial planning activities for the
professional staff without the presence of students pursuant to the
requirements of KRS 156.095. At the discretion of the superintendent, one (1)
day of professional development may be used for district-wide activities and
for training that is mandated by federal or state law. The use of three (3) days
Page 54 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
shall be planned by each principal[school council], except that the district is
encouraged to provide technical assistance and leadership to school
principals[councils] to maximize existing resources and to encourage shared
planning.
(b) 1. A local board may approve a school's flexible professional development
plan that permits teachers or other certified personnel within a school to
participate in professional development activities outside the days
scheduled in the school calendar or the regularly scheduled hours in the
school work day and receive credit towards the four (4) day professional
development requirement within the minimum one hundred eighty-five
(185) days that a teacher shall be employed.
2. A flexible schedule option shall be reflected in the school's professional
development component within the school improvement plan and
approved by the local board. Credit for approved professional
development activities may be accumulated in periods of time other than
full day segments.
3. No teacher or administrator shall be permitted to count participation in a
professional development activity under the flexible schedule option
unless the activity is related to the teacher's classroom assignment and
content area, or the administrator's job requirements, or is required by
the school improvement plan, or is tied to the teacher's or the
administrator's individual growth plan. The supervisor shall give prior
approval and shall monitor compliance with the requirements of this
paragraph. In the case of teachers, a professional development
committee or the school principal[council] by school-based[council]
policy, as defined in Section 1 of this Act, may be responsible for
reviewing requests for approval.
Page 55 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(c) The local board of each school district may use up to a maximum of four (4)
days of the minimum school term for holidays; provided, however, any
holiday which occurs on Saturday may be observed on the preceding Friday.
(d) Each local board may use two (2) days for planning activities without the
presence of students.
(e) Each local board may close schools for the number of days deemed necessary
for:
1. National or state emergency or mourning when proclaimed by the
President of the United States or the Governor of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky;
2. Local emergency which would endanger the health or safety of children;
and
3. Mourning when so designated by the local board of education and
approved by the Kentucky Board of Education upon recommendation of
the commissioner of education.
(4) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon recommendation of the
commissioner of education, shall adopt administrative regulations governing
the use of student attendance days as a result of a local emergency, as
described in subsection (3)(e)2. of this section, and regulations setting forth
the guidelines and procedures to be observed for the approval of waivers from
the requirements of a student instructional year in subsection (1)(f) of this
section for districts that wish to adopt innovative instructional calendars, or
for circumstances that would create extreme hardship.
(b) If a local board of education amends its school calendar after its adoption due
to an emergency, it may lengthen or shorten any remaining student attendance
days by thirty (30) minutes or more, as it deems necessary, provided the
amended calendar complies with the requirements of a student instructional
Page 56 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
year in subsection (1)(f) of this section or a variable student instructional year
in subsection (1)(h) of this section. No student attendance day shall contain
more than seven (7) hours of instructional time unless the district submitted
and received approval from the commissioner of education for an innovative
alternative calendar.
(5) (a) 1. In setting the school calendar, school may be closed for two (2)
consecutive days for the purpose of permitting professional school
employees to attend statewide professional meetings.
2. These two (2) days for statewide professional meetings may be
scheduled to begin with the first Thursday after Easter, or upon request
of the statewide professional education association having the largest
paid membership, the commissioner of education may designate
alternate dates.
3. If schools are scheduled to operate during days designated for the
statewide professional meeting, the school district shall permit
employees who are delegates to attend as compensated professional
leave time and shall employ substitute teachers in their absence.
4. The commissioner of education shall designate one (1) additional day
during the school year when schools may be closed to permit
professional school employees to participate in regional or district
professional meetings.
5. These three (3) days so designated for attendance at professional
meetings may be counted as a part of the minimum school term.
(b) If any school in a district is used as a voting place pursuant to KRS 117.065,
the school district may be closed on the days of the election, and those days
may be used for professional development activities, professional meetings, or
parent-teacher conferences.
Page 57 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(c) All schools shall be closed on the third Monday of January in observance of
the birthday of Martin Luther King, Jr. Districts may:
1. Designate the day as one (1) of the four (4) holidays permitted under
subsection (3)(c) of this section; or
2. Not include the day in the minimum school term specified in subsection
(1) of this section.
(6) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education, or the organization or agency designated
by the board to manage interscholastic athletics, shall be encouraged to
schedule athletic competitions outside the regularly scheduled student
attendance day.
(b) Any member of a school-sponsored interscholastic athletic team who
competes in a regional tournament or state tournament sanctioned by the
Kentucky Board of Education, or the organization or agency designated by the
board to manage interscholastic athletics, and occurring on a regularly
scheduled student attendance day may be counted present at school on the
date or dates of the competition, as determined by local board policy, for a
maximum of two (2) days per student per year. The student shall be expected
to complete any assignments missed on the date or dates of the competition.
(c) The school attendance record of any student for whom paragraph (b) of this
subsection applies shall indicate that the student was in attendance on the date
or dates of competition.
(7) Schools shall provide continuing education for those students who are determined
to need additional time to achieve the outcomes defined in KRS 158.6451, and
schools shall not be limited to the minimum school term in providing this
education. Continuing education time may include extended days, extended weeks,
or extended years. A local board of education may adopt a policy requiring its
students to participate in continuing education. The local policy shall set out the
Page 58 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
conditions under which attendance will be required and any exceptions which are
provided. The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative
regulations establishing criteria for the allotment of grants to local school districts
and shall include criteria by which the commissioner of education may approve a
district's request for a waiver under KRS 156.161 to use an alternative service
delivery option, including providing services during the student attendance day on a
limited basis. These grants shall be allotted to school districts to provide
instructional programs for pupils who are identified as needing additional time to
achieve the outcomes defined in KRS 158.6451. A school district that has a school
operating a model early reading program under KRS 158.792 may use a portion of
its grant money as part of the matching funds to provide individualized or small
group reading instruction to qualified students outside of the regular classroom
during the student attendance day.
(8) Notwithstanding any other statute, each school term shall include no less than the
equivalent of the student instructional year in subsection (1)(f) of this section, or a
variable student instructional year in subsection (1)(h) of this section, except that
the commissioner of education may grant up to the equivalent of ten (10) student
attendance days for school districts that have a nontraditional instruction plan
approved by the commissioner of education on days when the school district is
closed for health or safety reasons. The district's plan shall indicate how the
nontraditional instruction process shall be a continuation of learning that is
occurring on regular student attendance days. Instructional delivery methods,
including the use of technology, shall be clearly delineated in the plan. Average
daily attendance for purposes of Support Education Excellence in Kentucky
program funding during the student attendance days granted shall be calculated in
compliance with administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of
Education.
Page 59 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(9) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to
prescribe the conditions and procedures for districts to be approved for the
nontraditional instruction program. Administrative regulations promulgated by the
board under this section shall specify:
(a) The application, plan review, approval, and amendment process;
(b) Reporting requirements for districts approved for the program, which may
include but are not limited to examples of student work, lesson plans, teacher
work logs, and student and teacher participation on nontraditional instruction
days. Documentation to support the use of nontraditional instruction days
shall include clear evidence of learning continuation;
(c) Timelines for initial approval as a nontraditional instruction district, length of
approval, the renewal process, and ongoing evaluative procedures required of
the district;
(d) Reporting and oversight responsibilities of the district and the Kentucky
Department of Education, including the documentation required to show clear
evidence of learning continuation during nontraditional instruction days; and
(e) Other components deemed necessary to implement this section.
(10) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 158.060(4) and the provisions of subsection
(2) of this section, a school district shall arrange bus schedules so that all buses
arrive in sufficient time to provide breakfast prior to the beginning of the student
attendance day. The superintendent of a school district that participates in the
Federal School Breakfast Program may also authorize up to fifteen (15) minutes of
the student attendance day to provide the opportunity for children to eat breakfast
during instructional time.
(11) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the following provisions shall
apply to a school district that misses student attendance days due to emergencies,
including weather-related emergencies:
Page 60 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(a) A certified school employee shall be considered to have fulfilled the
minimum one hundred eighty-five (185) day contract with a school district
under KRS 157.350 and shall be given credit for the purpose of calculating
service credit for retirement under KRS 161.500 for certified school personnel
if:
1. State and local requirements under this section are met regarding the
equivalent of the number and length of student attendance days, teacher
professional days, professional development days, holidays, and days
for planning activities without the presence of students; and
2. The provisions of the district's school calendar to make up student
attendance days missed due to any emergency, as approved by the
Kentucky Department of Education when required, including but not
limited to a provision for additional instructional time per day, are met.
(b) Additional time worked by a classified school employee shall be considered
as equivalent time to be applied toward the employee's contract and
calculation of service credit for classified employees under KRS 78.615 if:
1. The employee works for a school district with a school calendar
approved by the Kentucky Department of Education that contains a
provision that additional instructional time per day shall be used to make
up full days missed due to an emergency;
2. The employee's contract requires a minimum six (6) hour work day; and
3. The employee's job responsibilities and work day are extended when the
instructional time is extended for the purposes of making up time.
(c) Classified employees who are regularly scheduled to work less than six (6)
hours per day and who do not have additional work responsibilities as a result
of lengthened student attendance days shall be excluded from the provisions
of this subsection. These employees may be assigned additional work
Page 61 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
responsibilities to make up service credit under KRS 78.615 that would be
lost due to lengthened student attendance days.
Section 14. KRS 158.102 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board of education for each local school district shall establish and maintain a
library media center in every elementary and secondary school to promote
information literacy and technology in the curriculum, and to facilitate teaching,
student achievement, and lifelong learning.
(2) (a) Schools shall employ a school media librarian to organize, equip, and manage
the operations of the school media library. The school media librarian shall
hold the appropriate certificate of legal qualifications in accordance with KRS
161.020 and 161.030. A certified school media librarian may be employed to
serve two (2) or more schools in a school district with the consent of the
school principals[councils].
(b) If a vacancy occurs, the school principal[council] may fill the vacancy on a
temporary basis by employing:
1. A person who is pursuing certification as a school media librarian in
accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the
Education Professional Standards Board; or
2. A temporary employee for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days.
Section 15. KRS 158.1411 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For students entering grade nine (9) on or before June 30, 2025, successful
completion of one (1) or more courses or programs that meet the financial literacy
standards shall be a Kentucky public high school graduation requirement.
(2) For students entering grade nine (9) on or after July 1, 2025, successful completion
of a one (1) credit course in financial literacy shall be a Kentucky public high
school graduation requirement.
(3) The graduation requirement in subsections (1) and (2) shall also apply to a student
Page 62 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
pursuing an early graduation program as established in KRS 158.142.
(4) The financial literacy course required in subsection (2) of this section shall align to
the student's individual learning plan and include but not be limited to instruction in
the following areas:
(a) Budgeting;
(b) Saving and investing;
(c) Credit and debt;
(d) Insurance and risk management, including but not limited to personal
insurance policies;
(e) Taxes; and
(f) The necessity of critical review and understanding of documents prior to
signing agreement or approval and the ability to provide a signature in
cursive.
(5) The financial literacy course required in subsection (2) of this section shall be
accepted as an elective course requirement for high school graduation
notwithstanding any other provisions of law.
(6) In accordance with KRS 156.160, the Kentucky Board of Education shall
promulgate administrative regulations establishing academic standards for financial
literacy.
(7) The local superintendent, after consultation with the local board of education,
advisory[school-based decision making] council, and principal of each high school,
shall determine curricula for course offerings that are aligned with the financial
literacy academic standards promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(8) The Department of Education shall develop financial literacy guidelines for local
schools and districts.
(9) Local schools and districts may consult with the Kentucky Financial Empowerment
Commission established in KRS 41.450 when developing and implementing the
Page 63 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
financial literacy standards.
(10) The Department of Education shall identify through the system for uniform
academic course codes, which courses meet the requirements for the financial
literacy course required in subsection (2) of this section.
Section 16. KRS 158.1415 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a local school board[council or, if none exists, the principal] adopts a curriculum
for human sexuality or sexually transmitted diseases, instruction shall include but
not be limited to the following content:
(a) Abstinence from sexual activity is the desirable goal for all school-age
children;
(b) Abstinence from sexual activity is the only certain way to avoid unintended
pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and other associated health
problems;
(c) The best way to avoid sexually transmitted diseases and other associated
health problems is to establish a permanent mutually faithful monogamous
relationship;
(d) A policy to respect parental rights by ensuring that:
1. Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, children in grade
five (5) and below do not receive any instruction through curriculum or
programs on human sexuality or sexually transmitted diseases; or
2. Any child, regardless of grade level, enrolled in the district does not
receive any instruction or presentation that has a goal or purpose of
students studying or exploring gender identity, gender expression, or
sexual orientation; and
(e) A policy to notify a parent in advance and obtain the parent's written consent
before the parent's child in grade six (6) or above receives any instruction
through curriculum or programs on human sexuality or sexually transmitted
Page 64 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
diseases authorized in this section.
(2) Any course, curriculum, or program offered by a public school on the subject of
human sexuality provided by school personnel or by third parties authorized by the
school shall:
(a) Provide an alternative course, curriculum, or program without any penalty to
the student's grade or standing for students whose parents have not provided
written consent as required in subsection (1)(e) of this section;
(b) Be subject to an inspection by parents of participating students that allows
parents to review the following materials:
1. Curriculum;
2. Instructional materials;
3. Lesson plans;
4. Assessments or tests;
5. Surveys or questionnaires;
6. Assignments; and
7. Instructional activities;
(c) Be developmentally appropriate; and
(d) Be limited to a curriculum that has been subject to the reasonable review and
response by stakeholders in conformity with this subsection and KRS
160.345(2).
(3) A public school offering any course, curriculum, or program on the subject of
human sexuality shall provide notification to the parents of a student at least two (2)
weeks prior to the student's planned participation in the course, curriculum, or
program. The notification shall:
(a) Inform the parents of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Provide the date the course, curriculum, or program is scheduled to begin;
(c) Detail the process for a parent to review the materials outlined in subsection
Page 65 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(2) of this section;
(d) Explain the process for a parent to provide written consent for the student's
participation in the course, curriculum, or program; and
(e) Provide the contact information for the teacher or instructor of the course,
curriculum, or program and a school administrator designated with oversight.
(4) [Nothing in ]This section shall not prohibit school personnel from:
(a) Discussing human sexuality, including the sexuality of any historic person,
group, or public figure, where the discussion provides necessary context in
relation to a topic of instruction from a curriculum approved pursuant to KRS
160.345;
(b) Providing age-appropriate instruction on child sexual abuse through
curriculum or programs in accordance with the standards set forth by the
National Children's Alliance and approved by the Children's Advocacy
Centers of Kentucky, regardless of grade level; or
(c) Responding to a question from a student during class regarding human
sexuality as it relates to a topic of instruction from a curriculum approved
pursuant to KRS 160.345.
Section 17. KRS 158.148 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) 1. "Bullying" means any unwanted verbal, physical, or social behavior
among students that involves a real or perceived power imbalance and is
repeated or has the potential to be repeated:
a. That occurs on school premises, on school-sponsored
transportation, or at a school-sponsored event; or
b. That disrupts the education process; and
2. This definition shall not be interpreted to prohibit civil exchange of
opinions or debate or cultural practices protected under the state or
Page 66 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
federal Constitution where the opinion expressed does not otherwise
materially or substantially disrupt the education process; and
(b) "Parent or guardian" means a parent, legal guardian, or other person
exercising custodial control or supervision of a student.
(2) In cooperation with the Kentucky Education Association, the Kentucky School
Boards Association, the Kentucky Association of School Administrators, the
Kentucky Association of Professional Educators, the Kentucky Association of
School Superintendents, the Parent-Teachers Association, the Kentucky Chamber
of Commerce, the Farm Bureau, members of the Interim Joint Committee on
Education, and other interested groups, and in collaboration with the Center for
School Safety, the Department of Education shall develop or update as needed and
distribute to all districts by August 31 of each even-numbered year:
(a) Statewide student discipline guidelines to ensure safe schools, including the
definition of serious incident for the reporting purposes as identified in KRS
158.444;
(b) Statewide transportation services policy guidelines to ensure the safety of
students, operators of vehicles, and other passengers using district-provided
transportation;
(c) Recommendations designed to improve the learning environment and school
climate, parental and community involvement in the schools, and student
achievement; and
(d) Model policies to implement the provisions of this section and KRS 158.110,
158.156, 158.444, 525.070, and 525.080.
(3) The department shall obtain statewide data on major discipline problems and
reasons why students drop out of school. In addition, the department, in
collaboration with the Center for School Safety, shall identify successful strategies
currently being used in programs in Kentucky and in other states and shall
Page 67 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
incorporate those strategies into the statewide student discipline guidelines,
transportation services policy guidelines, and the recommendations under
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Copies of the statewide student discipline guidelines and the transportation services
policy guidelines shall be distributed to all school districts. The statewide student
discipline guidelines shall contain broad principles and legal requirements to guide
local districts in the development of their own code of acceptable behavior and
discipline; the selection of discipline and classroom management techniques by
school principals[councils] under KRS 158.155 and 160.345; the development of
the district transportation services policy; and the development of the district-wide
safety plan.
(5) (a) Each local board of education shall adopt a code of acceptable behavior and
discipline based on the statewide student discipline guidelines that shall apply
to the students in each school operated by the board. The code shall be
updated no less frequently than every two (2) years.
(b) The superintendent, or designee, shall be responsible for overall
implementation and supervision, and each school principal shall be
responsible for administration and implementation of[ within each school.
Each school council shall select and implement] the appropriate discipline and
classroom management techniques necessary to carry out the code. The board
shall establish a process for a two-way communication system for teachers
and other employees to notify a principal, supervisor, or other administrator of
an emergency.
(c) The code shall prohibit bullying.
(d) The code shall contain the standard of behavior expected from each student,
the consequences of failure to obey the standards, and the importance of the
standards to the maintenance of a safe learning environment where orderly
Page 68 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
learning is possible and encouraged.
(e) The code shall contain:
1. Procedures for identifying, documenting, and reporting incidents of
bullying, incidents of violations of the code, and incidents for which
reporting is required under KRS 158.156;
2. Procedures for investigating and responding to a complaint or a report of
bullying or a violation of the code, or of an incident for which reporting
is required under KRS 158.156, including reporting incidents to the
parents or guardians of the students involved;
3. A strategy or method of protecting a complainant or person reporting:
a. An incident of bullying;
b. A violation of the code; or
c. An incident for which reporting is required under KRS 158.156;
from retaliation;
4. A process for informing students, parents or guardians, and school
employees of the requirements of the code and the provisions of this
section and KRS 158.156, 158.444, 525.070, and 525.080, including
training for school employees; and
5. Information regarding the consequences of bullying and violating the
code and violations reportable under KRS 158.155, 158.156, or 158.444.
(f) The principal of each school shall apply the code of acceptable behavior and
discipline uniformly and fairly to each student at the school without partiality
or discrimination.
(g) A copy of the code of acceptable behavior and discipline adopted by the board
of education shall be posted at each school. Guidance counselors shall be
provided copies for discussion with students. The code shall be referenced in
all school handbooks. All school employees and parents or guardians shall be
Page 69 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
provided copies of the code.
(6) (a) Each local board of education shall adopt a transportation services policy to
apply to students while on transportation provided for or by the district, and to
their parents or guardians. The policy shall be updated no less frequently than
every two (2) years, with the first update being completed by the first
instructional day of the 2024-2025 school year.
(b) The superintendent or designee shall be responsible for overall
implementation and supervision. The board shall select and implement the
appropriate discipline and transportation management techniques necessary to
carry out the policy. The board shall establish a process for a two-way
communication system for bus drivers and other employees, volunteers, or
contractors to notify a supervisor, superintendent, or other administrator of an
emergency.
(c) The policy shall contain the standard of behavior expected from each student
while being transported by or for the district and the consequences of failure
to obey the standards. The policy shall include:
1. Procedures for identifying, documenting, and reporting incidents of
bullying, incidents of violations of the policy, and incidents for which
reporting is required under KRS 158.156;
2. Procedures for investigating and responding to a complaint or a report of
bullying or a violation of the policy, or of an incident for which
reporting is required under KRS 158.156, including reporting incidents
to the parents or guardians of the students involved;
3. A strategy or method of protecting a complainant or person reporting a
violation of the policy from retaliation;
4. When a student is alleged by an operator of transportation to have
committed a violation of the policy that places the student or others at
Page 70 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
risk of physical harm or otherwise makes it unsafe for the driver to
continue transporting students, and as permitted by state and federal law,
a process that allows the operator of the vehicle to:
a. Refuse further transportation of the student at the time of the
incident, upon notification of the emergency pursuant to paragraph
(b) of this subsection, and transfer the student to:
i. An appropriate district official who has reported to the
location of the vehicle;
ii. An appropriate district official located at a location
designated in the transportation services policy or by an
appropriate district official, including but not limited to a bus
compound or transfer station;
iii. Law enforcement; or
iv. The student's parent or guardian; and
b. Upon filing and submitting a written report to the superintendent
or designee, refuse future transportation of the student until an
interim or final determination of disciplinary action by the
superintendent or designee pursuant to local board policy;
5. For alleged violations of the policy not covered by subparagraph 4. of
this paragraph and submitted by the operator of the vehicle, a
requirement that the superintendent or designee issue an interim or final
determination of disciplinary action pursuant to local board policy
within one (1) week of the report being submitted;
6. A process allowing for the operator of a vehicle to:
a. File a written or electronic complaint or report of the misconduct,
including a recommendation regarding revocation of the student's
transportation privileges; and
Page 71 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
b. Be heard during any disciplinary proceedings against a student
relating, at least in part, to misconduct that occurred during the
operator's transportation of the student;
7. A requirement that any recommendation by the operator of a vehicle
shall be considered by the superintendent or designee as a factor in the
interim or final determination of disciplinary action on the complaint or
report;
8. A requirement that the operator of a vehicle, to the extent permitted by
law, receive written notice from the superintendent or designee of the
investigation, disciplinary action imposed, and reasoning in response to
the reported misconduct; and
9. A disciplinary structure that provides for:
a. Interventions or disciplinary consequences that reflect the severity
of the violation; and
b. Increased intervention and consequences upon subsequent
violations of the policy.
(d) The policy shall contain the standard of behavior expected from parents or
guardians of students being transported by or for the district while interacting
with district transportation staff and the consequences of failure to follow the
standards. The policy shall include:
1. Procedures for investigating and responding to a complaint or report
made by an operator of transportation alleging parent or legal guardian
misconduct;
2. A requirement that the operator of a vehicle be provided an opportunity
to be heard and to make a recommendation regarding future
transportation of the student during any disciplinary proceedings
relating, at least in part, to alleged misconduct by the student's parent or
Page 72 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
guardian and the impact upon a student's transportation privileges; and
3. An intervention or consequences structure that provides for the
placement of conditions upon or revocation of a student's transportation
privileges based upon parent or guardian misconduct that provides for:
a. Interventions or consequences that reflect the severity of the parent
or guardian's misconduct; and
b. Increased intervention and consequences upon subsequent
violations of the policy.
(e) The policy shall include references to relevant criminal violations based on
potential misconduct covered by the policy, including but not limited to the
following statements:
1. "KRS 511.020 makes it a Class B felony for a person, with the intent to
commit a crime, knowingly entering or remaining unlawfully upon a
school bus, and when in effecting entry or while upon the school bus or
in the immediate flight therefrom, the person or another participant in
the crime causes physical injury to another person or uses or threatens
the use of a dangerous instrument against another person.";
2. "KRS 508.078 makes it a Class C felony for a person to intentionally
threaten to commit any act likely to result in death or serious physical
injury to any employee of an elementary or secondary school, which
includes a school bus driver.";
3. "KRS 508.025 makes it a Class D felony for a person to recklessly, with
a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument, or intentionally cause or
attempt to cause physical injury to a school bus driver or other school
employee acting in the course and scope of their employment.";
4. "KRS 519.020 makes it a Class A misdemeanor for a person to obstruct
governmental operations, which includes intentionally obstructing,
Page 73 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
impairing, or hindering the performance of a governmental function by
using or threatening to use violence, force or physical interference."; and
5. "KRS 525.070 makes it a Class B misdemeanor for a person, with intent
to intimidate, harass, annoy, or alarm another person, to strike, shove,
kick, or otherwise subject another to physical contact.".
(f) The policy shall include a process for an operator of a vehicle, upon the
reinstatement of a student's transportation privileges after an interim or final
determination of disciplinary action, to elect to receive an alternate route
assignment in lieu of transporting the student.
(g) The superintendent or designee of each district shall apply the transportation
services policy uniformly and fairly to each student without partiality or
discrimination.
(h) The superintendent or designee shall require every student in the district and
at least one (1) parent or guardian of each student to acknowledge in writing
the receipt, comprehension, and agreement of adherence to the transportation
safety policy within seven (7) days of the student's first day of attendance
during each school year. Failure to submit written acknowledgement by a
student or their parent or guardian may be grounds for revocation of a
student's transportation privileges until the acknowledgment is properly
received.
(7) Any action under this section related to students with disabilities shall be in
compliance with applicable federal law.
Section 18. KRS 158.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All students admitted to the common schools shall comply with the lawful
regulations for the government of the schools:
(a) Willful disobedience or defiance of the authority of the teachers or
administrators, use of profanity or vulgarity, assault or battery or abuse of
Page 74 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
other students, the threat of force or violence, the use or possession of alcohol
or drugs, stealing or destruction or defacing of school property or personal
property of students, the carrying or use of weapons or dangerous instruments,
or other incorrigible bad conduct on school property, as well as off school
property at school-sponsored activities, constitutes cause for suspension or
expulsion from school; and
(b) Assault or battery or abuse of school personnel; stealing or willfully or
wantonly defacing, destroying, or damaging the personal property of school
personnel on school property, off school property, or at school-sponsored
activities constitutes cause for suspension or expulsion from school.
(2) (a) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy requiring the expulsion
from school for a period of at least twelve (12) months for a student who:
1. Is determined by the board through clear and convincing evidence to
have made threats that pose a danger to the well-being of students,
faculty, or staff of the district; or
2. Is determined by the board to have brought a weapon to a school under
its jurisdiction. In determining whether a student has brought a weapon
to school, a local board of education shall use the definition of "unlawful
possession of a weapon on school property" stated in KRS 527.070.
(b) The board shall also adopt a policy requiring disciplinary actions, up to and
including expulsion from school, for a student who is determined by the board
to have:
1. Possessed prescription drugs or controlled substances for the purpose of
sale or distribution at a school under the board's jurisdiction;
2. Physically assaulted or battered or abused educational personnel or other
students at a school or school function under the board's jurisdiction; or
3. Physically assaulted, battered, or abused educational personnel or other
Page 75 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
students off school property and the incident is likely to substantially
disrupt the educational process.
(3) (a) The board may modify the expulsion requirement and length for students on a
case-by-case basis, except the length of expulsion shall be at least twelve (12)
months for a violation set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(b) [Nothing in ]This section shall not prohibit a board from expelling a student
for longer than twelve (12) months.
(c) A board that has expelled a student from the student's regular school setting
shall provide or ensure that educational services are provided to the student in
an appropriate alternative program or setting, unless the board has made a
determination, on the record, supported by clear and convincing evidence, that
the expelled student posed a threat to the safety of other students or school
staff and could not be placed into a state-funded agency program. Behavior
which constitutes a threat shall include but not be limited to the physical
assault, battery, or abuse of others; the threat of physical force; being under
the influence of drugs or alcohol; the use, possession, sale, or transfer of drugs
or alcohol; the carrying, possessing, or transfer of weapons or dangerous
instruments; and any other behavior which may endanger the safety of others.
Other intervention services as indicated for each student may be provided by
the board or by agreement with the appropriate state or community agency. A
state agency that provides the service shall be responsible for the cost.
(d) 1. In lieu of expelling a student, or upon the expiration of a student's
expulsion, a superintendent may place a student into an alternative
program or setting if the superintendent determines placement of the
student in his or her regular school setting is likely to substantially
disrupt the education process or constitutes a threat to the safety of other
students or school staff. The action shall not be taken until the parent,
Page 76 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
guardian, or other person having legal custody or control of the student
has had an opportunity to have a hearing before the board or an appeals
committee as described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph.
2. The board may adopt a policy to establish an appeals committee and
delegate the authority to hear appeals made under this paragraph to that
committee.
3. The alternative program or setting may be provided virtually.
4. Notwithstanding any other statute or administrative regulation to the
contrary, students placed in an alternative program or setting under this
paragraph shall be counted in attendance and membership for state
funding purposes in the same manner as other students participating in
alternative programs of the district.
5. Students placed in an alternative program or setting under this paragraph
shall be subject to compulsory attendance requirements under KRS
Chapter 159 and applicable local board policy.
6. Following the initial alternative placement of a student under this
paragraph, the board shall review the alternative program or setting
placement at least once per year and determine if the placement should
be continued in accordance with subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
(4) For purposes of this subsection, "charges" means substantiated behavior that falls
within the grounds for suspension or expulsion enumerated in subsection (1) of this
section, including behavior committed by a student while enrolled in a private or
public school, or in a school within another state. A school board may adopt a
policy providing that, if a student is suspended or expelled for any reason or faces
charges that may lead to suspension or expulsion but withdraws prior to a hearing
from any public or private school in this or any other state, the receiving district
may review the details of the charges, suspension, or expulsion and determine if the
Page 77 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
student will be admitted, and if so, what conditions may be imposed upon the
admission, which may include placement of the student into an alternative program
or setting as described in subsection (3)(d) of this section.
(5) (a) School administrators, teachers, or other school personnel may immediately
remove or cause to be removed threatening or violent students from a
classroom setting or from the district transportation system pending any
further disciplinary action that may occur. Each board of education shall adopt
a policy to assure the implementation of this section and to assure the safety
of the students and staff.
(b) Except as described in subsection (10) of this section:
1. A principal may establish procedures for a student's removal from and
reentry to the classroom when the student's behavior disrupts the
classroom environment and education process or the student challenges
the authority of a supervising adult. In addition to removal, the student
shall be subject to further discipline for the behavior consistent with the
school's code of conduct.
2. A student who is removed from the same classroom three (3) times
within a thirty (30) day period shall be considered chronically disruptive
and may be suspended from school in accordance with this section, and
no other basis for suspension shall be deemed necessary.
3. At any time during the school year, for a student who has been removed
from the classroom under this paragraph, a principal may require a
review of the classroom issues with the teacher and the parent, guardian,
or other person having legal custody or control of the student and
determine a course of action for the teacher and student regarding the
student's continued placement in the classroom.
4. At any time during the school year, a principal may permanently remove
Page 78 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
a student from a classroom for the remainder of the school year if the
principal determines the student's continued placement in the classroom
will chronically disrupt the education process for other students.
5. When a student is removed from a classroom under this paragraph
temporarily or permanently, the principal shall determine the placement
of the student in lieu of that classroom, which may include but is not
limited to:
a. Another classroom in that school; or
b. An alternative program or setting, which may be provided
virtually, as approved by the superintendent.
6. Any permanent action by a principal under this paragraph shall be
subject to an appeal process in accordance with a policy adopted by the
board.
7. Policies compliant with this paragraph shall be included in the code of
behavior and discipline adopted by the board of education under KRS
158.148 and the school-based policies adopted by the school
principal[council] under KRS 160.345.
(6) A student shall not be suspended from the common schools until after at least the
following due process procedures have been provided:
(a) The student has been given oral or written notice of the charge or charges
against him or her which constitute cause for suspension;
(b) The student has been given an explanation of the evidence of the charge or
charges if the student denies them; and
(c) The student has been given an opportunity to present his or her own version of
the facts relating to the charge or charges.
These due process procedures shall precede any suspension from the common
schools unless immediate suspension is essential to protect persons or property or to
Page 79 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
avoid disruption of the ongoing academic process. In such cases, the due process
procedures outlined above shall follow the suspension as soon as practicable, but no
later than three (3) school days after the suspension.
(7) (a) The superintendent, principal, assistant principal, or head teacher of any
school may suspend a student but shall report the action in writing
immediately to the superintendent and to the parent, guardian, or other person
having legal custody or control of the student.
(b) 1. The board of education of any school district may expel or extend the
expulsion of any student for misconduct as described in subsection (1)
of this section, but the action shall not be taken until the parent,
guardian, or other person having legal custody or control of the student
has had an opportunity to have a hearing before the board. The decision
of the board shall be final.
2. Within thirty (30) days prior to the end of a student's expulsion, the
board shall review the details of the expulsion and current factors and
circumstances, including if ending the expulsion will substantially
disrupt the education process or constitute a threat to the safety of
students or school staff, to determine if the expulsion shall be extended
for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months.
3. The expulsion review process shall be used prior to the end of each
expulsion period until the board ends the expulsion or the student is no
longer subject to compulsory attendance under KRS 159.010.
4. Each board of education shall adopt a policy for implementation of the
process described in this paragraph.
(8) (a) Suspension of exceptional children, as defined in KRS 157.200, shall be
considered a change of educational placement if:
1. The child is removed for more than ten (10) consecutive days during a
Page 80 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
school year; or
2. The child is subjected to a series of removals that constitute a pattern
because the removals accumulate to more than ten (10) school days
during a school year and because of other factors, such as the length of
each removal, the total amount of time the child is removed, and the
proximity of removals to one another.
(b) The admissions and release committee shall meet to review the placement and
make a recommendation for continued placement or a change in placement
and determine whether regular suspension or expulsion procedures apply.
Additional evaluations shall be completed, if necessary.
(c) If the admissions and release committee determines that an exceptional child's
behavior is related to his or her disability, the child shall not be suspended any
further or expelled unless the current placement could result in injury to the
child, other children, or the educational personnel, in which case an
appropriate alternative placement shall be provided that will provide for the
child's educational needs and will provide a safe learning and teaching
environment for all. If the admissions and release committee determines that
the behavior is not related to the disability, the local educational agency may
pursue its regular suspension or expulsion procedure for the child, if the
behavior so warrants. However, educational services shall not be terminated
during a period of expulsion and during a suspension after a student is
suspended for more than a total of ten (10) days during a school year. A
district may seek temporary injunctive relief through the courts if the parent
and the other members of the admissions and release committee cannot agree
upon a placement and the current placement will likely result in injury to the
student or others.
(9) Suspension of primary school students shall be considered only in exceptional cases
Page 81 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
where there are safety issues for the child or others.
(10) Any action under this section related to students with disabilities shall be in
compliance with applicable federal law.
(11) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be interpreted or construed to preclude the
requirements contained in KRS 158.305 or 158.4416.
Section 19. KRS 158.153 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless the action is taken pursuant to KRS 158.150, no school, school
administrator, teacher, or other school employee shall expel or punish a child based
on information contained in a record of an adjudication of delinquency or
conviction of an offense received by the school pursuant to KRS 610.345 or from
any other source. [Nothing in ]This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a
local school board or school official from instituting disciplinary proceedings
against any student for violating the discipline policy of the school or school district
or taking actions necessary to protect staff and students. Actions to protect staff and
students may be taken only after the principal makes a determination that the
conduct of the student reflected in the records of the school or obtained by the
school from the court indicates a substantial likelihood of an immediate and
continuing threat that the student will cause harm to students or staff, and that the
restrictions to be ordered represent the least restrictive alternative available and
appropriate to remedy the threat, and that the determination and supporting material
be documented in the child's record. The action of the principal, in addition to or in
lieu of any other procedure available, may be appealed by the child or the child's
parent or guardian to the superintendent of the school system or to the Circuit Court
in the county in which the school is located, and the appealing party may be
represented by counsel.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 610.345, no school, school administrator, teacher, or
other school employee who has custody of records received or maintained by the
Page 82 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
school pursuant to KRS 610.345 or who has received information contained in or
relating to a record received by the school pursuant to KRS 610.345 shall disclose
the fact of the record's existence, or any information contained in the record or
received from the record to any other person, including but not limited to other
teachers, school employees, pupils, or parents other than the pupil, or parents of the
pupil who is the subject of the record.
(3) The child and his or her parent or guardian shall have a civil cause of action against
the school board and against any school administrator violating subsection (1) or (2)
of this section or divulging information in violation of KRS 610.345 or 610.340.
This civil cause of action shall be in addition to any other criminal or administrative
remedy provided by law.
(4) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed to prohibit a local board of
education from establishing districtwide standards of behavior for students who
participate in extracurricular and cocurricular activities, including athletics. A
school principal may deny or terminate a student's eligibility to participate in
extracurricular or cocurricular activities if the student has violated the local district
behavior standards or the principal's[council's] criteria for participation, as
described in KRS 160.345(2)(i)8. A student's right to participate in extracurricular
or cocurricular activities, including athletics, may be suspended, pending
investigation of an allegation that the standards of behavior have been violated.
Section 20. KRS 158.162 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Emergency management response plan" or "emergency plan" means a
written document to prevent, mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and recover
from emergencies; and
(b) "First responders" means local fire, police, and emergency medical personnel.
(2) (a) Each local board of education shall require the[ school council or, if none
Page 83 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
exists, the] principal in each school building in his or her[its] jurisdiction to
adopt an emergency plan. The emergency plan shall include:
1. Procedures to be followed in case of medical emergency, fire, severe
weather, earthquake, or a building lockdown as defined in KRS
158.164;
2. A written cardiac emergency response plan; and
3. A copy of the data created through the School Mapping Data Program
pursuant to KRS 158.4433 or, if the school mapping data is unavailable,
a diagram of the facility that clearly identifies the location of each
automated external defibrillator.
(b) The emergency plan shall be provided to appropriate first responders and all
school staff.
(c) The emergency plan shall be reviewed following the end of each school year
by the school nurse, advisory[school] council, the principal, and first
responders and revised as needed.
(d) The principal shall discuss the emergency plan with all school staff prior to
the first instructional day of each school year and document the time and date
of any discussion.
(e) The cardiac emergency response plan shall be rehearsed by simulation prior to
the beginning of each athletic season by all:
1. Licensed athletic trainers, school nurses, and athletic directors; and
2. Interscholastic coaches and volunteer coaches of each athletic team
active during that athletic season.
(f) The emergency plan shall be excluded from the application of KRS 61.870 to
61.884.
(3) Each local board of education shall require the[ school council or, if none exists,
the] principal in each school building to:
Page 84 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(a) Establish primary and secondary evacuation routes for all rooms located
within the school and shall post the routes in each room by any doorway used
for evacuation;
(b) Identify the best available severe weather safe zones, in consultation with
local and state safety officials and informed by guiding principles set forth by
the National Weather Service and the Federal Emergency Management
Agency, and post the location of safe zones in each room of the school;
(c) Develop practices for students to follow during an earthquake;
(d) Develop and adhere to practices to control the access to each school building.
Practices shall include but not be limited to:
1. Controlling outside access to exterior doors during the school day;
2. Controlling the main entrance of the school with electronically locking
doors, a camera, and an intercom system;
3. Controlling access to individual classrooms;
4. Requiring classroom doors to be equipped with hardware that allows the
door to be locked from the outside but opened from the inside;
5. Requiring classroom doors to remain closed and locked during
instructional time, except:
a. In instances in which only one (1) student and one (1) adult are in
the classroom; or
b. When approved in writing by the state school security marshal;
6. Requiring classroom doors with windows to be equipped with material
to quickly cover the window during a building lockdown;
7. Allowing for the use of secondary locking mechanisms on classroom
doors, notwithstanding any provisions of the Kentucky Building Code
promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 198B to the contrary;
8. Requiring all visitors to report to the front office of the building, provide
Page 85 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
valid identification, and state the purpose of the visit; and
9. Providing a visitor's badge to be visibly displayed on a visitor's outer
garment;
(e) Maintain a portable automated external defibrillator in a public, readily
accessible, well-marked location in every school building and, as funds
become available, at school-sanctioned athletic practices and competitions
and:
1. Adopt procedures for the use of the portable automated external
defibrillator during an emergency;
2. Adopt policies for compliance with KRS 311.665 to 311.669 on
training, maintenance, notification, and communication with the local
emergency medical services system;
3. Ensure that a minimum of three (3) employees in the school and all
interscholastic athletic coaches be trained on the use of a portable
automated external defibrillator in accordance with KRS 311.667;
4. Ensure that all interscholastic athletic coaches maintain a
cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification recognized by a national
accrediting body on heart health; and
5. No later than November 1 of each school year, submit an annual report
to the Kentucky Department of Education on:
a. The number and location of each portable automated external
defibrillator in every school building;
b. The name, school, and training date of each school district
employee and interscholastic athletic coach in the district trained
in the use of a portable automated external defibrillator; and
c. The progress made towards having a portable automated external
defibrillator at all school-sanctioned athletic practices and
Page 86 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
competitions; and
(f) Require development of an event-specific emergency action plan for each
school-sanctioned nonathletic event held off-campus to be used during a
medical emergency, which may include the provision of a portable automated
external defibrillator. The plan shall:
1. Include a delineation of the roles of staff and emergency personnel,
methods of communication, any assigned emergency equipment
including a portable automated external defibrillator, a cardiac
emergency response plan, and access to and plan for emergency
transport; and
2. Be in writing and distributed to any member of school personnel
attending the school-sanctioned event in an official capacity.
(4) All schools shall be in compliance with the provisions of subsection (3)(d) of this
section.
(5) (a) Each local board of education shall require the principal in each public school
building in its jurisdiction to conduct, at a minimum, emergency response
drills to include:
1. One (1) severe weather drill, one (1) earthquake drill, and one (1)
lockdown drill within the first thirty (30) instructional days of each
school year and again during the month of January; and
2. The emergency response plan rehearsal by simulation required by
subsection (2) of this section and the venue-specific emergency action
plan rehearsal by simulation required by KRS 160.445(5) prior to the
beginning of each athletic season.
(b) Required fire drills shall be conducted according to administrative regulations
promulgated by the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
Whenever possible, first responders shall be invited to observe emergency
Page 87 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
response drills.
(6) No later than November 1 of each school year, a local district superintendent shall
send verification to the Kentucky Department of Education that all schools within
the district are in compliance with the requirements of this section.
(7) A district with a school not in compliance with the requirements of subsection
(3)(d) of this section by July 1, 2022, shall not be eligible for approval by the
Kentucky Department of Education for new building construction or expansion in
the 2022-2023 school year and any subsequent year without verification of
compliance, except for facility improvements that specifically address the school
safety and security requirements of this section, when deemed necessary for the
protection of student or staff health and safety, or to comply with other legal
requirements or orders.
Section 21. KRS 158.164 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "building lockdown" means to restrict the mobility of
building occupants to maintain their safety and care.
(2) Each local board of education shall require the[ school council or, if none exists,
the] principal in each public school building in his or her[its] jurisdiction to
establish procedures to perform a building lockdown, including protective measures
to be taken during and immediately following the lockdown. Local law enforcement
agencies shall be invited to assist in establishing lockdown procedures.
(3) Students, certified staff, and classified staff shall be informed annually of building
lockdown procedures.
(4) A building lockdown practice shall be held at least twice during each school year,
with at least one (1) practice being held within the first thirty (30) instructional days
of the school year and one (1) practice being held during the month of January.
Section 22. KRS 158.186 is amended to read as follows:
Before September 15 of each year, the commissioner of education shall:
Page 88 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(1) Email[E-mail] electronic copies or send paper copies of KRS 158.183 and 158.195
directly to each local school board, school principal, advisory[ school-based
decision making] council, and certified employee in Kentucky; and
(2) Certify compliance with this section to the Interim Joint Committee on Education
by submitting to the committee:
(a) A copy of all materials, other than the statutes, sent as part of the notice; and
(b) The dates materials were sent.
Section 23. KRS 158.197 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A school principal[school-based decision making council] under administrative
regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education may offer students in grade nine
(9) or above:
(a) An elective social studies course on the Hebrew Scriptures, Old Testament of
the Bible;
(b) An elective social studies course on the New Testament of the Bible; or
(c) An elective social studies course on the Hebrew Scriptures and the New
Testament of the Bible.
(2) The purpose of a course under this section is to:
(a) Teach students knowledge of biblical content, characters, poetry, and
narratives that are prerequisites to understanding contemporary society and
culture, including literature, art, music, mores, oratory, and public policy; and
(b) Familiarize students with, as applicable:
1. The contents of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament;
2. The history of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament;
3. The literary style and structure of the Hebrew Scriptures or New
Testament; and
4. The influence of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament on law,
history, government, literature, art, music, customs, morals, values, and
Page 89 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
culture.
(3) A student shall not be required to use a specific translation as the sole text of the
Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament and may use as the basic textbook a different
translation of the Hebrew Scriptures or New Testament from that chosen by the
advisory[school] council.
(4) A course offered under this section shall follow applicable law and all federal and
state guidelines in maintaining religious neutrality and accommodating the diverse
religious views, traditions, and perspectives of students in the school. A course
under this section shall not endorse, favor, or promote, or disfavor or show hostility
toward, any particular religion or nonreligious faith or religious perspective. A
school principal[school-based decision making council], in complying with this
section, shall not violate any provision of the United States Constitution or federal
law, the Kentucky Constitution or any state law, or any administrative regulations
of the United States Department of Education or the Kentucky Department of
Education.
(5) [Any school council organized pursuant to KRS 160.345 or, if none exists, ]The
principal[,] may authorize the display of historic artifacts, monuments, symbols,
and texts, including but not limited to religious materials, in conjunction with a
course of study that includes an elective course in history, civilization, ethics,
comparative religion, literature, or other subject area that uses such artifacts,
monuments, symbols, and texts as instructional material if the display is:
(a) Appropriate to the overall educational purpose of the course; and
(b) Consistent with the requirements of KRS 42.705.
Section 24. KRS 158.301 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly finds that:
(a) The chief cause of skin cancer is exposure to ultraviolet rays from natural
sunlight and artificial sources;
Page 90 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(b) According to the American Cancer Society, skin cancer is one (1) of the most
common types of cancer in the United States, with one (1) in five (5)
Americans developing skin cancer in his or her lifetime and one (1) American
dying from skin cancer every hour;
(c) The lifetime risk of getting skin cancer is linked to sun exposure and sunburn
during childhood and adolescence;
(d) World and national health organizations have published guidelines or
instructional materials regarding sun safety and skin cancer prevention for
schools; and
(e) Schools have the potential to positively influence pupil behavior regarding
skin cancer prevention.
(2) The General Assembly hereby encourages each public school to provide age-
appropriate education to all students on the risks associated with exposure to
ultraviolet rays from natural sunlight and artificial sources.
(a) The education should be included within the existing health curriculum as
required by KRS 156.160(1)(a) and in accordance with the curriculum policy
adopted by the[ school-based decision making council or, if none exists, by
the] school principal.
(b) The education should be consistent with guidelines published by world or
national health organizations and should include, but not be limited to:
1. The facts and statistics about skin cancer;
2. The cause and impact of skin cancer; and
3. Strategies and behaviors to reduce individual risks for skin cancer.
(c) The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide instructional resources,
including information from national standards and health organizations.
Section 25. KRS 158.4414 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Local boards of education, school district superintendents, administrators of state-
Page 91 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
controlled facilities, and local and state law enforcement agencies shall cooperate to
assign one (1) or more certified school resource officers to serve each campus
where one (1) or more school buildings are used to deliver instruction to students on
a continuous basis.
(2) Local boards of education shall ensure, for each campus in the district, that at least
one (1) certified school resource officer is assigned to and working on-site full-time
in the school building or buildings on the campus. If sufficient funds and qualified
personnel are not available for this purpose for every campus, the local board of
education shall fulfill the requirements of this subsection on a per campus basis, as
approved in writing by the state school security marshal, until a certified school
resource officer is assigned to and working on-site full-time on each campus in the
district.
(3) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a local board of education that is unable
to meet the requirement of subsection (2) of this section may, after consultation
with and approval by the state school security marshal, employ one (1) or more
guardians pursuant to KRS 158.4431 to provide safety and security measures for
schools within the district. The use of guardians under this subsection shall not be
used to replace the certified school resource officer required under subsection (2) of
this section, but only to provide safety and security resources until a certified school
resource officer is available.
(4) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a local board of education that has met
the requirement of subsection (2) of this section may employ one (1) or more
guardians pursuant to KRS 158.4431 to provide additional school safety and
security measures within the district.
(5) Local boards of education utilizing a school resource officer employed by a law
enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police shall enter into a
memorandum of understanding with the law enforcement agency or the Department
Page 92 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
of Kentucky State Police that specifically states the purpose of the school resource
officer program and clearly defines the roles and expectations of each party
involved in the program. The memorandum shall provide that the school resource
officer shall not be responsible for school discipline matters that are the
responsibility of school administrators or school employees.
(6) Local boards of education utilizing a school resource officer employed directly by
the local board of education shall adopt policies and procedures that specifically
state the purpose of the school resource officer program and clearly define the roles
and expectations of school resource officers and other school employees.
(7) In accordance with KRS 61.926, 527.020, and 527.070, as applicable, each school
resource officer shall be armed with a firearm, notwithstanding any provision of
local board policy, school-based[local school council] policy, or memorandum of
agreement.
(8) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, in collaboration with the Center for
School Safety, shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish, update, and maintain three (3) levels of training for
certification of school resource officers as follows: School Resource Officer
Training I (SRO I), School Resource Officer Training II (SRO II), and School
Resource Officer Training III (SRO III). Each level shall consist of forty (40) hours
of training, with SRO I to be completed within one (1) year of the date of the
officer's employment and SRO II and SRO III within the subsequent two (2) years.
(9) Course curriculum for school resource officers shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Foundations of school-based law enforcement;
(b) Threat assessment and response;
(c) Youth drug use and abuse;
(d) Social media and cyber security;
(e) School resource officers as teachers and mentors;
Page 93 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(f) Youth mental health awareness;
(g) Diversity and bias awareness training;
(h) Trauma-informed action;
(i) Understanding students with special needs; and
(j) De-escalation strategies.
(10) All school resource officers with active school resource officer certification status
shall successfully complete forty (40) hours of annual in-service training that has
been certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council for school
resource officers.
(11) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that
prevent the officer from completing the in-service training within one (1) year, the
commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training or a designee may
grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days,
in which to complete the training.
(12) Any school resource officer who fails to successfully complete training
requirements within the specified time periods, including any approved time
extensions, shall lose his or her school resource officer certification and shall no
longer serve in the capacity of a school resource officer in a school.
(13) When a school resource officer is deficient in required training, the commissioner
of the Department of Criminal Justice Training or his or her designee shall notify
the council, which shall notify the officer and the officer's employing agency.
(14) A school resource officer who has lost school resource officer certification due
solely to the officer's failure to meet the training requirements of this section may
regain certification status as a school resource officer and may resume service in the
capacity of a school resource officer in a school setting upon successful completion
of the training deficiency.
(15) No later than November 1 of each year, the local school district superintendent shall
Page 94 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
report to the Center for School Safety the number and placement of school resource
officers in the district. The report shall include the source of funding and method of
employment for each position.
(16) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be interpreted or construed to require a local
government or any of its agencies or offices to fund the school resource officer
positions required of local boards of education under this section. For purposes of
this subsection, "local government" has the same meaning as in KRS 65.8840.
(17) [Nothing in ]This section shall not prevent a private or parochial school from
entering into a memorandum of understanding with a local law enforcement agency
or the Department of Kentucky State Police to provide school resource officers
employed by the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky
State Police.
Section 26. KRS 158.445 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each local school shall conduct an assessment of school safety and student
discipline including a review of the following:
(a) Reports of school incidents relating to disruptive behaviors;
(b) The school's behavior and discipline codes for clarity and appropriate notice
to students and parents;
(c) The school's hierarchy of responses to discipline problems and actual
disciplinary outcomes;
(d) Training needs for instructional staff in classroom management, student
learning styles, and other specialized training to enhance teachers' capacity to
engage students and minimize disruptive behavior;
(e) The array of school services to students at risk of academic failure, dropping
out, or truancy;
(f) The engagement of parents at the earliest stages of problem behavior;
(g) Training needs for students in the development of core values and qualities of
Page 95 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
good character, anger reduction, conflict resolution, peer mediation, and other
necessary skills;
(h) Training needs of parents;
(i) Existing school-based[school council] policies relating to student discipline
and student information;
(j) The school's physical environment;
(k) The school's student supervision plan;
(l) Existing components of the school improvement plan or consolidated plan
that focus on school safety and at-risk students, and the effectiveness of the
components; and
(m) Other data deemed relevant by the advisory[school] council or school
administration.
A school that does not complete an assessment process shall not be eligible for
funds under the state school safety grant program.
(2) Each local school district shall complete a district-level assessment of district-level
data, resources, policies and procedures, and district-wide needs as identified from
the individual school assessment process. The district shall engage local community
agencies including law enforcement and the courts in the assessment process.
(3) As a result of the district assessment and analysis of data, resources, and needs,
each board of education shall adopt a plan for immediate and long-term strategies to
address school safety and discipline. The development of the plan shall involve at
least one (1) representative from each school in the district as well as
representatives from the community as a whole, including representatives from the
local juvenile delinquency prevention council if a council exists in that community.
The process of planning shall be determined locally depending to a large extent on
the size and characteristics of the district.
(4) The district plan under subsection (3) of this section shall be the basis for any
Page 96 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
request for funds under the state school safety grant program. The district plan shall
include the local code of acceptable behavior and discipline and the transportation
services policy as required under KRS 158.148 and a description of instructional
placement options for threatening or violent students.
Section 27. KRS 158.6453 (Effective July 1, 2026) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Accelerated learning" means an organized way of helping students meet
individual academic goals by providing direct instruction to eliminate student
performance deficiencies or enable students to move more quickly through
course requirements and pursue higher level skill development;
(b) "Advanced coursework" means educational programs or opportunities
designed to challenge students with more rigorous content beyond the
standard curriculum, including but not limited to advanced placement,
International Baccalaureate, and honors courses;
(c) "Constructed-response items" or "performance-based items" means individual
test items that require the student to create an answer rather than select a
response and may include fill-in-the-blank, short-answer, extended-answer,
open-response, and writing-on-demand formats;
(d) "Criterion-referenced test" means a test that is aligned with defined academic
content standards and measures an individual student's level of performance
against the standards;
(e) "Formative assessment" means a process used by teachers and students during
instruction to adjust ongoing teaching and learning to improve students'
achievement of intended instructional outcomes. Formative assessments may
include the use of commercial assessments, classroom observations, teacher-
designed classroom tests and assessments, and other processes and
Page 97 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
assignments to gain information about individual student learning;
(f) "Interim assessments" means assessments that are given periodically
throughout the year to provide diagnostic information and to show individual
student performance against content standards;
(g) "Summative assessment" means an assessment given at the end of the school
year, semester, or other period of time to evaluate students' performance
against content standards within a unit of instruction or a course; and
(h) "Writing" means a purposeful act of thinking and expression that uses
language to explore ideas and communicate meaning to others. Writing is a
complex, multifaceted act of communication and is distinct from basic
handwriting or penmanship.
(2) (a) Every six (6) years, the Kentucky Department of Education shall implement a
process for reviewing Kentucky's academic standards and the alignment of
corresponding assessments for possible revision or replacement to ensure
alignment with transition readiness standards necessary for global
competitiveness, state career and technical education standards, and KRS
158.196.
(b) The revisions to the content standards shall:
1. Focus on critical knowledge, skills, and capacities needed for success in
the global economy;
2. Result in fewer but more in-depth standards to facilitate mastery
learning;
3. Communicate expectations more clearly and concisely to teachers,
parents, students, and citizens;
4. Be based on evidence-based research;
5. Consider international benchmarks; and
6. Ensure that the standards are aligned from elementary to high school to
Page 98 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
postsecondary education so that students can be successful at each
education level.
(c) 1. The department shall establish four (4) standards and assessments
review committees, with each committee composed of a minimum of six
(6) Kentucky public school teachers and a minimum of two (2)
representatives from Kentucky institutions of higher education,
including at least one (1) representative from a public institution of
higher education. Each committee member shall teach in the subject
area that his or her committee is assigned to review and have no prior or
current affiliation with a curriculum or assessment resources vendor.
2. One (1) of the four (4) committees shall be assigned to focus on the
review of language arts and writing academic standards and
assessments, one (1) on the review of mathematics academic standards
and assessments, one (1) on the review of science academic standards
and assessments, and one (1) on the review of social studies academic
standards and assessments.
(d) 1. The department shall establish twelve (12) advisory panels to advise and
assist each of the four (4) standards and assessments review committees.
2. Three (3) advisory panels shall be assigned to each standards and
assessments review committee. One (1) panel shall review the standards
and assessments for kindergarten through grade five (5), one (1) shall
review the standards and assessments for grades six (6) through eight
(8), and one (1) shall review the standards and assessments for grades
nine (9) through twelve (12).
3. Each advisory panel shall be composed of at least one (1) representative
from a Kentucky institution of higher education and a minimum of six
(6) Kentucky public school teachers who teach in the grade level and
Page 99 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
subject reviewed by the advisory panel to which they are assigned and
have no prior or current affiliation with a curriculum or assessment
resources vendor.
(e) The commissioner of education and the president of the Council on
Postsecondary Education shall also provide consultants for the standards and
assessments review committees and the advisory panels who are business and
industry professionals actively engaged in career fields that depend on the
various content areas.
(f) 1. The standards and assessments process review committee is hereby
established and shall be composed of the commissioner of education or
designee as a nonvoting member and nine (9) voting representatives of
public schools, of whom at least two (2) shall be parents of public
school students, appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate
in accordance with KRS 11.160 as follows:
a. One (1) language arts teacher;
b. One (1) math teacher;
c. One (1) science teacher;
d. One (1) social studies teacher;
e. Two (2) school principals;
f. Two (2) school superintendents; and
g. One (1) school board member.
2. On making appointments to the committee, the Governor shall ensure
broad geographical urban and rural representation and representation of
elementary, middle, and high school levels; ensure equal representation
of the two (2) sexes, inasmuch as possible; and ensure that appointments
reflect the minority racial composition of the Commonwealth.
3. The review of the committee shall be limited to the procedural aspects
Page 100 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
of the review process undertaken prior to its consideration.
4. Notwithstanding KRS 12.028, the committee shall not be subject to
reorganization by the Governor.
(g) 1. The review process implemented under this subsection shall be an open,
transparent process that allows all Kentuckians an opportunity to
participate. The department shall ensure the public's assistance in
reviewing and suggesting changes to the standards and alignment
adjustments to corresponding state assessments by establishing a
website dedicated to collecting comments by the public and educators.
An independent third party, which has no prior or current affiliation with
a curriculum or assessment resources vendor, shall be selected by the
department to collect and transmit the comments to the department for
dissemination to the appropriate advisory panel for review and
consideration.
2. Each advisory panel shall review the standards and assessments for its
assigned subject matter and grade level and the suggestions made by the
public and educators. After completing its review, each advisory panel
shall make recommendations for changes to the standards and alignment
adjustments for assessments to the appropriate standards and
assessments review committee.
3. Each standards and assessments review committee shall review the
findings and make recommendations to revise or replace existing
standards and to adjust alignment of assessments.
4. The recommendations shall be published on the website established in
this subsection for the purpose of gathering additional feedback from the
public. The commissioner shall subsequently present the
recommendations and the public feedback to the appropriate Interim
Page 101 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
Joint Committee on Education.
5. The commissioner shall subsequently provide a report to the standards
and assessments process review committee summarizing the process
conducted under this subsection and the resulting recommendations. The
report shall include but not be limited to the timeline of the review
process, public feedback, and responses from the appropriate Interim
Joint Committee on Education.
6. After receiving the commissioner's report, the standards and assessments
process review committee shall either concur that stakeholders have had
adequate opportunity to provide input on standards and the
corresponding alignment of state assessments or find the input process
deficient. If the process is found deficient, the recommendations may be
returned to the appropriate standards and assessments review committee
for review as described in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph. If the
process is found sufficient, the recommendations shall be forwarded
without amendment to the Kentucky Board of Education.
(h) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for the administration
of the review process, including staggering the timing and sequence of the
review process by subject area and remuneration of the review committees
and advisory panels described in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(i) 1. The Kentucky Board of Education shall consider for approval the
revisions to academic standards for a content area and the alignment of
the corresponding state assessment once recommendations are received
from the standards and assessments process review committee. Existing
state academic standards shall remain in place until the board approves
new standards.
Page 102 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
2. Any revision to, or replacement of, the academic standards and
assessments as a result of the review process conducted under this
subsection shall be implemented in Kentucky public schools no later
than the second academic year following the review process. Existing
academic standards shall be used until new standards are implemented.
3. The Department of Education shall disseminate the academic content
standards to the schools and teacher preparation programs.
(j) The Department of Education shall provide or facilitate statewide training
sessions for existing teachers and administrators on how to:
1. Integrate the revised content standards into classroom instruction;
2. Better integrate performance assessment of students within their
instructional practices; and
3. Help all students use higher-order thinking and communication skills.
(k) The Education Professional Standards Board in cooperation with the
Kentucky Board of Education and the Council on Postsecondary Education
shall coordinate information and training sessions for faculty and staff in all of
the teacher preparation programs in the use of the revised academic content
standards. The Education Professional Standards Board shall ensure that each
teacher preparation program includes use of the academic standards in the
pre-service education programs and that all teacher interns will have
experience planning classroom instruction based on the revised standards.
(l) The Council on Postsecondary Education in cooperation with the Kentucky
Department of Education and the postsecondary education institutions in the
state shall coordinate information sessions regarding the academic content
standards for faculty who teach in the various content areas.
(m) The Education Professional Standards Board shall, as a condition of program
approval, require teacher preparation programs to align curriculum with the
Page 103 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
expectations set forth in the state's academic content standards.
(3) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education shall be responsible for creating and
implementing a balanced statewide assessment program that measures the
students', schools', and districts' achievement of the goals set forth in KRS
158.645 and 158.6451, to ensure compliance with the federal Every Student
Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its successor, and to ensure
school accountability.
(b) The board shall revise the annual statewide assessment program as needed in
accordance with revised academic standards and corresponding assessment
alignment adjustments approved by the board under subsection (2) of this
section.
(c) The statewide assessments shall not include any academic standards not
approved by the board under subsection (2) of this section.
(d) The board shall seek the advice of the Office of Education Accountability; the
School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council; the Education
Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee, and the department's
technical advisory committee in the development of the assessment program.
The statewide assessment program shall not include measurement of a
student's ability to become a self-sufficient individual or to become a
responsible member of a family, work group, or community.
(4) (a) The academic components of the statewide assessment program shall be
composed of annual student summative tests, which may include a
combination of multiple competency-based assessment and performance
measures approved by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(b) The annual student summative tests shall:
1. Measure individual student achievement in language, reading, English,
mathematics, science, and social studies at designated grades;
Page 104 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
2. Provide teachers and parents a valid and reliable comprehensive analysis
of skills mastered by individual students;
3. Provide diagnostic information that identifies strengths and academic
deficiencies of individual students in the content areas;
4. Provide information to teachers that can enable them to improve
instruction for current and future students;
5. Provide longitudinal profiles for students; and
6. Ensure school and district accountability for student achievement of the
goals set forth in KRS 158.645 and 158.6451, except the statewide
assessment program shall not include measurement of a student's ability
to become a self-sufficient individual or to become a responsible
member of a family, work group, or community.
(5) The state student assessments shall include the following components:
(a) Elementary and middle grades requirements are:
1. A criterion-referenced test each in mathematics and reading in grades
three (3) through eight (8) that is valid and reliable for an individual
student and that measures the depth and breadth of Kentucky's academic
content standards;
2. A criterion-referenced test each in science and social studies that is valid
and reliable for an individual student as necessary to measure the depth
and breadth of Kentucky's academic content standards to be
administered one (1) time within the elementary and middle grades,
respectively;
3. An on-demand assessment of student writing to be administered one (1)
time within the elementary grades and one (1) time within the middle
grades; and
4. An editing and mechanics test relating to writing, using multiple choice
Page 105 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
and constructed response items, to be administered one (1) time within
the elementary and the middle grades, respectively;
(b) High school requirements are:
1. A criterion-referenced test in mathematics, reading, and science that is
valid and reliable for an individual student and that measures the depth
and breadth of Kentucky's academic content standards to be
administered one (1) time within the high school grades;
2. A criterion-referenced test in social studies that is valid and reliable for
an individual student as necessary to measure the depth and breadth of
Kentucky's academic content standards to be administered one (1) time
within the high school grades;
3. An on-demand assessment of student writing to be administered one (1)
time within the high school grades;
4. An editing and mechanics test relating to writing, using multiple choice
and constructed response items, to be administered one (1) time within
the high school grades; and
5. A college admissions examination to assess English, reading,
mathematics, and science in the spring of grade eleven (11);
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall add any other component necessary
to comply with the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95,
or its successor, as determined by the United States Department of Education;
(d) The criterion-referenced components required in this subsection shall be
composed of constructed response items and multiple choice items; and
(e) The results of the assessment program developed under this subsection shall
be used by schools and districts to determine appropriate instructional
modifications for all students in order for students to make continuous
progress, including that needed by advanced learners.
Page 106 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(6) Each school district shall administer the statewide student assessment during the
last fourteen (14) days of school in the district's instructional calendar. The
Kentucky Board of Education may change the testing window to allow for
innovative assessment systems or other online test administration and shall
promulgate administrative regulations that minimize the number of days of testing
and outline the procedures to be used during the testing process to ensure test
security, including procedures for testing makeup days, and to comply with federal
assessment requirements.
(7) A student enrolled in a district-operated or district-contracted alternative program
shall participate in the appropriate assessments required by this section.
(8) A local school district may select and use commercial interim or formative
assessments or develop and use its own formative assessments to provide data on
how well its students are growing toward mastery of Kentucky academic standards,
so long as the district's local school board develops a policy minimizing the
reduction in instructional time related to the administration of the interim
assessments. [Nothing in ]This section shall not preclude[precludes] teachers from
using ongoing teacher-developed formative processes.
(9) Each school that enrolls primary students shall use diagnostic assessments and
prompts that measure readiness in reading and mathematics for its primary students
as determined by the school to be developmentally appropriate. The schools may
use commercial products, use products and procedures developed by the district, or
develop their own diagnostic procedures. The results shall be used to inform the
teachers and parents or guardians of each student's skill level.
(10) The state board shall ensure that a technically sound longitudinal comparison of the
assessment results for the same students shall be made available.
(11) The following provisions shall apply to the college admissions examination
described in subsection (5)(b)5. of this section:
Page 107 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(a) The cost of the college admissions examination administered to students in
high school shall be paid for by the Kentucky Department of Education. The
costs of additional college admissions examinations shall be the responsibility
of the student;
(b) If funds are available, the Kentucky Department of Education shall provide a
college admissions examination preparation program to all public high school
juniors. The department may contract for necessary services; and
(c) Accommodations provided to a student with a disability taking the college
admissions assessment under this subsection shall consist of:
1. Accommodations provided in a manner allowed by the college
admissions assessment provider when results in test scores are
reportable to a postsecondary institution for admissions and placement
purposes, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph; or
2. Accommodations provided in a manner allowed by a student's
individualized education program as defined in KRS 158.281 for a
student whose disability precludes valid assessment of his or her
academic abilities using the accommodations provided under
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph when the student's scores are not
reportable to a postsecondary institution for admissions and placement
purposes.
(12) Kentucky teachers shall have a significant role in providing feedback about the
design of the assessments, except for the college admissions exam described in
subsection (5)(b)5. of this section. The assessments shall be designed to:
(a) Measure grade appropriate core academic content, basic skills, and higher-
order thinking skills and their application;
(b) Provide valid and reliable scores for schools. If scores are reported for
students individually, they shall be valid and reliable;
Page 108 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(c) Minimize the time spent by teachers and students on assessment; and
(d) Assess Kentucky academic standards only.
(13) The results from assessment under subsections (3) and (5) of this section shall be
reported to the school districts and schools no later than seventy-five (75) days
following the last day the assessment can be administered. Assessment reports
provided to the school districts and schools shall include an electronic copy of an
operational subset of test items from each assessment administered to their students
and the results for each of those test items by student and by school.
(14) The Department of Education shall gather information to establish the validity of
the assessment and accountability program. It shall develop a biennial plan for
validation studies that shall include but not be limited to the consistency of student
results across multiple measures, the congruence of school scores with documented
improvements in instructional practice and the school learning environment, and the
potential for all scores to yield fair, consistent, and accurate student performance
level and school accountability decisions. Validation activities shall take place in a
timely manner and shall include a review of the accuracy of scores assigned to
students and schools, as well as of the testing materials. The plan shall be submitted
to the Commission by July 1 of the first year of each biennium. A summary of the
findings shall be submitted to the Legislative Research Commission by September
1 of the second year of the biennium.
(15) The Department of Education and the state board shall offer optional assistance to
local school districts and schools in developing and using continuous assessment
strategies needed to ensure student progress. The continuous assessment shall
provide diagnostic information to improve instruction to meet the needs of
individual students.
(16) The Administration Code for Kentucky's Assessment Program shall include
prohibitions of inappropriate test preparation activities by school district employees
Page 109 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
charged with test administration and oversight, including but not limited to the issue
of teachers being required to do test practice in lieu of regular classroom instruction
and test practice outside the normal work day. The code shall include disciplinary
sanctions that may be taken toward a school or individuals.
(17) The Kentucky Board of Education, after the Department of Education has received
advice from the Office of Education Accountability; the School Curriculum,
Assessment, and Accountability Council; and the department's technical advisory
committee, shall promulgate an administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A
to establish the components of a reporting structure for assessments administered
under this section. The reporting structure shall include the following components:
(a) A school report card that clearly communicates with parents and the public
about school performance. The school report card shall be sent to the parents
of the students of the districts, and information on electronic access to a
summary of the results for the district shall be published in the newspaper
with the largest circulation in the county. It shall include but not be limited to
the following components reported by race, gender, and disability when
appropriate:
1. Student academic achievement, including the results from each of the
assessments administered under this section;
2. For Advanced Placement, Cambridge Advanced International, and
International Baccalaureate, the courses offered, the number of students
enrolled, completing, and taking the examination for each course, and
the percentage of examinees receiving a score of three (3) or better on
AP examinations, a score of "e" or better on Cambridge Advanced
International examinations, or a score of four (4) or better on IB
examinations. The data shall be disaggregated by gender, race, students
with disabilities, and economic status;
Page 110 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
3. Nonacademic achievement, including the school's attendance, retention,
graduation rates, and student transition to postsecondary;
4. School learning environment, including measures of parental
involvement; and
5. Any other school performance data required by the Every Student
Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its successor;
(b) An individual student report to parents for each student in grades three (3)
through eight (8) summarizing the student's skills in reading, science, social
studies, and mathematics. The school's staff shall develop a plan for
accelerated learning for any student with identified deficiencies or strengths;
and
(c) A student's score on the college admissions assessment administered under
subsection (5)(b)5. of this section.
(18) (a) Every six (6) years, the Kentucky Department of Education shall implement a
comprehensive process for reviewing and revising the academic standards in
visual and performing arts and practical living skills and career studies for all
levels and in foreign language for middle and high schools. The department
shall develop review committees for the standards for each of the content
areas that include representation from certified specialist public school
teachers and postsecondary teachers in those subject areas.
(b) The academic standards in practical living skills for elementary, middle, and
high school levels shall include a focus on drug abuse prevention, with an
emphasis on the prescription drug epidemic and the connection between
prescription opioid abuse and addiction to other drugs, such as heroin and
synthetic drugs.
(c) The department shall provide to all schools guidelines for programs that
incorporate the adopted academic standards in visual and performing arts and
Page 111 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
practical living and career studies. The department shall provide to middle and
high schools guidelines for including a foreign language program. The
guidelines shall address program length and time, courses offered, staffing,
resources, and facilities.
(d) The Kentucky Department of Education, in consultation with certified public
school teachers of visual and performing arts, may develop program standards
for the visual and performing arts.
(19) The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide to all school districts
guidelines for including an effective writing program within the curriculum.
(20) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education, in consultation with the review
committees described in subsection (18) of this section, shall develop a school
profile report to be used by all schools to document how they will address the
adopted academic standards in their implementation of the programs as
described in subsection (18) of this section, which may include student
opportunities and experiences in extracurricular activities. The department
shall include the essential workplace ethics program on the school profile
report.
(b) By October 1 of each year, each school principal shall complete the school
profile report, which shall be signed by[ the members of the school council,
or] the principal[ if no school council exists,] and the superintendent. The
report shall be electronically transmitted to the Kentucky Department of
Education, and the original shall be maintained on file at the local board office
and made available to the public upon request. The department shall include a
link to each school's profile report on its website.
(c) If a school staff member, student, or a student's parent has concerns regarding
deficiencies in a school's implementation of the programs described in
subsection (18) of this section, he or she may submit a written inquiry to the
Page 112 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
school principal[council].
(21) (a) No later than December 1, 2025, each local board of education shall adopt a
district plan establishing clear policies on the promotion of advanced
coursework or accelerated learning in language arts, mathematics, social
studies, and science by grade level for students in grades four (4) to twelve
(12).
(b) The district plan required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:
1. Be published on a publicly accessible location on the district website;
2. Describe the strategies and approach to advanced coursework or
accelerated learning options by grade level for language arts,
mathematics, social studies, and science; and
3. Require that the service delivery options for students identified as gifted
and talented in language arts, mathematics, social studies, and science
include the following for each grade level and subject area:
a. i. Accelerated learning; or
ii. Advanced coursework; and
b. At least one (1) of the following service delivery options:
i. Collaborative teaching and consultation services;
ii. Special counseling services;
iii. Differentiated study experiences for individuals and cluster
groups in the regular classroom;
iv. Distance learning;
v. Enrichment services that are not extracurricular during the
school day;
vi. Independent study;
vii. Mentorships;
viii. Resource services delivered in a pull-out classroom or other
Page 113 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
appropriate instructional setting;
ix. Seminars;
x. Travel study options; or
xi. Special schools or self-contained classrooms for students in
grades four (4) through twelve (12) only.
(c) The district plan required by paragraph (a) of this subsection may:
1. Automatically enroll a student who scores distinguished in any subject
area on the most recent statewide assessment for which scores are
available in available advanced coursework for that subject area and any
corresponding subject area designated by the local board of education;
2. Include eligibility criteria for qualification for available advanced
coursework for all other students;
3. Require written consent from a parent or guardian of a student to
withdraw or exclude a student that is eligible for advanced coursework
according to the district plan from that advanced coursework. If a
student requests to withdraw from advanced coursework to pursue
another educational opportunity, a principal may withdraw the student
without written consent from a parent or guardian only after a good-faith
attempt to contact the parent or guardian is unsuccessful; and
4. Permit a principal to withdraw a student from advanced coursework
without written consent from his or her parent or guardian if the
student's participation in advanced coursework would have an adverse
educational impact on a student, including interference with his or her
career pathway, access to career and technical education coursework, or
another educational opportunity.
(22) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education may promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer the provisions of
Page 114 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
subsection (21) of this section.
(b) By December 1, 2025, the Kentucky Department of Education, in
collaboration with local school districts, shall establish school district
recommendations for the consistent use of preliminary assessment data and
other criteria to identify students prepared for advanced coursework.
Section 28. KRS 158.649 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "achievement gap" means the difference between
performance goals and actual performance on each of the tested areas by grade
level of the state assessment program for each of the various subgroups of students
as described in the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its
successor, including male and female students, students with and without
disabilities, students with and without English proficiency, minority and
nonminority students, and students who are eligible for free and reduced lunch and
those who are not eligible for free and reduced lunch.
(2) By October 1 of each year, the Department of Education shall provide each school[
council, or the] principal[ if a school council does not exist,] data on his or her[its]
students' performance as shown by the state assessment program described in KRS
158.6453. The data shall include but not be limited to information on performance
levels of all students tested, and information on the performance of students
disaggregated by race, gender, disability, English proficiency, and participation in
the federal free and reduced price lunch program, and any other subgroups as
described in the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its
successor. The information from the department shall include an equity analysis
that shall identify the substantive differences among the various groups of students
identified in subsection (1) of this section. Beginning with the 2012-2013 school
year, the reporting requirement in this subsection shall be no later than seventy-five
(75) days following the first day the assessment can be administered.
Page 115 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(3) Each local board of education upon the recommendation of the local district
superintendent shall adopt a policy for reviewing the academic performance on the
state assessments required under KRS 158.6453 for various groups of students,
including major racial groups, gender, disability, free and reduced price school
lunch eligibility, and limited English proficiency. The local board policy shall be
consistent with Kentucky Board of Education administrative regulations. Upon
agreement of[ the school-based decision making council, or] the principal[ if there
is not a council,] and the superintendent, the local board shall establish an annual
target for each school for reducing identified gaps in achievement as set out in
subsection (4) of this section.
(4) By February 1 of each year,[ the school-based decision making council, or] the
principal[ if there is not a council,] with the involvement of the advisory council
and any other interested parents, faculty, and staff shall set the school's targets for
eliminating any achievement gap and submit them to the superintendent for
consideration. The superintendent and[ the school-based decision making council,
or] the principal[ if there is not a council,] shall agree on the targets before they are
submitted to the local board of education for adoption.
(5) By January 1 of each year,[ the school council, or] the principal[ if a school council
does not exist,] with the involvement of the advisory council and any other
interested parents, faculty, and staff, shall review the data and revise the school
improvement plan to include the targets, strategies, activities, and a time schedule
calculated to eliminate the achievement gap among various groups of students to
the extent it may exist. The plan shall include but not be limited to activities
designed to address the following areas:
(a) Curriculum alignment within the school and with schools that send or receive
the school's students;
(b) Evaluation and assessment strategies to continuously monitor and modify
Page 116 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
instruction to meet student needs and support proficient student work;
(c) Professional development to address the goals of the plan;
(d) Parental communication and involvement;
(e) Attendance improvement and dropout prevention; and
(f) Technical assistance that will be accessed.
(6) The principal shall convene a public meeting at the school to present and discuss
the plan prior to submitting it to the superintendent and the local board of education
for review, in the public meeting required under KRS 160.340.
(7) Based on the disaggregated assessment results, the local board shall determine if
each school achieved its targets for each group of students. Only data for a group of
students including ten (10) or more students shall be considered.
(8) Notwithstanding KRS 160.345(7)[(8)] and 158.070(7), if a local board determines
that a school has not met its target to reduce the identified gap in student
achievement for a group of students, the local board shall require[ the council, or]
the principal[ if no council exists,] to submit his or her[its] revisions to the school
improvement plan describing the use of professional development funds and funds
allocated for continuing education to reduce the school's achievement gap for
review and approval by the superintendent. The plan shall address how the school
will meet the academic needs of the students in the various groups identified in
subsection (1) of this section.
(9) The superintendent shall report to the local school board and the commissioner of
education if a school fails to meet its targets in any academic content area to reduce
the gap in student achievement for any student group for two (2) consecutive years.
The school's improvement plan shall be subject to review and approval by the
Kentucky Department of Education and the school shall submit an annual status
report. The Department of Education may provide assistance as defined in KRS
160.346 to schools as it deems necessary to assist the school in meeting its goals.
Page 117 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(10) [The school-based decision making council, or ]The principal[ if there is not a
council,] shall not[no longer] be required to seek approval of the plan under
subsections (8) and (9) of this section when his or her school[it] meets its target for
reducing the gap in student achievement for the various groups of students
identified in subsection (1) of this section.
Section 29. KRS 158.792 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and KRS 164.0207, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Comprehensive reading program" means any print, nonprint, or electronic
medium of reading instruction designed to assist students. For students in
kindergarten through grade three (3), program instructional resources shall
include instruction in five (5) key areas: phonemic awareness, phonics,
fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension;
(b) "Reading diagnostic assessment" means an assessment that measures a
student's skills against established performance levels in essential components
of reading and identifies students that require intervention in at least one (1)
of those components to accelerate the student's progress toward proficient
performance in reading;
(c) "Reading intervention program" means short-term intensive instruction in the
essential skills necessary to read proficiently that is provided to a student by a
highly trained teacher. This instruction may be conducted one-on-one or in
small groups; shall be evidence-based, reliable, and replicable; and shall be
based on the ongoing assessment of individual student needs; and
(d) "Reliable, replicable evidence" means objective, valid, scientific studies that:
1. Include rigorously defined samples of subjects that are sufficiently large
and representative to support the general conclusions drawn;
2. Rely on measurements that meet established standards of reliability and
validity;
Page 118 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
3. Test competing theories, where multiple theories exist;
4. Are subjected to peer review before their results are published; and
5. Discover effective strategies for improving reading skills.
(2) The reading diagnostic and intervention fund is created to help teachers and library
media specialists improve the reading skills of struggling readers in kindergarten
through grade three (3) and to assist schools in employing reading interventionists
who specialize in providing those services. The Department of Education, upon the
recommendation of the Reading Diagnostic and Intervention Grant Steering
Committee, shall provide renewable, two (2) year grants to schools to support
teachers and reading interventionists in the implementation of reliable, replicable
evidence-based reading intervention programs that use a balance of diagnostic tools
and instructional strategies that emphasize phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency,
vocabulary, comprehension, and connections between writing and reading
acquisition and motivation to read to address the diverse learning needs of those
students reading at low levels. Any moneys in the fund at the close of the fiscal year
shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to be used for the purposes specified in
this section.
(3) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative
regulations, based on recommendations from the Department of Education
that shall include but not be limited to a school selection process with a focus
on those with the most need, professional learning supports in literacy, and
early reading instruction to:
1. Identify eligible grant applicants, taking into consideration how the
grant program described in this section will relate to other grant
programs;
2. Specify the criteria for acceptable reading and literacy diagnostic
assessments and intervention programs;
Page 119 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
3. Specify the criteria for acceptable ongoing assessment of each child to
determine his or her reading progress;
4. Establish the minimum evaluation process for an annual review of each
grant recipient's program and progress;
5. Identify the annual data that must be provided from grant recipients;
6. Define the application review and approval process;
7. Establish matching requirements deemed necessary;
8. Define the professional development and continuing education
requirements for teachers, library media specialists, administrators, and
staff of grant recipients;
9. Establish the conditions for renewal of a two (2) year grant; and
10. Specify other conditions necessary to implement the purposes of this
section.
(b) The board shall require that a grant applicant provide assurances that the
following principles will be met if the applicant's request for funding is
approved:
1. An evidence-based comprehensive schoolwide reading program will be
available;
2. Intervention services will supplement, not replace, regular classroom
instruction;
3. Intervention services will be provided to struggling kindergarten through
grade three (3) readers within the school based upon ongoing assessment
of their needs; and
4. A system for informing parents of struggling readers of the available
family literacy services within the district will be established.
(c) The board shall not restrict how a grant applicant utilizes grant funds as it
relates to the applicant's use of funds for professional development, resources,
Page 120 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
tools, employment of reading interventionists, and other expenses authorized
by this section. The grant applicant shall have discretion in allocating grant
funds for purposes authorized by this section; however, the board may
consider the effectiveness of those uses in reviewing the application.
(4) In order to qualify for funding,[ the school council, or if none exists,] the principal
or the superintendent of schools, shall allocate matching funds required by grant
recipients under subsection (3) of this section. Funding for professional
development allocated to the school principal[council] under KRS 160.345 and for
continuing education under KRS 158.070 may be used as part of the school's match.
(5) The Department of Education shall make available to schools:
(a) Information concerning successful, evidence-based comprehensive reading
programs, diagnostic tools for pre- and post-assessment, and intervention
programs, from the statewide reading research center established under KRS
164.0207;
(b) Strategies for successfully implementing early reading programs, including
professional development support and the identification of funding sources;
and
(c) A list of professional development providers offering teacher training related
to reading that emphasizes the essential components for successful reading:
phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, comprehension, and
connections between writing and reading acquisition and motivation to read.
(6) The Department of Education shall submit a report to the appropriate Interim Joint
Committee on Education no later than November 1 of each year outlining the use of
grant funds. The annual report for an odd-numbered year shall include an estimate
of the cost to expand the reading diagnostic and intervention fund.
(7) The Department of Education shall report program data to an external evaluator for
analysis of the program's success in meeting the goal of increasing early literacy
Page 121 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
student outcomes.
Section 30. KRS 158.7992 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Education shall establish a program that promotes the
integration of the arts and foreign languages in the elementary school program. A
school shall submit an application through the district superintendent, with the
agreement of the school[ council or of the] principal[, if a council does not exist].
The department shall award a grant to at least one (1) school per region based on
the quality of the application in meeting the criteria established in subsection (2) of
this section. Special consideration shall be given, but not limited to, a school that
does not have an existing comprehensive arts and foreign language program.
(2) School programs under subsection (1) of this section shall include, but not be
limited to, the following components:
(a) Instruction in each of the four (4) disciplines of dance, drama, music, and the
visual arts that includes the core content skills and knowledge taught in a
sequential manner and includes all students in the elementary school;
(b) Intense instruction in at least one (1) foreign language that includes skills and
knowledge related to communicative language and culture and includes all
students in the elementary school;
(c) Integration of arts and foreign language instruction across the curriculum;
(d) Coordination of the programs by teachers with appropriate arts and foreign
language certification;
(e) Professional development for teachers and administrators designed to
facilitate the effective teaching of arts and foreign languages;
(f) An effective monitoring and evaluation system that includes student
performance assessment;
(g) Partnerships with parents, local cultural agencies, individual artists, and native
speakers of the foreign language who work in collaboration with classroom
Page 122 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
teachers;
(h) Support from the local school board, the school principal, the
advisory[school] council, and teachers; and
(i) Student attendance at one (1) or more live performance or visual art exhibition
each school year.
(3) The Department of Education shall report annually by July 1 of each year on the
implementation of the program to the Governor and the Legislative Research
Commission.
Section 31. KRS 158.860 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Core course" means any course offered in the middle grades or high school
grades that is a specific high school graduation requirement or a course that
may be used to fulfill a minimum graduation requirement in the content areas
of language arts, mathematics, science, and social studies as specified in
administrative regulation promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education
under the provisions of KRS 156.160; and
(b) "End-of-course examination" or "end-of-course exam" means a test that
measures a student's knowledge and skills upon completion of a core content
course.
(2) The Kentucky Department of Education shall coordinate the development of end-
of-course exams.
(a) The development process shall initially include end-of-course exams for
Algebra I, Algebra II, and Geometry.
(b) Content teachers in the core courses, postsecondary faculty including subject
matter specialists as well as teacher educators, curriculum specialists, and
other appropriate practitioners shall be involved in the development and
review of items for the exams. Content teachers shall comprise the majority of
Page 123 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
the developers and reviewers of the test items.
(c) The department shall ensure that each end-of-course exam:
1. Aligns with the standards, content, goals, and academic expectations
relevant to the course;
2. Requires student demonstration of knowledge, comprehension,
application, and higher order cognitive skills;
3. Provides reliable and valid test items;
4. Is available to schools in an on-line format if resources are available;
and
5. Provides individual student scores; test item analyses; aggregate
comparisons of student data at the school, district, and state levels; and
disaggregated data by student subpopulations at the school district and
state levels.
(d) The department shall make available a parallel form for each exam.
(e) The initial end-of-course exam developed as required in paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall be available and piloted in selected school districts no later
than the end of the 2007-2008 school year.
(3) The department may contract for services as deemed necessary to fulfill its duties
under this section.
(4) The Kentucky Department of Education shall conduct a study of the end-of-course
examinations and the processes used during the pilot of the exams.
(a) Following the initial use of the end-of-course exams in Algebra 1, Algebra II,
and Geometry, the department, with assistance from the developers identified
in subsection (2)(b) of this section, shall determine whether the exams meet
the requirements in subsection (2)(c) of this section. The determination shall
be based on an analysis of individual test items, analyses of student results on
the exams, pilot teachers' input, and review of other data gathered during the
Page 124 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
pilot year.
(b) The department shall consult with the Education Assessment and
Accountability Review Subcommittee, the National Technical Advisory Panel
on Assessment and Accountability, and the School Curriculum, Assessment,
and Accountability Council regarding the implications for statewide
implementation and shall advise the Kentucky Board of Education of its
findings and recommendations.
(c) Following the consultations and discussions required in paragraphs (a) and (b)
of this subsection, the commissioner of education shall report the findings of
the pilot project and policy options to the appropriate Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
(5) End-of-course exams in the pilot period shall not be used as a criterion for formally
evaluating or compensating teachers. Student results may be discussed during the
formative evaluation stage in compliance with KRS 156.557.
(6) The department shall develop the test procedures, including testing
accommodations for students with special needs, retest provisions, reporting
requirements, and other procedures as necessary to implement the provisions of this
section.
(7) A teacher shall use a student's score on any end-of-course exam that is administered
in calculating the student's final grade in accordance with policies of the local board
of education and the school principal[school-based decision making council].
(8) The commissioner of education or a designee shall provide a written status report
regarding implementation of this section to the Interim Joint Committee on
Education and the Education Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee
by December 1, 2007, and July 1, 2008.
(9) The Kentucky Department of Education and local school districts shall use end-of-
course exams to promote increased student accountability. The department and
Page 125 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
local school districts shall also use test results to determine the need for technical
assistance, professional development, and other resources to improve instruction.
Section 32. KRS 158.844 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The mathematics achievement fund is hereby created to provide developmentally
appropriate diagnostic assessment and intervention services to students, primary
through grade 12, to help them reach proficiency in mathematics on the state
assessments under KRS 158.6453 and in compliance with the "No Child Left
Behind Act of 2001," 20 U.S.C. secs. 6301 et seq., as required under KRS 158.840.
(2) The grant funds may be used to support the implementation of diagnostic and
intervention services in mathematics. The use of funds may include: pay for
extended time for teachers, released time for teachers to serve as coaches and
mentors or to carry out other responsibilities needed in the implementation of
intervention services, payment of substitute teachers needed for the support of
mathematics teachers, purchase of materials needed for modification of instruction,
and other costs associated with diagnostic and intervention services or to cover
other costs deemed appropriate by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(3) The fund shall:
(a) Provide funding for the Center for Mathematics created in KRS 164.525 and
the costs of training selected teachers in the diagnostic assessment and
intervention skills that are needed to assist struggling students in the primary
program and other grade levels;
(b) Provide renewable, two (2) year local grants to school districts and for
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) Provide operational funding for the Committee for Mathematics Achievement
created in KRS 158.842.
(4) Any funds appropriated to the mathematics achievement fund that are specifically
designated by the General Assembly to support the Center for Mathematics shall be
Page 126 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
appropriated to the Council on Postsecondary Education and distributed to the
university administering the center, as determined by the council under KRS
164.525.
(5) Any moneys in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be
carried forward to be used for the purposes specified in this section.
(6) Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not
lapse.
(7) (a) Any funds appropriated to the mathematics achievement fund and specifically
designated by the General Assembly as funding for grants to local school
districts or to support the Committee for Mathematics Achievement shall be
administered by the Kentucky Department of Education.
(b) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations
relating to the grants for local school districts based on recommendations
from the Committee for Mathematics Achievement, the secretary of the
Education and Labor Cabinet, the commissioner of education, and the Center
for Mathematics established in KRS 164.525. The administrative regulations
shall:
1. Identify eligibility criteria for grant applicants;
2. Specify the criteria for acceptable diagnostic assessments and
intervention programs and coaching and mentoring programs;
3. Establish the minimum annual evaluation process for each grant
recipient;
4. Identify the annual data that must be provided from each grant recipient;
5. Define the application and approval process;
6. Establish matching fund requirements if deemed necessary by the board;
7. Define the obligations for professional development and continuing
education for teachers, administrators, and staff of each grant recipient;
Page 127 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
8. Establish the conditions for renewal of a two (2) year grant; and
9. Specify other conditions necessary to implement the purposes of this
section.
(c) As part of the application process, the board shall require that a grant
applicant provide assurances that the following principles will be met if the
applicant's request for funding is approved:
1. Mathematics instruction will be standards-based and utilize research-
based practices;
2. Intervention and support services will supplement, not replace, regular
classroom instruction; and
3. Intervention services will be provided to primary program students and
other students who are at risk of mathematics failure within the school
based upon ongoing assessments of their needs.
(d) If matching funds are required,[ the school council or, if none exists,] the
principal or the superintendent of schools[,] shall allocate matching funds.
Funding for professional development allocated[ to the school council] under
KRS 160.345 and for continuing education under KRS 158.070 may be used
to provide a portion or all of a school's required match.
(e) The Department of Education shall make available to schools:
1. Information from the Center for Mathematics regarding diagnostic
assessment and intervention programs and coaching and mentoring
programs of proven-practice in meeting the needs of primary students
and other students who are at risk of failure;
2. Technical assistance to potential applicants and grant recipients;
3. A list of professional development providers offering teacher training in
diagnostic assessment and intervention strategies and coaching and
mentoring; and
Page 128 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
4. Information from the Center for Mathematics on how to communicate to
parents effective ways of interacting with their children to improve their
mathematics concepts, skills, and understanding.
(f) The Department of Education shall submit a report to the appropriate Interim
Joint Committee on Education no later than September 1 of each year
outlining the use of grant funds. By November 1, 2007, the Department of
Education with input from the Committee for Mathematics Achievement and
the Center for Mathematics shall conduct a statewide needs assessment of the
resources needed in each school to help each child achieve proficiency in
mathematics by the year 2014 and report to the Interim Joint Committee on
Education an estimate of the cost and a specific timeline for meeting the goal
established by the Commonwealth.
Section 33. KRS 160.294 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each local board of education shall adopt a plan and procedures for recycling white
paper and cardboard in all board-owned and operated facilities.
(2) A local board of education shall be exempt from the requirement to establish a
recycling program as described in this section if:
(a) There is no recycling facility within the county or within a reasonable distance
in an adjoining geographic area; or
(b) The district cannot locate a recycling vendor to service the school district,
without incurring a negative fiscal impact.
(3) The board may delegate to each school[ or school council] the responsibility for
designing its own procedures; however, the superintendent or the superintendent's
designee shall periodically review the operating procedures to assure that recycling
is being carried out.
Section 34. KRS 160.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each board of education shall, on the forms prepared by the chief state school
Page 129 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
officer and approved by the Kentucky Board of Education, prepare and submit to
the Kentucky Board of Education reports on all phases of its school service. Each
board may prepare and publish for the information of the public a report on the
progress of its schools.
(2) Each board of education shall file in the board's office its policies relating to the
following matters:
(a) Transportation of pupils;
(b) Discipline and conduct of pupils;
(c) Limitations or restrictions on use of school facilities;
(d) Conduct of meetings of the board of education, including policies on the
calling of executive sessions;
(e) Personnel policies that apply to certified employees, including fringe benefits,
salary schedules, nonclassroom duties, in-service training, teacher-student
ratio, hiring, assignment, transfer, dismissal, suspension, reinstatement,
promotion, and demotion;
(f) Evaluation of certified employees;
(g) Selection of textbooks and instructional materials;
(h) Expenditure and accounting for school funds, including all special funds; and
(i) [Policies dealing with ]School-based policies[decision making].
(3) (a) The local board of education may adopt a policy requiring that each[ school
council, or if none exists, the] principal, make an annual report at a public
meeting of the board describing the school's progress in meeting the
educational goals set forth in KRS 158.6451 and district goals established by
the board.
(b) Biennially, the local board shall review in a public meeting the portion of each
school's consolidated plan that sets forth the activities and schedule to reduce
the achievement gaps for the various groups of students as required in KRS
Page 130 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
158.649. If a district has more than twenty (20) schools, the district may
review the achievement gap data of each school in a comprehensive district
report at a regularly scheduled meeting of the board. The report shall include
the schools' and district's plans to reduce any identified gaps in student
achievement.
(4) It is intended that these policies shall cover matters within the authority and
discretion of the district board of education and not matters otherwise required by
law or regulation. Such policies shall be filed in the board's office by August 15,
1974, shall be kept up to date by filing annual amendments thereto each August 15
and shall be public records.
Section 35. KRS 160.346 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Education;
(b) "ESSA" means the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95,
or its successor;
(c) "Level" means elementary, middle, or high school;
(d) "Turnaround" means a comprehensive transformation of a school to achieve
accelerated, meaningful, and sustainable increases in student achievement
through improved school leadership and school district support;
(e) "Turnaround plan" means a mandatory school plan that is designed to
improve student learning and performance with evidence-based interventions
as defined in ESSA and that is developed and implemented by the local
school district in partnership with stakeholders, including the principal, other
school leaders, teachers, and parents; and
(f) "Turnaround team" means the turnaround training and support team described
in subsection (8)(a) of this section.
(2) (a) The department shall annually identify a school for targeted support and
Page 131 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
improvement if the school has one (1) or more of the same subgroups, as
defined by ESSA, whose performance in the state accountability system by
level is at or below that of all students in any of the lowest-performing five
percent (5%) of all schools for three (3) consecutive years.
(b) Beginning with the 2021-2022 school year, and every three (3) years
thereafter, the department shall identify a school for additional targeted
support and improvement if the school has one (1) or more subgroups, as
defined by ESSA, whose performance in the state accountability system by
level is at or below the summative performance of all students in any of the
lowest-performing five percent (5%) of all schools identified under subsection
(3)(a) of this section and the school was identified in the immediately
preceding year for targeted support and improvement as described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) The department shall annually identify a school for comprehensive support and
improvement if the school is:
(a) In the lowest-performing five percent (5%) of all schools in its level based on
the school's performance in the state accountability system;
(b) A high school with a four (4) year cohort graduation rate that is less than
eighty percent (80%); or
(c) Identified by the department for additional targeted support and improvement
under subsection (2)(b) of this section and fails to exit additional targeted
support and improvement status based on criteria established under subsection
(11) of this section.
(4) (a) When a school is identified for targeted support and improvement under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, the local school personnel, working with
stakeholders, including the principal, other school leaders, teachers, and
parents, shall revise its school improvement plan, which shall be subject to
Page 132 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
review and approval by the local board of education.
(b) Each revised plan shall be informed by all available indicators, including
student performance compared to long-term goals, and shall include:
1. Components of turnaround leadership development and support;
2. Identification of critical resource inequities;
3. Evidence-based interventions; and
4. Additional actions that address the causes of consistently
underperforming subgroups of students.
(c) If adequate performance progress, as defined by the department, is not made,
the local school district shall take additional action to assist and support the
school in reaching performance goals.
(5) When a school is identified for additional targeted support and improvement under
subsection (2)(b) of this section, the local school district shall take more rigorous
district-determined action to assist and support the school in reaching performance
goals.
(6) (a) When a school is identified for comprehensive support and improvement, an
audit shall be performed by the department to diagnose the causes of the
school's low performance.
(b) The audit conducted under this subsection shall be the only comprehensive
audit required for a school unless the school fails to exit comprehensive
support and improvement status as described in subsection (11) of this section
or exits comprehensive support and improvement status but subsequently
repeats as a school identified for comprehensive support and improvement.
(7) (a) The audit conducted by the department under subsection (6) of this section
shall include:
1. A diagnosis of the causes of the school's low performance, with an
emphasis on underperforming subgroups of students and corresponding
Page 133 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
critical resource inequities;
2. An assessment and recommendation to the superintendent regarding the
best strategies to address the school's specific needs;
3. An assessment of the interaction and relationship among the
superintendent, central office personnel, and the school principal;
4. A recommendation of the steps the school may implement to launch and
sustain a turnaround process;
5. A recommendation to the local board of education of the turnaround
principles and strategies necessary for the superintendent to assist the
school with turnaround; and
6. An assessment and recommendation to the superintendent regarding the
principal's capacity to lead the turnaround effort in the school.
(b) The report of an audit conducted under this subsection shall be provided to the
superintendent, local board of education, school principal, commissioner of
education, and the Kentucky Board of Education.
(8) After completion of the audit described in subsection (7) of this section, each school
identified for comprehensive support and improvement shall engage in the
following turnaround intervention process:
(a) The superintendent and principal shall collaborate with the department to
create a turnaround training and support team for the school identified for
comprehensive support and improvement. The local board of education shall
approve the turnaround team;
(b) The authority of the school principal[council] granted under KRS 160.345
shall be transferred to the superintendent;
(c) The superintendent shall maintain the authority to select a principal for the
school if a principal vacancy occurs. The superintendent shall consult with the
turnaround team, parents, certified staff, and classified staff before appointing
Page 134 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
a principal replacement;
(d) Upon recommendation of the principal, the superintendent may reassign
certified staff members to a comparable position in the school district;
(e) The superintendent shall collaborate with the turnaround team to design
ongoing turnaround training and support for the principal and a corresponding
monitoring system of effectiveness and student achievement results;
(f) The principal shall collaborate with the turnaround team to establish an
advisory leadership team representing school stakeholders including other
school leaders, teachers, and parents;
(g) 1. In consultation with the department, the local school board shall
collaborate with the superintendent, principal, turnaround team, and the
advisory leadership team to propose a three (3) year turnaround plan.
2. The turnaround plan shall include requests to the department for
exemptions from submitting documentation that are identified by the
principal, advisory leadership team, and turnaround team as inhibitors to
investing time in innovative instruction and accelerated student
achievement of diverse learners including ongoing staff instructional
plans, student interventions, formative assessment results, or staff
effectiveness processes.
3. The turnaround plan shall be reviewed for approval by the
superintendent and the local board of education and shall be subject to
review, approval, monitoring, and periodic review by the department as
described in KRS 158.782;
(h) The school district may request technical assistance from the department for
development and implementation of the turnaround plan, which may include
conducting needs assessments, selecting evidence-based interventions, and
reviewing and addressing resource inequities;
Page 135 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(i) The turnaround plan shall be fully implemented by the first full day of the
school year following the school year the school was identified for
comprehensive support and improvement; and
(j) The superintendent shall periodically report to the local school board, and at
least annually to the commissioner of education, on the implementation and
results of the turnaround plan.
(9) The department shall establish required professional learning for teachers of
students in schools identified for comprehensive support and improvement.
Required professional learning shall be related to evidence-based practices in
instruction, instructional materials implementation, and assessment for reading and
mathematics and aligned to Kentucky academic standards required by KRS
158.6453.
(10) Each superintendent or public charter school board of directors shall adopt
evidence-based curriculum and select high-quality instructional resources for
schools identified for comprehensive support and improvement. High-quality
instructional materials selected by the superintendent shall be determined by the
department to be reliable, valid, and aligned to Kentucky academic standards
required by KRS 158.6453 for reading and mathematics.
(11) The Kentucky Board of Education shall establish annual statewide exit criteria for
schools identified for targeted support and improvement, additional targeted support
and improvement, and comprehensive support and improvement.
(12) If a school enters comprehensive support and improvement status and does not
make any annual improvement, as determined by the department, for two (2)
consecutive years, or if the school does not exit the status after three (3) years, the
school shall enter a school intervention process chosen by the commissioner of
education that provides more rigorous support and action by the department to
improve the school's performance.
Page 136 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(13) For school districts that include a significant number of schools, as determined by
the department, identified for targeted support and improvement:
(a) The department shall periodically review a local board's resource allocations
to support school improvement and provide technical assistance to the local
school board; and
(b) The department may provide a recommended list of turnaround or school
intervention providers that have demonstrated success implementing
evidence-based strategies.
(14) If, in the course of a school audit, the audit team identifies information suggesting
that a violation of KRS 160.345(8)[(9)](a) may have occurred, the commissioner of
education shall forward the evidence to the Office of Education Accountability for
investigation.
(15) A principal's authority and a school's right to establish an advisory[a] council
granted under KRS 160.345 may be restored by the local board of education two (2)
years after the school exits comprehensive support and improvement status.
Section 36. KRS 160.347 is amended to read as follows:
A member of a school advisory council may be removed from the advisory council for
cause, after an opportunity for hearing before the local board, by a vote of four-fifths
(4/5) of the membership of a board of education after the recommendation of the chief
state school officer pursuant to KRS 156.132. Written notices setting out the charges for
removal shall be spread on the minutes of the board and given to the member of the
advisory[school] council.
Section 37. KRS 160.348 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education shall make available to schools
information concerning the prerequisite content necessary for success in
advanced coursework, including secondary courses, Advanced Placement or
AP courses, and International Baccalaureate or IB courses. The department
Page 137 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
shall provide sample syllabi, instructional resources, and instructional
supports for teachers that will assist in preparing students for more rigorous
coursework.
(b) Each[ school-based decision making council, or] principal[ if none exists,]
shall offer a core curriculum of AP, IB, dual enrollment, dual credit courses,
or other advanced coursework using either or both on-site instruction or
online alternatives. In addition, each principal[school-based decision making
council] shall comply with any additional requirements for AP, IB, dual
enrollment, dual credit, and advanced coursework courses that may be
established cooperatively by the Kentucky Department of Education, the
Education Professional Standards Board, and the Council on Postsecondary
Education in accordance with the definitions in KRS 158.007.
(c) When practicable, the[ school-based decision making council, or] principal[ if
none exists,] shall offer advanced coursework, as defined in KRS 158.6453, in
mathematics, reading, science, and English language arts for students in
grades four (4) through twelve (12).
(2) Every[ school-based decision making council, or] principal[ if none exists,] shall
establish a policy that is consistent with any district plan adopted by a local board
of education in accordance with KRS 158.6453(21) on the recruitment and
assignment of students to advanced coursework options in accordance with
paragraph (b) of this subsection that recognizes that all students have the right to
participate in a rigorous and academically challenging curriculum. The policy shall
require that the school notifies all students, parents, and guardians of the:
(a) Long-term benefits of student participation in advanced coursework; and
(b) Advanced coursework opportunities available at the school.
(3) Students shall be admitted to advanced coursework in accordance with the district
plan adopted in accordance with KRS 158.6453(21).
Page 138 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(4) Students that successfully complete high school advanced coursework shall receive
credit toward graduation in accordance with KRS 158.622(3).
(5) Students enrolled in AP or IB courses in the public schools shall have the cost of
the examinations paid by the Kentucky Department of Education.
Section 38. KRS 160.395 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Superintendents of public school districts shall distribute the written information
provided by the Office of the Attorney General and the Department for Libraries
and Archives under KRS 15.257 and 171.223 to each elected school board member,
school principal, and each advisory[school] council member, as designated in KRS
160.345(2), within their respective districts. Distribution shall be accomplished
within sixty (60) days of receiving the written information from the Office of the
Attorney General and the Department for Libraries and Archives. Distribution to
newly elected or appointed members shall be accomplished within sixty (60) days
of their election or appointment. The distribution may be by electronic means.
(2) Superintendents shall require signatory proof that each school board member,
school principal, and advisory[school] council member has received the written
information as required under subsection (1) of this section, shall maintain
documentation of receipt on file, and shall certify to the Office of the Attorney
General that the written information has been distributed as required.
Section 39. KRS 160.700 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Directory information" means the student's name, address, telephone listing, date
and place of birth, participation in school recognized sports and activities, height
and weight of members of athletic teams, dates of attendance, awards received,
major field of study, and the most recent previous educational agency or institution
attended by the student, contained in education records in the custody of the public
schools;
Page 139 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(2) "Educational institution" means any public school providing an elementary and
secondary education, including vocational;
(3) "Education record" means data and information directly relating to a student that is
collected or maintained by educational institutions or by a person acting for an
institution including academic records and portfolios; achievement tests; aptitude
scores; teacher and counselor evaluations; health and personal data; behavioral and
psychological evaluations; and directory data recorded in any medium including
handwriting, magnetic tapes, film, video, microfiche, computer-generated and
stored data, or data otherwise maintained and used by the educational institution or
a person acting for an institution. "Education record" shall not include:
(a) Records of instructional, supervisory, and assisting administrative personnel
which are in the sole possession of the maker and are not accessible or
revealed to any other person except a substitute for any of those persons;
(b) Records maintained by a law enforcement unit of the educational institution
that were created by that law enforcement unit for the purpose of law
enforcement;
(c) In the case of persons who are employed by an educational agency or
institution but who are not in attendance at that agency or institution, records
made and maintained in the normal course of business which relate
exclusively to that person in the person's capacity as an employee and are not
available for use for any other purpose; or
(d) Records on a student who is eighteen (18) years of age or older, which are
made, used, or maintained by a physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, or other
recognized professional or paraprofessional for treatment of the student, and
are not available to anyone other than persons providing this treatment, except
a physician or other appropriate professional of the student's choice.
(4) "Eligible student" means a student, or a former student, who has reached the age of
Page 140 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
eighteen (18) or is pursuing an education beyond high school and therefore the
permission or consent required of, and the rights accorded to the parents of the
student shall thereafter be required of, and accorded to the student;
(5) "School official" means personnel employed in instructive and administrative
positions with a school board or educational institution. Parents and other
noneducational persons who are elected or appointed to advisory[school-based
decision making] councils or committees thereof, or other voluntary boards or
committees shall not be considered school officials.
Section 40. KRS 161.134 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A teacher pursuing national board certification shall receive from the fund
established under KRS 161.133 a stipend of two hundred dollars ($200) per
day for two (2) days beyond the school contract year to prepare for the
certification assessments.
(b) A local board of education shall provide five (5) days' released time during
the school year for a teacher pursuing national board certification. The local
board of education shall request reimbursement from the fund established
under KRS 161.133 for substitute teacher pay based on the local board of
education salary schedule for substitute teachers and for stipends paid to a
teacher described in subsection (3) of this section. A local board of education
may, at its own expense, provide additional released time for teachers
pursuing national board certification.
(c) If a teacher does not successfully complete all assessments required for
national board certification during a school year, the provisions in this
subsection may be applied to a second school year.
(d) When funds are not available to fully fund the requirements of paragraphs (a),
(b), and (c) of this subsection for all national board applicants, the board may
prorate the specified reimbursements in paragraphs (a) and (b) and may limit
Page 141 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
the conditions under which provisions of paragraph (c) shall be applied to
second year participants. The board shall establish the procedures for carrying
out the provisions of this subsection in an administrative regulation.
(2) (a) As of July 14, 2000, a teacher who attains national board certification shall be
reimbursed seventy-five percent (75%) of the certification fee for the initial
ten (10) year certificate, except the Education Professional Standards Board
may decrease the percentage of reimbursement if a teacher receives payment
other than a repayable loan for the same purpose from another source and the
cumulative amount would exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of
the certification fee.
(b) Fees for retaking one (1) or more entries of the national board assessment for
the initial national board certificate and fees for renewal of the certificate shall
be at the teacher's expense.
(c) [Nothing in ]This subsection shall not prohibit the board from reimbursing a
percentage of the initial certification fee to a teacher who has received a
repayable loan from a local board of education or other agency to offset initial
costs.
(3) A national board certified teacher may receive a stipend in addition to his or her
annual compensation for serving as a mentor to teachers within his or her school or
school district. The Education Professional Standards Board shall promulgate
administrative regulations under which a local board of education, in
coordination[cooperation] with the school principal[school-based decision making
council], may establish a mentoring program within a school to utilize national
board certified teachers. The administrative regulations shall specify the conditions
for the mentoring program as well as the amount of the stipend that will be
provided to a teacher serving as a mentor.
Section 41. KRS 164.757 is amended to read as follows:
Page 142 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(1) For purposes of this section unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Critical shortage area" means an area in which there are insufficient numbers
of fully certified staff in a particular subject, school, or geographic location;
(b) "Emergency certified teacher" means an individual who has not completed
certification requirements but has been awarded a temporary certificate for a
certification area in which no fully qualified teacher was available;
(c) "Qualified teacher" means a teacher who holds the appropriate certification
for a position unless the superintendent of the employing local school district
has documented evidence that the teacher is unsuitable for appointment;
(d) "Qualified teaching service" means teaching for at least seventy (70) days
each semester or the equivalent in the certification area for which an
individual received a forgivable loan in the Kentucky school district that
recommended the individual for a loan or in another Kentucky private or
public school district in the certification area for which an individual received
a forgivable loan if no position was available in the recommending school
district at the time when the individual completed his or her certification;
(e) "Semester" means a period which usually makes up one-half (1/2) of a school
year or one-half (1/2) of a postsecondary institution's academic year; and
(f) "Summer term" means an academic period consisting of one (1) or more
sessions of instruction between a spring and a fall semester at a postsecondary
education institution.
(2) To increase the number of qualified teachers in local school districts and to reduce
the number of emergency certified teachers, there is hereby created the district
teacher certification loan fund in the State Treasury. The loans shall be used to
provide forgivable loans to emergency certified personnel, fully certified teachers
who are willing to seek additional certification in hard-to-fill or critical shortage
areas, and paraprofessionals in local school districts to become fully certified
Page 143 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
teachers and to continue service within the local district.
(3) The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority. The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations to specify the
terms and conditions of the award, cancellation, and repayment of loans, including
but not limited to the maximum amount that may be loaned per term and the
maximum aggregate amount per applicant, the selection process, eligibility for
renewal, the specific administrative procedures for utilizing the funds, and the rate
of repayment.
(4) To qualify for a forgivable loan, an applicant shall meet the following requirements:
(a) Be employed by a specific local district as a certified teacher, an emergency
full-time or part-time teacher, an emergency substitute teacher, or a
paraprofessional at the time he or she makes application for the loan;
(b) Be recommended by the superintendent as an individual that he or she would
recommend to be employed in a teaching position for which the applicant is
pursuing certification if the applicant fulfills all credentialing requirements;
(c) Be endorsed by the principal[school-based decision making council] of the
school in which he or she serves to receive a loan for the purposes of
obtaining teacher certification in a specific certification area; except that the
endorsement shall not be construed as a commitment of securing a position in
the particular school in the future;
(d) Be admitted and enrolled as an undergraduate or graduate student in a
Kentucky private or public postsecondary institution that offers a teacher
certification program in the area for which he or she is seeking certification;
and
(e) Be enrolled in a minimum of six (6) credit hours and not more than nine (9)
credit hours during each semester of an academic term while employed
concurrently in the school district and in not less than six (6) credit hours
Page 144 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
during the summer term. If a school district recommends an applicant for a
loan under provisions of this section and grants a leave of absence to the
employee to pursue certification, the employee shall be enrolled as a full-time
undergraduate or graduate student as defined by the institution in which he or
she is enrolled.
(5) A participant in a local district alternative certification program as defined in KRS
161.048(2) may be eligible for a loan under provisions of this section to offset costs
associated with the program. The authority shall establish by administrative
regulation the specific requirements, notwithstanding requirements in subsection (4)
of this section.
(6) A loan shall not be awarded or a promissory note cancellation shall not be granted
to any person who is in default on any obligation to the authority under any
program administered pursuant to KRS 164.740 to 164.785 until financial
obligations to the authority are satisfied, except that ineligibility for this reason may
be waived by the authority for cause.
(7) Recipients shall render one (1) semester of qualified teaching service for each
semester or summer term for which a loan was received. Upon completion of each
semester of qualified teacher service, the authority shall cancel the appropriate
portion of the promissory notes.
(8) If the recipient of a loan fails to complete the certification at a participating
institution or fails to render qualified teaching service in any semester following
certification, unless the failure is temporarily waived for cause by the authority, the
recipient shall immediately become liable to the authority for repayment of the sum
of all outstanding promissory notes and accrued interest. Persons liable for
repayment of loans under this subsection shall be liable for interest accruing from
the dates on which the loans were disbursed.
(9) Failure to meet repayment obligations imposed by this section shall be cause for the
Page 145 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
revocation of a person's certification, subject to the procedures set forth in KRS
161.120.
(10) All moneys repaid to the authority under this section shall be added to the fund in
this section. Any fund balance at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall
be carried forward to the next fiscal year and continuously appropriated for the
purposes specified in this section.
(11) The authority may execute appropriate contracts and promissory notes for
administering this section.
(12) If available funds are insufficient for all requested loans for eligible applicants
during any fiscal year, the authority shall give priority consideration to eligible
applicants who previously received loans. If funds are insufficient to make all
requested renewal loans to eligible applicants, the authority shall reduce all loans to
the extent necessary to provide loans to all qualified renewal applicants. If, after
awarding all eligible renewal applicants, funds are not depleted, priority shall be
given to loans for those applicants who are seeking certification in critical shortage
areas.
Section 42. KRS 605.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any child committed to or in the custody of the cabinet or the Department of
Juvenile Justice who is not placed in a location where smoking cessation
services are provided may participate in smoking cessation services offered by
local health departments or their contracted agents at no cost.
(b) Unless provided otherwise, when any child committed to or in the custody of
the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet requires medical or surgical
care or treatment, the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet may
provide the same or arrange for the furnishing thereof by other public or
private agencies, and may give consent to the medical or surgical treatment.
For this purpose, the services and facilities of local health officers and
Page 146 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
departments shall be made available, at a cost not to exceed the Medicaid
reimbursement rate, to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, and
as far as practicable, any publicly owned hospital shall provide hospitalization
without charge for any such child who is a resident of the political subdivision
by which the hospital is owned or operated. This section does not authorize
nor shall permission be granted for abortion or sterilization.
(2) Any child placed in a foster home by an agency duly authorized in KRS Chapter
620 to place a child in a foster home shall receive a complete medical, visual, and
dental examination by a professional authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes
to conduct such examinations. Arrangements for a child placed in a foster home to
receive such examinations shall be made within two (2) weeks of his or her
placement in a foster home and not less than every twelve (12) months thereafter.
(3) Children maintained in any of the facilities and programs operated or contracted by
the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall, so far as possible, receive a
common school education.
(a) The Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children shall be
established to serve children in facilities and programs operated or contracted
by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services, residential, day treatment, clinical, and group home programs. All
policies and procedures necessary to educate state agency children shall be
approved by the Kentucky Board of Education. All duties, responsibilities,
rights, and privileges specifically imposed on or granted to the local education
administration units shall be imposed on or granted to the Department of
Juvenile Justice or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and contracted
agencies with regard to educating agency children. Classrooms for the
Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children shall be
within or near the facilities and programs operated or contracted by the
Page 147 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet. The Kentucky Department of
Education, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services, Department for Community Based Services, shall develop a
biennial plan regarding the educational needs and provisions of educational
programs, with emphasis on the coordination of all treatment services and
funds available to provide for the education of state agency children. The
biennial plan shall include strategies to assure that teacher preparation
programs include content related to working with state agency children and
that adequate professional development opportunities for better meeting the
needs of these students are available for teachers and schools.
(b) Teachers and other staff shall be hired on contract through a local school
district or if a local school district is not willing to participate, teachers may
be hired by the Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency
Children or a contract may be entered into with a private provider of
educational services. All certified educational staff hired by the Kentucky
Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children shall be members of the
Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System.
(c) Beginning July 1, 1993, the Kentucky Education Collaborative for State
Agency Children shall be financed through:
1. The amount generated by state agency children under the Support
Education Excellence in Kentucky program as provided in KRS 157.360
for the guaranteed base and adjustments for the number of at-risk
students, exceptional students, and transportation costs;
2. A per-pupil distribution of professional development funds with the
collaborative serving as a consortium for state agency children;
3. A per-pupil distribution of technology funds in accordance with the state
education technology plan pursuant to KRS 156.670 and the formula for
Page 148 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
the distribution of funds to local school districts;
4. A per-pupil distribution of textbook funds pursuant to KRS 157.100 and
157.190;
5. The funding for school services for state agency children authorized by
KRS 158.135; and
6. Other grants and entitlements, including federal funds, identified in the
implementation plan developed pursuant to paragraph (f) of this
subsection for the education of Kentucky's children.
(d) The commissioner of Juvenile Justice and the secretary of the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative regulations,
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, with the assistance of the Kentucky
Department of Education and upon recommendation of the Kentucky Board
of Education regarding the governance, curriculum, and other topics
necessary to educate state agency children. The regulations shall:
1. Provide for the development and implementation of interagency
agreements that:
a. Define the financial responsibility of each state and local agency
for providing services to state agency children;
b. Establish procedures for resolving interagency disputes among
agencies that are parties to the agreements; and
2. Provide procedures for the implementation of the Kentucky statutes
regarding school-based policies[decision making] as defined in Section
1 of this Act, student outcomes, accountability, assessment, rewards and
sanctions, technology, staff development, salaries, and the development
of coordinated individual treatment, education, and transition plans to
ensure compliance with present education and treatment laws and
regulations specific to the needs of children in the programs of the
Page 149 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(e) When the placement of a state agency child is changed so that the state agency
child must transfer from one school or educational facility to a different
school or educational facility, the school or educational facility that the state
agency child is leaving shall, within two (2) days of the state agency child
leaving, prepare an educational passport for the child, which shall be
delivered to the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice. The cabinet or
the Department of Juvenile Justice shall, within two (2) days of enrolling a
state agency child in a new school or educational facility, present the
educational passport to the receiving school or educational facility.
(f) The commissioner of Juvenile Justice and the secretary of the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services and the commissioner of the state Department of
Education shall initiate development of a plan for implementation of the
Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children.
Section 43. KRS 160.1596 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) For purposes of this section, a member of the board of directors of a public
charter school shall be considered an officer under KRS 61.040 and shall,
within sixty (60) days of final approval of an application, take an oath of
office as required under KRS 62.010.
(b) Within seventy-five (75) days of the final approval of an application, the
board of directors and the authorizer shall enter into a binding charter contract
that establishes the academic and operational performance expectations and
measures by which the public charter school will be evaluated.
(c) The executed charter contract shall become the final authorization for the
public charter school. The charter contract shall include:
1. The term of the contract;
2. The agreements relating to each item required under KRS 160.1592(3)
Page 150 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
and 160.1593(3), as modified or supplemented during the approval
process;
3. The rights and duties of each party;
4. The administrative relationship between the authorizer and the public
charter school;
5. The allocation of state, local, and federal funds, and the schedule to
disburse funds to the public charter school by the authorizer;
6. The process the authorizer will use to provide ongoing oversight,
including a process to conduct annual site visits;
7. The specific commitments of the public charter school authorizer
relating to its obligations to oversee, monitor the progress of, and
supervise the public charter school;
8. The process and criteria the authorizer will use to annually monitor and
evaluate the overall academic, operating, and fiscal conditions of the
public charter school, including the process the authorizer will use to
oversee the correction of any deficiencies found in the annual review;
9. The process for revision or amendment to the terms of the charter
contract agreed to by the authorizer and the board of directors of the
public charter school;
10. The process agreed to by the authorizer and the board of directors of the
public charter school that identifies how disputes between the authorizer
and the board will be handled; and
11. Any other terms and conditions agreed to by the authorizer and the
board of directors, including pre-opening conditions. Reasonable
conditions shall not include enrollment caps or operational requirements
that place undue constraints on a public charter school or are
contradictory to the provisions of KRS 160.1590 to 160.1599 and
Page 151 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
161.141. Such conditions, even when incorporated in a charter contract,
shall be considered unilaterally imposed conditions.
(d) 1. The performance provisions within a charter contract shall be based on a
performance framework that sets forth the academic and operational
performance indicators, measures, and metrics to be used by the
authorizer to evaluate each public charter school. The performance
framework shall include at a minimum indicators, measures, and metrics
for:
a. Student academic proficiency;
b. Student academic growth;
c. Achievement gaps in both student proficiency and student growth
for student subgroups, including race, sex, socioeconomic status,
and areas of exceptionality;
d. Student attendance;
e. Student suspensions;
f. Student withdrawals;
g. Student exits;
h. Recurrent enrollment from year to year;
i. College or career readiness at the end of grade twelve (12);
j. Financial performance and sustainability; and
k. Board of directors' performance and stewardship, including
compliance with all applicable statutes, administrative regulations,
and terms of the charter contract.
2. The performance framework shall allow the inclusion of additional
rigorous, valid, and reliable indicators proposed by a public charter
school to augment external evaluations of its performance. The proposed
indicators shall be consistent with the purposes of KRS 160.1590 to
Page 152 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
160.1599 and 161.141 and shall be negotiated with the authorizer.
3. The performance framework shall require the disaggregation of student
performance data by subgroups, including race, sex, socioeconomic
status, and areas of exceptionality.
4. The authorizer shall be responsible for collecting, analyzing, and
reporting to the state board all state-required assessment and
achievement data for each public charter school it oversees.
(e) Annual student achievement performance targets shall be set, in accordance
with the state accountability system, by each public charter school in
conjunction with its authorizer, and those measures shall be designed to help
each school meet applicable federal, state, and authorizer goals.
(f) The charter contract shall be signed by the chair of the governing board of the
authorizer and the chair of the board of directors of the public charter school.
An approved charter application shall serve as a charter contract for the public
charter school.
(g) No public charter school may commence operations without a charter contract
executed according to this section and approved in an open meeting of the
governing board of the authorizer.
(2) Within five (5) days after entering into a charter contract, a copy of the executed
contract shall be submitted by the authorizer to the commissioner of education.
(3) For the purposes of local and state funding, a public charter school shall serve as a
school of the district of location.
(4) For the purposes of federal funding, a public charter school shall serve as a local
education agency.
(5) All students enrolled in a public charter school shall be included in the average
daily attendance calculation under KRS 157.360 and the aggregate and average
daily attendance of transported pupils calculation under KRS 157.370 of the district
Page 153 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
of location in the same manner as any other public schools in the district and shall
be reported by the public charter schools to the school district and state Department
of Education for purposes of calculating the state and local share of funding for
each public charter school.
(6) Notwithstanding the formula for allocating district funds under KRS
160.345(7)[(8)] and any other statute governing a district's funding of schools,
unless an authorizing district agrees to provide a larger sum of funding in the
charter contract, after local capital outlay funds that are restricted in use pursuant to
KRS 157.420(4) and funds under KRS 157.440(1)(b) and 157.621 necessary to
meet debt service obligations on bonds or other financing mechanisms for new
construction and renovation projects for school facilities are excluded, and before
any other funds are budgeted for district use, a district shall transfer to each of the
public charter schools located within the district:
(a) The amount that is proportional to the public charter school's enrollment or
average daily attendance in comparison with the overall district qualifying
numbers for:
1. Funds that are related to students' attendance and enrollment and
allocated to the district of location pursuant to KRS 157.360;
2. Any add-on or funding factors provided for in the state budget;
3. Any add-on or funding factors provided for by the Kentucky
Department of Education; and
4. Funds pursuant to KRS 157.360(2)(a) and (b) and (13)(a).
For each funding source identified in this paragraph, the transfer amount shall
be based on the public charter school's qualifying student enrollment or
average daily attendance, depending on the method used in the funding
source's calculation;
(b) On a proportionate per pupil basis:
Page 154 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
1. Education funds allocated to the school district pursuant to KRS
157.440(1)(a) and (2)(a), or pursuant to any applicable federal statute;
and
2. All taxes and payments in lieu of taxes transferred to the district of
location or levied and collected by the district of location; and
(c) On a proportionate per pupil transported basis, transportation funds calculated
pursuant to KRS 157.360(2)(c) and 157.370 and distributed to the district of
location, unless the school district provides transportation to students
attending the public charter school under written terms agreed upon by the
district and the public charter school in either the charter contract or, if the
district is not the public charter school's authorizer, a separate agreement.
(7) (a) If transportation funds are transferred under this section to a public charter
school, then the public charter school receiving those funds shall provide
transportation services to the enrolled students residing within the district of
location.
(b) If funds designated for providing additional services to specific students are
transferred under this section, then the public charter school receiving those
funds shall provide those services in the same manner as the district of
location.
(c) If transportation services are not provided by the public charter school and no
written agreement to provide transportation services with the district of
location exists, then no transportation funds shall be transferred and the
district of location shall not be responsible for providing transportation to the
public charter school's students.
(8) Notwithstanding the identification of funds to be transferred in this section, a
collaborative among local school boards authorizing a public charter school may
negotiate among the local boards and a charter applicant to identify the amount of
Page 155 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
funds to be transferred to the public charter school. The agreement shall be detailed
in the charter contract.
(9) (a) For the calculation of amounts under subsections (6) and (7) of this section
during the first school year of operation of a public charter school in a school
district, beginning with the start of instruction:
1. The public charter school's average daily attendance shall be calculated
based on a projection of the public charter school's enrollment and the
district's overall average daily attendance;
2. The public charter school's aggregate daily attendance of students
transported shall be calculated based on a projection of the public
charter school's enrollment and transportation plan and the district's
overall aggregate daily attendance of students transported; and
3. The amounts attributable to each individual student's attendance at the
public charter school shall be calculated based on a projection of the
public charter school's enrollment and demographics and the district's
overall enrollment and demographics.
(b) The calculations shall be adjusted in January of the first school year of
operation to reflect the first semester's actual data. Subsequent years of
operation shall be calculated using actual data from the prior school year.
(10) (a) Funds identified for transfer under this section shall be transferred by a district
of location to each of the public charter schools located within the district.
However, up to three percent (3%) of the funds identified under this section
for transfer to a public charter school may be retained by an authorizer as an
authorizer fee.
(b) If the authorizer of a public charter school does not include the local board of
education of the district of location, then the district of location shall transfer
the authorizer fee to the public charter school's authorizer.
Page 156 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(c) If the Kentucky Board of Education requires the authorization of a public
charter school on appeal from an authorizer, the board shall receive twenty-
five percent (25%) of the authorizing fee for the duration of joint oversight
required by KRS 160.1595.
(11) Funds identified for transfer by a district of location to a public charter school under
this section shall be transferred throughout the school year according to a schedule
determined by the state board. The scheduled dates shall be within thirty (30) days
of the dates of state disbursement of funds to school districts. Failure to transfer
required funds shall, for every five (5) days late, result in a fine to the violator of
not less than five percent (5%) of the total funds per funding period to be
transferred. Fines imposed shall be transferred to the public charter school affected
by the delay.
(12) A public charter school shall be eligible for federal and state competitive grants and
shall not be excluded from an opportunity to apply or participate so long as the
public charter school meets the criteria established for the respective grants. Each
public charter school that receives grant aid shall comply with all requirements to
receive such aid.
(13) A public charter school shall receive a proportionate per pupil share of any state
moneys not otherwise identified in this section that is received by the school district
of location. The public charter school shall also receive, according to federal law,
moneys generated under federal categorical aid programs for students that are
eligible for the aid and attending the public charter school. Each public charter
school that receives such aid shall comply with all requirements to receive such aid.
(14) The commissioner of education shall apply for all federal funding that supports
charter school initiatives for which a state must be the applicant and shall cooperate
with any public charter school in its efforts to seek federal funding.
(15) If a public charter school closes for any reason, the assets of the school shall be
Page 157 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
distributed first to satisfy outstanding payroll obligations for employees of the
school, then to the creditors of the school, then to the district of location or
authorizing districts if authorized by a collaborative of local boards of education. If
the assets are insufficient to satisfy outstanding obligations, the authorizer shall
petition to Circuit Court of the county in which the public charter school is located
to prioritize the distribution of assets.
(16) The state board shall promulgate administrative regulations to:
(a) Establish the process to be used to evaluate the performance of a charter
school authorizer, based upon the requirements of KRS 160.1590 to 160.1599
and 161.141, and the actions to be taken in response to failures in
performance; and
(b) Govern the calculation and distribution of funds due to public charter schools
from school districts, the schedule of distribution of funds, and the imposition
of fines for late distribution of funds.
(17) By August 31, 2023, and annually thereafter, each public charter school authorizer
shall submit to the commissioner of education, the secretary of the Education and
Labor Cabinet, and the Interim Joint Committee on Education a report to include:
(a) The names of each public charter school operating under contract with the
authorizer during the previous academic year that:
1. Closed during or after the academic year; or
2. Had the contract nonrenewed or revoked;
(b) The names of each public charter school operating under contract with the
authorizer during the previous academic year that have not yet begun to
operate;
(c) The number of applications received, the number reviewed, and the number
approved;
(d) A summary of the academic and financial performance of each public charter
Page 158 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
school operated under contract with the authorizer during the previous
academic year; and
(e) The authorizing duties and functions performed by the authorizer during the
previous academic year.
Section 44. KRS 156.132 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this section, except subsection (1), "public school officer" means a person who
previously served as a superintendent of schools during which time charges were brought
against him or her under this section.
(1) The chief state school officer shall recommend, by written charges to the proper
school authorities having immediate jurisdiction, the removal of any superintendent
of schools, principal, teacher, member of an advisory[ a school] council, or other
public school officer as to whom he or she has reason to believe is guilty of
immorality, misconduct in office, incompetency, willful neglect of duty, or
nonfeasance. In the case of a member of an advisory[a school] council, the written
charges shall be provided to the local board of education.
(2) The chief state school officer shall recommend by written charges the suspension
by the Kentucky Board of Education of any superintendent of schools or other
public school officer whom he or she has reason to believe is guilty of immorality,
misconduct in office, incompetency, willful neglect of duty, or nonfeasance. If the
charges brought under this subsection represent an immediate threat to the public
health, safety, or welfare, the Kentucky Board of Education shall summarily
suspend the person against whom the charges are made. The action by the Kentucky
Board of Education may be taken upon a recommendation of the chief state school
officer, or the action may be taken by a majority vote of the Kentucky Board of
Education without recommendation from the chief state school officer.
(3) The Kentucky Board of Education may suspend a district superintendent of schools
or other public school officer under subsection (2) of this section or remove him or
Page 159 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
her pursuant to subsection (5) of this section only if, after thirty (30) days of receipt
of the written charges specified in subsection (1) of this section, the proper school
authorities having immediate jurisdiction, either the superintendent or the district
board of education, have refused to act, have acted in bad faith, arbitrarily, or
capriciously, or if a recommendation to the district board would have been futile.
(4) Any officer suspended by the Kentucky Board of Education under subsection (2) of
this section shall be furnished with an emergency order specifying in detail the
reasons for suspension and notifying the officer of his or her right to appeal the
action and have an emergency hearing pursuant to KRS 13B.125.
(5) As an alternative to first seeking suspension, the chief state school officer may
recommend by written charges the removal by the Kentucky Board of Education of
any superintendent of schools or other public school officer whom he or she has
reason to believe is guilty of immorality, misconduct in office, incompetency,
willful neglect of duty, or nonfeasance. The officer against whom the written
charges are issued by the chief state school officer shall be furnished with the
written charges and notice of procedural rights conferred under KRS Chapter 13B.
Within twenty (20) days after receipt of the charges, the officer may notify the
Kentucky Board of Education of his or her intention to appear and answer the
charges. Upon appeal, an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13B. If the officer fails to notify the board of his or her intention
to appear and answer the charges, the Kentucky Board of Education may remove
the officer by a majority vote, and the dismissal shall be final.
(6) The hearing shall be public or private at the discretion of the accused former or
current superintendent and shall be public when testimony is taken for board
members.
(7) The Kentucky Board of Education may meet in closed session to consider the
evidence and may by a majority vote remove the officer. If the board votes to
Page 160 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
remove the officer, the board shall prepare final order specifying which charge or
charges it found to be the basis for removal. If within ninety (90) days from the date
of suspension if applicable, the state board has not removed the officer, or has
dismissed the charges, the suspended officer shall be reinstated and shall be paid his
or her full salary for the period of suspension.
(8) The officer shall have a right to appeal on the record to the Circuit Court located in
the county of the school district in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If the
decision of the court is against removal, the officer shall be paid his or her full
salary from the date of suspension. The payment shall be made from funds
appropriated to the State Department of Education.
(9) If a superintendent of schools is removed from office or resigns while charges are
pending pursuant to this section after July 15, 1994, any continuing contract
pursuant to KRS 161.720 to 161.810 shall be terminated. If the removal is reversed
upon appeal, the continuing contract shall be restored and he or she shall be paid
his or her full salary for the period of suspension.
Section 45. KRS 158.305 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Aphasia" means a condition characterized by either partial or total loss of the
ability to communicate verbally or through written words. A person with
aphasia may have difficulty speaking, reading, writing, recognizing the names
of objects, or understanding what other people have said. The condition may
be temporary or permanent and does not include speech problems caused by
loss of muscle control;
(b) "Dyscalculia" means the inability to understand the meaning of numbers, the
basic operations of addition and subtraction, the complex operations of
multiplication and division, or to apply math principles to solve practical or
abstract problems;
Page 161 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(c) "Dysgraphia" means difficulty in automatically remembering and mastering
the sequence of muscle motor movements needed to accurately write letters or
numbers;
(d) "Dyslexia" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.307;
(e) "Enrichment program" means accelerated intervention within the school day
or outside of the school day or school calendar led by individuals most
qualified to provide the intervention that includes evidence-based reading
instructional programming related to reading instruction in the areas of
phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension, and
other instructional strategies aligned to reading and writing standards required
by KRS 158.6453 and outlined in administrative regulation promulgated by
the Kentucky Board of Education;
(f) "Evidence-based" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C. sec. 7801(21);
(g) "Phonemic awareness" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.307;
(h) "Reading diagnostic assessment" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.792;
(i) "Reading improvement plan" means an accelerated intervention plan for a
student in kindergarten through grade four (4) that is developed to increase a
student's rate of progress toward proficient performance in reading that is
identified as necessary based on the student's results on an approved reading
diagnostic assessment. This plan should be developed in collaboration and
accordance with any existing program services plan, individualized education
program, or Section 504 Plan unless the program services plan, individualized
education program, or Section 504 Plan already addresses improving reading;
(j) "Reading improvement team" means a team that develops and oversees the
progress of a reading improvement plan and includes:
1. The parent or guardian of the student that is the subject of the reading
improvement plan;
Page 162 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
2. No less than one (1) regular education teacher of the student to provide
information about the general curriculum for same-aged peers;
3. A representative of the local education agency who is knowledgeable
about the reading curriculum and the availability of the evidence-based
literacy resources of the local education agency; and
4. Any specialized certified school employees for students receiving
language instruction educational programming or special education
services; and
(k) "Universal screener" means a process of providing a brief assessment to all
students within a grade level to assess the students' performance on the
essential components of reading.
(2) Notwithstanding any other statute or administrative regulation to the contrary, the
Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to further
define a multitiered system of supports for district-wide use of a system for students
in kindergarten through grade three (3), that includes a tiered continuum of
interventions with varying levels of intensity and duration and which connects
general, compensatory, and special education programs to provide interventions
implemented with fidelity to evidence-based research and matched to individual
student strengths and needs. At a minimum, evidence of implementation shall be
submitted by the district to the department by October 1 of each year and shall
include but not be limited to the activities required under KRS 158.649.
(3) The department shall provide technical assistance and training, if requested by a
local district, to assist in the implementation of the district-wide, multitiered system
of supports as a means to identify and assist any student experiencing difficulty in
reading, writing, mathematics, or behavior and to determine appropriate
instructional modifications needed by advanced learners to make continuous
progress.
Page 163 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(4) The technical assistance and training shall be designed to improve:
(a) The use of specific screening processes and programs to identify student
strengths and needs;
(b) The use of screening data for designing instructional interventions;
(c) The use of multisensory instructional strategies and other interventions
validated for effectiveness by evidence-based research;
(d) Progress monitoring of student performance; and
(e) Accelerated, intensive, direct instruction that addresses students' individual
differences, including advanced learners, and enables students that are
experiencing difficulty to catch up with typically performing peers.
(5) (a) Each superintendent or public charter school board of directors shall select:
1. At least one (1) universal screener for reading that is determined by the
department to be reliable and valid to be administered to all students in
kindergarten through grade three (3); and
2. At least one (1) reading diagnostic assessment for reading that is
determined by the department to be reliable and valid to be administered
as part of a multitiered system of supports for students in kindergarten
through grade three (3).
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 158.6453(19) and 160.345, each superintendent or
public charter school board shall adopt a common comprehensive reading
program that is determined by the department to be reliable, valid, and aligned
to reading and writing standards required by KRS 158.6453 and outlined in
administrative regulation promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education
for kindergarten through grade three (3) for all schools or a subset of schools,
with consultation of all affected elementary advisory[school] councils.
(c) All teachers of students in kindergarten through grade three (3), including
public charter school teachers, shall be trained on any reading diagnostic
Page 164 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
assessment and universal screener selected by the superintendent or public
charter school board prior to administration of the assessment. The training
shall address:
1. How to properly administer the reading diagnostic assessment;
2. How to interpret the results of the reading diagnostic assessment to
identify students needing interventions;
3. How to use the assessment results to design instruction and
interventions;
4. The use of the assessment to monitor the progress of student
performance; and
5. The use of accelerated, intensive, and direct instruction that addresses
students' individual differences and enables students to achieve
proficiency in reading, including but not limited to daily, one-on-one
instruction.
(6) A universal screener determined by the department to be reliable and valid shall be:
(a) Given in the first forty-five (45) days of the school year for all kindergarten
students at a public school or public charter school;
(b) Given in the first thirty (30) days of the school year for grades one (1) through
three (3) at a public school or public charter school; and
(c) Given within the final fourteen (14) instructional days of the school year to all
students in kindergarten and first grade at a public school or public charter
school.
(7) A reading improvement plan shall be developed and implemented by a reading
improvement team for any student in kindergarten through grade three (3) identified
as needing accelerated interventions to progress toward proficient performance in
reading. The reading improvement plan shall require:
(a) Intensive intervention that includes effective instructional strategies and
Page 165 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
appropriate instructional materials necessary to help the student make
accelerated progress toward proficient performance in reading and become
ready for the next grade, including but not limited to daily, one-on-one
instruction with students the most in need provided by certified teachers
specifically trained to provide one-on-one instruction;
(b) A school to provide a written quarterly progress report containing the
information required by paragraph (a) of this subsection to a parent or
guardian of any student subject to a reading improvement plan. The written
quarterly progress report for the reading improvement plan may be included
in the school's existing quarterly progress report; and
(c) Individual placement decisions for children who are eligible for special
education and related services to be determined by the appropriate admissions
and release committee in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(8) If a student's rate of progress toward proficient performance in reading needs
accelerated interventions as demonstrated by the results of an approved reading
diagnostic assessment, the local school district shall provide:
(a) Enrichment programs through grade three (3) using evidence-based reading
instruction and other strategies;
(b) Intensive instructional services, progress monitoring measures, and supports
to students through grade three (3); and
(c) Parents and legal guardians of students identified for accelerated interventions
in reading in kindergarten through grade three (3) with a "Read at Home"
plan, including information on how to participate in regular parent-guided
home reading.
(9) (a) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year:
1. A kindergarten student who had a reading improvement plan for the
Page 166 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
school year may remain in kindergarten for an additional school year if a
school determines that the student:
a. Did not meet grade level benchmarks in reading while in
kindergarten as determined by the universal screener given in
accordance with subsection (6) of this section;
b. Did not master the Kentucky reading academic standards for
kindergarten students based on assessments given in accordance
with KRS 158.6453(8); or
c. Is not properly prepared to be successful in the first grade; and
2. A first-grade student who had a reading improvement plan for the
school year shall remain in first grade for an additional school year if a
school determines that the student:
a. Did not meet grade level benchmarks in reading while in first
grade as determined by the universal screener given in accordance
with subsection (6) of this section;
b. Did not master the Kentucky reading academic standards for first
grade students based on assessments given in accordance with
KRS 158.6453(8); or
c. Is not properly prepared to be successful in the second grade.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, placement decisions for
students eligible for special education and related services shall be determined
by the admissions and release committee in accordance with administrative
regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a student who remained in
kindergarten under this subsection shall not subsequently be required to
remain in first grade, and a student shall not be required to remain in first
grade for more than one (1) additional year.
Page 167 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(d) The school shall reevaluate and make necessary changes to the reading
improvement plan of any student remaining in kindergarten or first grade and
shall continue to provide all programs and services required under subsection
(8) of this section during the additional year of kindergarten or first grade.
(e) A student provided an additional year of kindergarten or first grade under this
subsection may advance through the primary school program when it is
determined by the school to be in the best educational interest of the student
pursuant to KRS 158.031.
(10) If a student does not score in the proficient performance level or higher in reading,
as defined in KRS 158.791(2), on the state annually required grade three (3)
assessment, the local school district shall provide:
(a) 1. Enrichment programs in grade four (4) using evidence-based reading
instruction and other strategies; or
2. Intensive instructional services, progress monitoring measures, and
supports to students in grade four (4); and
(b) Written notification of the interventions and supports described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection to the parent or legal guardian of the student, including a
description of proposed interventions and supports to be provided.
(11) By September 1, 2023, if funds are appropriated, the department shall establish
required teacher academies or coaching models for teachers of students in
prekindergarten through grade three (3). The teacher academies or coaching models
shall be related to evidence-based practices in instruction, instructional materials,
and assessment in reading.
(12) The department shall develop and maintain a web-based resource providing
teachers access to:
(a) Information on the use of specific screening processes and programs to
identify student strengths and needs, including those for advanced learners;
Page 168 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(b) Current, evidence-based research and age-appropriate instructional tools that
may be used for substantial, steady improvement in:
1. Reading when a student is experiencing difficulty with phonemic
awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, general reading
comprehension, or reading in specific content areas, or is exhibiting
characteristics of dyslexia, aphasia, or other reading difficulties;
2. Writing when a student is experiencing difficulty with consistently
producing letters or numbers with accuracy or is exhibiting
characteristics of dysgraphia;
3. Mathematics when a student is experiencing difficulty with basic math
facts, calculations, or application through problem solving, or is
exhibiting characteristics of dyscalculia or other mathematical
difficulties; or
4. Behavior when a student is exhibiting behaviors that interfere with his
or her learning or the learning of other students; and
(c) Current, evidence-based research and age-appropriate instructional tools that
may be used for continuous progress of advanced learners.
(13) The department shall encourage districts to utilize both state and federal funds as
appropriate to implement a district-wide multitiered system of supports.
(14) The department is encouraged to coordinate technical assistance and training on
current best practice interventions with state postsecondary education institutions.
(15) The department shall collaborate with the statewide reading research center
established under KRS 164.0207, the Kentucky Center for Mathematics, the
Kentucky Center for Instructional Discipline, the Education Professional Standards
Board, the Council on Postsecondary Education, postsecondary teacher education
programs, and other agencies and organizations as deemed appropriate to ensure
that teachers are prepared to utilize evidence-based interventions in reading,
Page 169 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
writing, mathematics, and behavior.
(16) In compliance with 20 U.S.C. sec. 1414(a)(1)(E), screening of a student to
determine appropriate instructional strategies for curriculum implementation shall
not be considered to be an evaluation for eligibility for special education and related
services and nothing in this section shall limit a school district from completing an
initial evaluation of a student suspected of having a disability.
Section 46. KRS 158.6452 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council is hereby created to
study, review, and make recommendations concerning Kentucky's system of setting
academic standards, assessing learning, identifying academic competencies and
deficiencies of individual students, holding schools accountable for learning, and
assisting schools to improve their performance. The council shall advise the
Kentucky Board of Education and the Legislative Research Commission on issues
related to the development and communication of the academic expectations and
core content for assessment, the development and implementation of the statewide
assessment and accountability program, recognition of high performing schools,
imposition of sanctions, and assistance for schools to improve their performance
under KRS 158.6453, 158.6455, 158.782, and 158.805.
(2) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall be
composed of seventeen (17) voting members appointed by the Governor. On
making appointments to the council, the Governor shall assure broad geographical
representation and representation of elementary, middle, and secondary school
levels; assure equal representation of the two (2) sexes, inasmuch as possible; and
assure that appointments reflect the minority racial composition of the
Commonwealth. The members shall serve terms of two (2) years with no member
serving more than two (2) consecutive terms, except that seven (7) of the initial
appointments shall be for four (4) year terms. The members shall be appointed as
Page 170 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
follows:
(a) Two (2) parents from recommendations submitted by organizations
representing advisory[school] councils and parents;
(b) Two (2) teachers from recommendations submitted by organizations
representing teachers;
(c) Two (2) superintendents from recommendations submitted by organizations
representing superintendents;
(d) Two (2) principals from organizations representing school administrators;
(e) Two (2) local school board members from recommendations submitted by
organizations representing school boards;
(f) Two (2) school district assessment coordinators from recommendations
submitted by organizations representing district assessment coordinators;
(g) Two (2) employers in the state from recommendations submitted by
organizations representing business and industry;
(h) Two (2) university professors with expertise in assessment and measurement;
and
(i) One (1) at-large member.
(3) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall elect a chair
annually from its membership.
(4) The members shall be remunerated for actual and necessary expenses incurred
while attending meetings of the council or while serving as representative of the
council.
(5) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall meet at least
four (4) times each year at times and places as it determines by resolution.
(6) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall be attached
to the Department of Education for administrative purposes. It shall be provided
appropriate staff and resources to conduct its work.
Page 171 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
Section 47. KRS 158.648 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The State Advisory Council for Gifted and Talented Education is hereby created
and attached to the Kentucky Department of Education. The council's purpose is to
make recommendations regarding the provisions of services for gifted and talented
students in Kentucky's education system.
(a) The council shall be composed of nineteen (19) voting members who shall be
appointed by the Governor and three (3) nonvoting, ex officio members. The
members shall be appointed representing various constituencies as follows:
1. Four (4) members shall be teachers within local school districts
representing elementary, middle, and high school levels with at least one
(1) full-time teacher of gifted and talented students and one (1) full-time
teacher who teaches in a regular classroom;
2. Four (4) members shall be parents of students in local school districts,
including two (2) parents of students identified as gifted and talented
and at least one (1) who serves or has served on an advisory[a school]
council;
3. Three (3) members shall be from postsecondary education institutions,
including one (1) from an independent college or university;
4. One (1) member shall be a superintendent of a local school district;
5. Two (2) members shall be principals, including one (1) from an
elementary or middle school and one (1) from a high school;
6. Two (2) members shall be coordinators of gifted and talented programs
and services in local school districts;
7. One (1) member shall be a local board of education member;
8. One (1) member shall represent the visual and performing arts; and
9. One (1) member shall be appointed from the private business sector.
(b) The three (3) nonvoting ex officio members shall be: the state consultant for
Page 172 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
gifted and talented education in the Kentucky Department of Education, a
staff person designated by the executive secretary of the Education
Professional Standards Board, and a staff person designated by the president
of the Council on Postsecondary Education. Vacancies shall be filled by the
Governor as they occur in a manner consistent with the provisions for initial
appointment.
(c) Each board member shall serve a three (3) year term or until a successor is
appointed, except that for initial appointments to the board, three (3) of the
members shall be appointed to serve a one (1) year term, eight (8) of the
members shall be appointed to serve a two (2) year term, and eight (8) of the
members shall be appointed to serve a three (3) year term. A member may be
reappointed but may not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(2) The council shall advise the commissioner of education, the Kentucky Board of
Education, and the Education Professional Standards Board concerning the
development of administrative regulations and education policy regarding gifted
and talented students. The commissioner of education and the executive secretary
for the Education Professional Standards Board shall submit proposed
administrative regulations and educational policies relating to gifted and talented
education and other administrative regulations that impact gifted and talented
students for review by the advisory council prior to seeking approval of the
appropriate board.
(3) As the advisory council considers issues relating to gifted and talented students, it
shall seek dialogue with other agencies and organizations, including the Parent
Teachers Association, the Governor's Scholars Program, the Governor's School for
the Arts, the Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program, the Kentucky
Association of School Councils, the Kentucky Association for Gifted Education, the
Kentucky School Boards Association, the Kentucky Association of School
Page 173 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
Administrators, and the Kentucky Council for Exceptional Children.
(4) The advisory council shall annually elect a chair from its membership, establish
meeting operational procedures, and meet at least two (2) times annually.
(5) The Department of Education shall provide staff and administrative support and
shall administer the funds appropriated to support the expenses of the council.
(6) The members of the advisory council shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for necessary expenses in the same manner as state employees.
Section 48. KRS 158.840 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby finds that reading and mathematics proficiency are
gateway skills necessary for all Kentucky students to achieve the academic goals
established in KRS 158.6451. It is the General Assembly's intent that:
(a) All students in kindergarten through grade three (3) having difficulty in
reading and mathematics receive early diagnosis and intervention services
from highly trained teachers;
(b) All students in kindergarten through grade three (3) needing to make
accelerated progress toward proficiency in mathematics based on data from
valid and reliable universal screening and diagnostic assessments receive
high-quality, evidence-based mathematics instruction and intervention aligned
to the Kentucky academic standards for mathematics;
(c) All students demonstrate proficiency in reading and mathematics as they
progress through the relevant curricula and complete each assessment level
required by the Kentucky Board of Education for the state assessment
program established under KRS 158.6453 and in compliance with the
requirements of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No.
114-95, or its successor; and
(d) Students who are struggling in reading and mathematics or are not at the
proficient level on statewide assessments shall be provided evidence-based
Page 174 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
and developmentally appropriate diagnostic and intervention services, and
instructional modifications necessary to learn.
The General Assembly, the Kentucky Board of Education, the Kentucky
Department of Education, the Council on Postsecondary Education, colleges and
universities, local boards of education, school administrators, advisory[school]
councils, teachers, parents and families, and other educational entities, such as the
Education Professional Standards Board, P-16 councils, the statewide reading
research center established under KRS 164.0207, and the Center for Middle School
Academic Achievement must collaborate if the intentions specified in this
subsection are to be met. Intensive focus on student achievement in reading and
mathematics does not negate the responsibility of any entity to help students obtain
proficiency in other core curriculum content areas.
(2) The General Assembly's role is to set policies that address the achievement levels of
all students and provide resources for the professional growth of teachers and
administrators, assessing students' academic achievement, including valid and
reliable universal screening and diagnostic assessment and instructional
interventions, technology innovations, targeted reading and mathematics statewide
initiatives, research and the distribution of research findings, services for students
beyond the regular school day, and other services needed to help struggling
learners.
(3) The Kentucky Board of Education shall regularly review and modify, when
appropriate, its statewide assessment policies and practices to enable local school
districts and schools to carry out the provisions of the statewide assessment and
accountability system, required under KRS 158.6453 to improve student
achievement in mathematics and reading.
(4) The Kentucky Department of Education shall:
(a) Provide assistance to schools and teachers, including publicizing professional
Page 175 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
development opportunities, methods of measuring effective professional
development, the availability of high quality instructional materials, and
developmentally appropriate, valid, and reliable screening and diagnostic
assessments of student competency in mathematics and reading. The
department shall provide access to samples of units of study, annotated
student work, diagnostic instruments, and research findings, and give
guidance on parental engagement;
(b) Work with state and national educators and subject-matter experts to identify
student reading and mathematical skills in each subject area that align with the
state content standards adopted under KRS 158.6453 and identify teaching
strategies in each subject area that can be used explicitly to develop the
identified reading and mathematical skills under this paragraph;
(c) Encourage the development of comprehensive middle and high school
adolescent reading and mathematics plans to be incorporated into the curricula
of each subject area to improve the reading comprehension and mathematical
skills of all students;
(d) Conduct an annual review of the state grant programs it manages and make
recommendations, when needed, to the Interim Joint Committee on Education
for changes to statutory requirements that are necessary to gain a greater
return on investment;
(e) Provide administrative support and oversight to programs to train classroom
coaches and mentors to help teachers with reading and mathematics
instruction; and
(f) Require no reporting of instructional plans, formative assessment results, staff
effectiveness processes, or interventions implemented in the classroom,
except for:
1. Interventions implemented under KRS 158.305(2) and 158.8402;
Page 176 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
2. Funds provided under KRS 158.792 or 158.844; or
3. Schools that are identified for comprehensive support and improvement
and fail to exit comprehensive support and improvement status after
three (3) consecutive years of implementing the turnaround intervention
process as described in KRS 160.346.
(5) The Education Professional Standards Board, in cooperation with the Council on
Postsecondary Education, shall exercise its duties and functions under KRS 161.028
to ensure that teacher education programs are fulfilling the needs of Kentucky for
highly skilled teachers. The Education Professional Standards Board shall:
(a) Coordinate the federal and state grant programs it administers with other
statewide initiatives relating to improving student achievement in reading and
mathematics to avoid duplication of effort and to make efficient use of
resources;
(b) Submit a report every three (3) years to the Legislative Research Commission
for referral to the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on Education and the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, summarizing the
compliance of each teacher preparation program for alignment to early
childhood education or elementary regular education standards and to the
instructional requirements set forth in KRS 164.306(1) and 164.3061;
(c) Regularly report program data to an external evaluator for an annual analysis
of the ability of teacher preparation programs to properly train and equip
teacher preparation program students with the literacy and mathematics
content knowledge and skills to educate students in kindergarten through
grade three (3); and
(d) Exercise its duties and responsibilities under KRS 161.030 and 161.048 to
ensure highly qualified teachers.
(6) Colleges and universities shall:
Page 177 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
(a) Utilize institution-wide resources to work with elementary and secondary
educators and other entities to align curriculum content to ensure that students
who achieve proficiency on standards established at the prekindergarten
through secondary levels will require no remediation to successfully enter a
postsecondary education program;
(b) Provide quality undergraduate teacher preparation programs to ensure that
those preparing to teach reading or mathematics at all grade levels have the
necessary content knowledge, assessment and diagnostic skills, and teaching
methodologies and that teachers in all subject areas have the requisite skills
for helping students at all grade levels develop critical strategies and skills for
reading and comprehending subject matter;
(c) Deliver evidence-based continuing education for teachers in reading and
mathematics through institutes, graduate level courses, and other professional
development activities that support a statewide agenda for improving student
achievement in reading and mathematics;
(d) Conduct or assist with research on best practices in assessment, intervention
strategies, teaching methodologies, costs and effectiveness of instructional
models, and other factors as appropriate to reading and mathematics;
(e) Provide staff to consult and provide technical assistance to teachers, staff, and
administrators at elementary, middle, and secondary school sites;
(f) Assume active roles in the statewide initiatives referenced in KRS 156.553
and 158.842; and
(g) Develop written procedures for measuring the effectiveness of activities
outlined in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this subsection.
(7) School councils at all school levels are encouraged to identify and allocate
resources to qualified teachers to become coaches or mentors in mathematics or
coaches or mentors in reading with a focus on improving student achievement in
Page 178 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1223
their respective schools.
(8) Local school boards and superintendents shall provide local resources to
supplement or match state and federal resources to support teachers, school
administrators, and school councils in helping students achieve proficiency in
reading and mathematics.
(9) Local school superintendents shall provide leadership and resources to the
principals of all schools to facilitate curriculum alignment, communications, and
technical support among schools to ensure that students are academically prepared
to move to the next level of schooling.
Page 179 of 179
XXXX 1/27/2026 1:46 PM Jacketed